Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Number of Reviews
56

Author
Doug Skiles
Starring: Téa Leoni (Jenny Lerner), Elijah Wood (Leo Biederman), Robert
Duvall (Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner), Morgan Freeman (President Beck), Leelee
Sobieski (Sarah Hotchner), Maximilian Schell (Jason Lerner), Vanessa
Redgrave (Robin Lerner)
Directed by: Mimi Leder, Written by: Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin
Rated PG-13 by the MPAA for violence and other intensity, strong
langauge, and sexual references
Earthquakes, tidal waves, flaming debris, and all that jazz.
It's the stuff that disaster movies are made of.  And DEEP IMPACT is
clearly a disaster film.
As our story opens, Leo and Sarah unwittingly stumble upon a comet. 
They send the information off to a scientist, who is then (stupidly and
predictably) killed before he can tell anyone that a flaming ball is
headed for Earth.  A year later, we find the government has gotten ahold
of the records of the find somehow and knows of the impending disaster,
but has yet to tell the world.  Jenny Lerner, an aspiring reporter at
CNBC (what's with aspiring reporters this summer?), unwittingly stumbles
upon the government's plans to deal with the heavenly body heading our
way, forcing President Beck to step up his announcement of the
approaching comet.  He makes the announcement, and then details his plan
to stop it - they're sending a group of astronauts, led by moon landing
veteran Spurgeon Tanner, up into space to land on the comet, plant
nuclear bombs in it, and blow it to pieces.  Before our story ends,
we'll have to try this plan out, Jenny will have to reconcile with her
father, Leo will get married to Sarah (apparently at age 14 or so...
yeah, that's healthy), and basically, a lot of crazy crap will be goin'
on.
DEEP IMPACT owes a lot to the Irwin Allen disaster films of yore, with
their collection of characters all facing down personal trials in their
lives at a time of crisis.  And like many disaster films, some
characters are engaging, others are inane.  Leoni is questionable as
Jenny Lerner.  Sometimes, she's excellent.  Sometimes, she's downright
bad.  And she bounces back and forth quite a bit.  Her parents are
stronger though.  Redgrave is wonderful as always, but perhaps the best
part of her family is Schell, who turns out a fantastic performance.
The film's weakest links go to Wood and Sobieski (who looks an awful lot
like a little Helen Hunt, and even sounds like her in a few scenes). 
Elijah seems to be trying, but the horrible performance of his love
interest, and their positively idiotic and laughable romance seriously
hurts this movie.  Their parents (such as the always-great Richard
Schiff who plays Elijah Wood's father) are better, but do almost
nothing.
Morgan Freeman conveys real emotion and power as the President.  He is
the kind of President that you would respect and listen to.  A
commanding presence, as always, even though his screen time is rather
limited.  He really should've been used and developed more.
The film's strongest aspect is the group of astronauts.  All of their
roles are well-acted, particuarly Robert Duvall's as the aging American
icon.  We truly care about them, and when they face danger, we're right
there with 'em.  They are the thread that holds this movie together. 
Still, one question sticks out - why is it that they are in their
uniforms in some scenes, but fly through space wearing plain street
clothes in others?  Of course, that's a very minor gripe. 
Oddly, James Cromwell makes a brief appearance as a senator.  An actor
of his superb skill should've had much more to do, especially since he's
saddled with a bit of foolish dialogue in his minor role.
Mimi Leder's direction isn't as impressive as it looked back in THE
PEACEMAKER (1997), her feature debut, but it's still quite good.  James
Horner delivers a great score, of course.  The script, though, is fairly
weak.  The performances either let all the script's weaknesses shine
through, or rise above them triumphantly, depending on which one of the
film's plots are in question.
The astronauts' scenes and those belonging to Morgan Freeman, along with
a few of Leoni's moments, are powerful and at times, touching.  Some
audience members broke down and cried at times, and that's
understandable.  On the flip side of the coin, Elijah Wood's subplot is,
unfortunately, laughably bad, and at times, Téa has the same problem. 
The end note of the movie is a depressing one.  There is an attempt at a
final upbeat scene, but it falls flat after the numerous deaths that
came before.  Like last year's TITANIC (1997), this is film that can
leave you disquieted by its tragedy, although TITANIC was the story of a
real disaster, whereas this is clearly fictional.  Both, though, can put
you into the position of wondering what you would do in such a
situation.
Still, Wood's plot and a number of Leoni moments really hurt the film,
because they're the two plots that take up the most running time,
unfortunately.  In the end, because of that strong flaw, a film that is
sometimes notably touching generates unintentional laughter.  And when a
climactic scene doesn't quite work, that's another problem.  In the end,
this is an above average disaster movie, but nothing fantastic overall. 
Be warned, there's only two action/special effects sequences in the film
- the astronauts' visit to the comet and the title sequence, and, while
both are nothing short of absolutely spectacular, summer action junkies
would do better to check out GODZILLA (1998) for their adrenaline and
CGI fix.  DEEP IMPACT is more of a dramatic film than an action film. 
It poses interesting questions about how the planet's population would
react to the impending end of the world, and then fails to answer them
satisfactorily or very believably.  Fans of disaster movies will enjoy
it quite a bit.  Fans of drama or action films, though, are likely to
feel disappointed.  Expect a disaster movie with more character
development and less action, and you'll be alright.
"Heroes die... but they are remembered." - President Beck

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Mimi Leder
Writers: Bruce Joe Rubin and Michael Tolkin
Starring: Téa Leoni, Elijah Wood, Morgan Freeman, Robert Duvall, Maximilian
Schell, Vanessa Redgrave, Leelee Sobieski, Ron Eldard, Mary McCormack,
Blair Underwood, Jon Favreau, Laura Innes, Rya Kihlstedt, Richard Schiff,
Betsy Brantley, Derek de Lint, Kurtwood Smith, James Cromwell, Charles
Martin Smith
With "Deep Impact," what you really have is not only a return-to-form for
the "Disaster" Films, which at best were suspense films centered around the
various people involved (my personal favorite is the Steve McQueen/Paul
Newman/William Holden/O.J. Simpson epic, "The Towering Inferno"), but also
a little bit of optimism for future disaster films.  After all, haven't we
been bombarded with the most inane disaster films as of late (such as
"Twister" and "Volcano," neither which had one interesting character)?  We
sure have, and if anything, "Deep Impact" is a nice try at being something
great, as well as a big fresh of air from seeing way too many big special
effects become the forefront in films.
"Deep Impact" is the first of the two comets-heading-directly-for-earth
arriving in theaters this summer (the other being "Armageddon," which is
frantically trying to make itself look more human), but the focus isn't
even really on the comet itself - it's on the people involved.  After all,
if a comet was to strike earth, this would really make up for about five to
ten minutes of cool special effects when the comet actually hits, and
perhaps about ten to fifteen minutes of other special effects when the
astronaut team tries to blow it up.  There's a whole lot of filling time in
there, and "Deep Impact" figures that it shouldn't be about the comet
itself but rather its impact on the people it will affect.
The film begins with the discovery of the comet, and quickly establishes
the measures taken by political offices around the world to deal with it. 
They decide to send a Russian-American team of astronauts/miners to land on
the comet, plant a couple bombs, and then set it off months before it hits
earth.  Of course, there's a back-up plan, which involves randomly
selecting a certain amount of people to live in a cave for a couple years
until the dust settles and they can try and repopulate the world (a plan
which was thought up in none other than "Dr. Strangelove").  This is all
very scary, and luckily, it's handled that way, almost in the same scary
way that "Outbreak" dealt with the blocking off of the town so that the
virus did not escape.
But this is not the real focus of the film: it's main point is to show you
the various people it affects, and so we can see a wide variety of people,
it choses three chief groups.  We have Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood), who was
the kid who discovered the comet during a meeting of "The Astronomers
Club," and who has to deal with the fact that he may not be able to bring
his girlfriend (Leelee Sobieski) along to live in the caves, and if he may,
she may not go because her parents may not be able to come along.  There's
also Jenny Lerner (Téa Leoni, who has a very cute neurotic quality), a
rising MSNBC anchor (giving the station the most press it has ever had) who
not only tries to uncover the comet story when it's still off-grounds to
the public, but who finds she has to deal with her feelings for her father
(Oscar-winner Maximilian Schell) when he decides to remarry a younger woman
instead of getting back together with her mother (Vanessa Redgrave).
And we also have the story of the astronauts/miners who are landing on the
comet, led by the aging Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall, hot once
again off his performance in "The Apostle") after an accident with the
other leader (Ron Eldard).  As "Armageddom" is making these people the
focus of its film, "Deep Impact" makes them an equal to the other two
stories, and tries to flesh out their lives to show the pain of having to
perhaps be a martyr (one astronaut, played by Mary McCormack, wryly says
"If we do this, they'll name high schools after us").
And at the head of it all is the President, played with dignity and grace
by Morgan Freeman, who is so good in the role that I'd probably vote for
him if he ran in a couple years.  Unfortunately very little is done with
his character, and one early scene involving him actually harms his persona
from that point on, even if in all reality it was only a hoax (you have to
see it to understand what I mean).
I've been hearing lots of people complaining about the hokiness that this
film has, how all of its characters are stereotypes or paper thin, and
partially these people are right.  This film is corny, and no character is
fully fleshed out enough to truly and deeply associate with them.  Then
again, the same thing could be said about "Titanic," which featured two
romantic leads who were hardly fully-realized people (she's rich and he's
poor, and they love eachother...that's about it).  But like I said with
that film, stereotyping and not fully developing characters actually helps
here.  The people in this film are broad generalizations that only help us
to feel for them more and find ourselves in them.  We can all (hopefully)
associate with Leo when he's worried about parting with his beloved
girlfriend, because, hey, we wouldn't want to leave her behind either.  And
we can all associate with Jenny, because we've all had a grudge against
someone that we fear we may have to fess up to if something like this comes
along.  If these people were more complex, we'd not be able to really find
ourselves in them, because the more complex a person is and the more we
know about them, the less we can say "Yeah, the same thing happens to me
too!" and since that's what this film's big strength is, I can't say it's a
big flaw.
"Deep Impact" has many many many problems, so many that a big list could be
made of them (every twist in the story happens so the conclusion can
happen, what's up with Charles Martin Smith being killed for no reason in
the beginning, why deal with the cover-up of the comet when it really has
nothing to do with the rest of the film, not enough Vanessa Redgrave or
Maxmilian Schell to really feel for them completely, how come Elijah can
easily climb that mountain, etc, etc, etc.), but if I were to make a list
of them and take off points for every thing that went wrong with this film,
I'd really be cheating you out of a review.  If anything, the real problem
with the film is it puts too much into its conclusion and not enough into
its exposition.  But "Deep Impact" is, after all, more of a sign of
optimism for future films than a really great film.  With this and
"Titanic," we see Hollywood is changing for the better, and that future
films won't be as soulless as, say, "Godzilla" or "Twister."  We can expect
better characters, more interesting plotlines, and much more.
If you're having trouble seeing past the cliches, then think of that scene
where you see the big tidal wave towards the end about to come down on two
main characters, you don't think "Wow!  What a cool effect!," but instead
think "Oh shit, that wave is going to kill them!"  I could easily point out
that this scene is cheap because one character had to kill themself to put
them there, and that it looks fake, and a couple other things to demean it.
 But I'd be lying if I didn't say that I cared.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 14 June 1998 by myself for $5.50 at the SONY Loews Showplace
I am a real sucker. I cried at this movie. But remember that I cry during
everything. If children die, parents die, dogs or cats die, if any of them
come back from the other world to haunt and love you, if someone knows
they are dying and are having a final farewell, if something selfless and
devoted happens, I am there with Kleenex (TM). Heck, I cried during the
McDonalds commercial when they make that retarded kid they hired feel
important because they let him work there. So I am a big mushpot, okay? I
love a good movie and a good cry and it's nice when they coincide but they
can be mutually exclusive. Read on...
*Deep Impact* knows exactly how to manipulate the emotions. This is
essential since there is a variety of problems with the screenplay. The
first problem is that there are too many characters. The magic is that
they are able to manipulate a great deal of them into emotional situations
that an extinction-level event like a meteor hitting Western Canada will
bring.
Unfortunately, the main reason people go to these movies is to see the
destruction and the special effects, so the movie's best scenes appear in
commercials and the surprises are at a minimum. For example, the whole
beginning of the movie could have had more impact (no pun intended) if
they took the tack of MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) stumbling
onto something big first, and then showed the comet's discovery in
flashback.
So, we all know a huge comet is coming toward Earth. Luckily, President
Beck (Morgan Freeman) is hopeful that the big spaceship Messiah headed by
Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall) will be able to implant nuclear
warheads in the moving meteor by landing on it (sound pretty impossible,
eh?). His backup plan is "The Ark"--a huge cave that will house the best
minds in America (Europe apparently is on another planet) and people
selected by lottery. [The real sci-fi aspect is this: How did a black man
get elected to the Presidency in the present time? I don't expect to see
that in my own lifetime, and I'm a young liberal!] It's set in the
present, and being an anti-senior nation, no one older than 50 is allowed in
the tunnel. This poses a problem to Jenny, as her mother is played by
Vanessa Redgrave--a national treasure, for God's sake! It's an outrage!
Didn't anyone see Julia? Are we still mad about her PLO affections?
Someone should have made an exception. This country was built on making
exceptions.
Known for her work on the TV series *ER*, director Mimi Leder does a
pretty good job with a panoramic script that calls for nationalistic space
heroics involving an astronaut crew and their families, a teenage love
story and their two families, the reporter and her divorced parents and
all her coworkers, and a President who's married to a family we never
actually see and all the President's men. There is just way too much going
on here. Her successes, however, are the emotional tearjerker scenes, and
the scenes involving tension, as seen in the two space missions. These
required good direction and editing.
The actors do a pretty good job. Redgrave and Duvall are excellent as
always. Leoni is pretty good as well, considering this is her first lead
role in a summer blockbuster. Elijah Wood and Leelee Sobieski are good as
the teenage lovers, considering how little that story was shown. 
Two more problems: The movie is a commercial for NBC and MSNBC. Those
logos are throughout the film. Stars from *ER* and NBC--Ron Eldard and
Blair Underwood as two of the astronauts, and Laura Innes as Beth Stanley
are here also. The other problem is that the special effects are not all
that great. It's about two steps up from NRA Chairman Charlton Heston
parting the Red Sea in The Ten Commandments from the 1950s. Plus, knowing
a comet is heading to the Atlantic, why was anyone in NYC, much less
sitting leisurely reading a paper in Washington Square Park. I guess it's
more fun to destroy New York City when you get to see New Yorkers hurt
also. The only thing missing was a woman absentmindedly walking her baby
in a pram across Broadway while the tsunami wave is bearing down on her.
*Deep Impact* is best seen trapped in the theatre, in the full grasp of
it's manipulation. You'll laugh (unintentionally), you'll cry, you'll see
New York destroyed (again). Just try to pay less than full price.
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin. At least that's what they
called it.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell
Director: Mimi Leder
Producers: David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck
Screenplay: Michael Tolkin, Bruce Joel Rubin
If ever there was ever a disaster movie that focussed more on the
emotional issues of love and sacrifice, than the actual special effects
of destroying earth, then it will probably be remembered as DEEP IMPACT.
Man is on the verge of extinction as a comet plummets towards earth, and
like the dinosaurs before us, the human race is about to become
fossilised. But unlike the dinosaurs, mankind has a great ability to
innovate. With the combined effort between ex-cold war enemies, the US
and the USSR, a group of astronauts are assembled to blow up the big
rock.
If you were expecting to see large tidal waves, rip-apart famous
American cities, then your wait will be a long one. Much of the movie
focuses on the loneliness of a wannabe famous reporter, with divorced
parents. A great scene where a daughter says to her estranged father,
It was a perfect day', and moments later a large wave thumping them
into oblivion. An emotionally charged scene, where a mother screams to
her daughter escaping on a motorcycle, Take my baby, take my baby!'
This is soon followed by lovers holding each other peacefully, before
being blasted into oblivion by the same large wave. Before finally, the
first Black American President (Morgan Freeman), giving some tear
jerking words post IMPACT, about big waves rolling, cities falling but
mankind living on etc. etc. as if this movie was not emotionally packed
enough already.
The virtually unknown cast, except for some golden oldies (Robert
Duvall, Vanessa Redgrave, Maxcimilian Schell), who give this movie some
credibility and is a great economical plan for the worth-waiting-for
special effects heaped towards the end. Some people will dislike the
attempts at mixing a bowl full of thoughtfulness in with a dish full of
special effects', but it really ain't half bad.

Author
Boyd Petrie
Deep Impact (1998)
Rated PG-13 for disaster related elements and brief language
----------  Out of 4 stars: *1/2 (1.5 Stars)
Starring: Tea Leoni, Robert Duvall, Vanessa Redgrave, Elijah Wood, Morgan
Freeman.
---------------------------------------
Warning: Spoilers are included in this review... but it doesn't really make much
of a difference.
DEEP IMPACT begins the official summer movie season, and it also brings back
memories of 1997.  Remember when DANTE'S PEAK came out in February?  A few
months later, VOLCANO was released.  The first film was smart, exhilirating, and
one of the best disaster films I had ever seen.  The latter film was an
incohesive mess that defied logic and wasted talent.  Well, it's deja vu all
over again as two disaster films go head to head in competition.  This time,
unfortunately, the first comet flick is so bad that people may shy away from
ARMAGEDDON, the upcoming comet-disaster to be released the beginning of July.
Of course, the general reaction of the audience was oppposed to mine, and so I
am in the minority, as I was when I stood on the side of DANTE'S PEAK.  But
while watching DEEP IMPACT, I began to wonder how anyone in their right mind
could actually like this film.  Apparently many did, and it utterly baffles me.
To be completely honest, I haven't had this little fun watching a disaster film
in my entire life.  VOLCANO had implausibilities up the wazoo, but it was still
rather fun to watch.  DEEP IMPACT doesn't just have implausibilities, it also
contains cheap human drama, incredibly horrible special effects, and a poorly
constructed plot.  The only thing that gives it a half star above my bottom
ranking is a slightly entertaining final fifteen minutes and some good actors
making the most of their characters.
DEEP IMPACT begins in an unnamed year (the year varies; advanced technology sets
it in the future, but FIRE IN THE SKY is showing on a local movie theater,
pushing it back to 1993).  A line of students is outside at night, peering
through telescopes at the dark sky above.  Among these are Leo Biederman (Elijah
Wood) and Sarah Hotchner (Leelee Sobieski).  Leo unknowingly discovers a comet,
and his teacher sends a photo of the unknown object to an astronomer, who then
is able to determine the correct path of this distant comet in about a few
seconds.  He races off to mail the information, but is killed in a reckless car
accident.  A year passes, and nothing is heard about it again.
We are then introduced to Jenny Lerner (Téa Leoni), a reporter for MSNBC.  She
gets handed a job to investigate a possible cover-up in the government involving
Senator Alan Rittenhouse (James Cromwell).  She talks to a woman who mentions
that Rittenhouse was having an affair with a girl named Ellie.  After talking
with Rittenhouse, and unsatisfied with the information she gets, she decides to
use the Internet for help.  Luckily, she knows exactly how to spell the certain
"Ellie" that she is looking for (they spell it ELE in the film... that girl is
pretty darn smart for guessing how it was spelled).  Before she can use the
information, the government decides to push her car off the road.  They take her
in to meet the President of the United States, President Beck (Morgan Freeman).
Beck recommends that Jenny keep the information secret for 48 hours so they can
confirm it and then hold a press conference.  Naturally, she wants to be
compensated, and they offer her a front row seat and the chance for the first
question.
And so, yada yada yada, they reveal the comet to the public and their plans:
send a massive spacecraft out to destroy it before it can arrive.  They announce
a plan called "ARK," which is their only hope for survival.  A computer will
select 800,000 people at random.  These people are the ones who will go into a
large cave underground so that the impact of the comet won't kill off the entire
human race.  After two years, the dust will settle (actually, it would take
much, much longer--approximately ninety years, from what I understand) and the
humans could come back to the surface and start over.  The rest of the plot is
your standard disaster film procedures, but there is one subplot worth
mentioning.  Jenny and her father, Jason (Maximilian Schell), have a very
touching relationship that forms out of the impending doom.  The final moment
involving the two characters is heartfelt and emotional.  It's a shame that
nothing else is heartfelt.  Now, of course, we all know that the comet does
impact the surface.  The title alone suggests it, and the previews actually show
it!  By doing this, absoltuely no tension can be drawn from any attempt to stop
the comet because we all know that it won't work.
Director Mimi Leder came from her successful tries at direction with episodes of
the hit television show "ER."  Her major film debut was THE PEACEMAKER, a
pathetic and heartless action film.  Well, this time Leder outdid herself,
creating a film worse than that one.  Suggestion to Ms. Leder: Please, stay away
from the big screen, or at least the action genre.  Much of the blame can be
placed on Leder directly, because the pace is disastrously off.  Throughout the
film we are given subtitles that tell us how much time has passed (it goes from
months to weeks to hours).  It literally feels like this lapsed time is taking
place in real-time--it's that boring.  Of course, Leder isn't all to blame for
it.  Screenwriters Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin have crafted a simplistic
story that only gets worse with time.  What starts out promising soon turns
deadly (for the audience anyway).  Chock full of cheesy one liners ("You know,
you are going to have more sex than anyone else in school!") and stupid
characters, you might think we were back in the 70s again.  Only one of the
subplots is remotely interesting, while the rest are forgettable and boring.
And the main plot is so outrageous that you can't figure out if this film is
supposed to be an action, drama, or sci-fi.
To put it simply: the special effects of this film are a hit and miss
situation.  That's right, 80% miss, and 20% hit.  Scenes above the Earth are
well done, and the orbiting ship is majestic.  But the comet is a huge mistake,
making it more laughable than frightening.  The concept of even trying to land
on a comet is preposterous enough, but that's forgiveable.  What isn't
forgiveable is actually having humans walk on the surface.  Give me a break,
will ya?  And of course, the much hyped collision of comet and Earth.  Well, it
is far from spectacular, and it makes INDEPENDENCE DAY look brilliant.  The
water rushing towards the land is effective, but once it hits the continent, the
effects turn ridiculous.  CGI water is used, and it looks so bad that I heard
more laughs from the audience than shrieks.  In fact, I may even recommend the
film for those who want to see how bad effects can actually get these days.
Just when we think visual effects can't be improved, along comes a film to show
that they really can and should be.
One thing has struck a wrong note with me concerning Mimi Leder's direction,
which also influences the actors.  Leder loves to show the actors' faces before
and during moments of terror.  This reminded me of another action director,
Renny Harlin (DIE HARD 2, CLIFFHANGER).  But Harlin succeeds because he shows
the faces of the victims in realistic situations.  Leder likes to flaunt
people's fears via their faces, but instead of coming off as sympathetic, Leder
seems more of a Sadist.  One moment has an astronaut flying off into space.
This should be enough to warrant a response from the audience, but Leder wants
to go farther and shows us the person's face while drifting into space.  This is
one of the cheapest ways to ellicit an emotional response from an audience, and
I, for one, am not going to be fooled.  On another note, Leder's film only picks
up its pace during the last fifteen minutes when the comet actually impacts.
The pace does pick up, and some very emotional moments are shown.  Then again,
when you watch people cry for their loved ones, it's obvious it will be
emotional.  It's mostly just a big trick to rope viewers into "feeling" for the
characters, but it didn't work for me.
But anyway, the actors do as much as they can with what they are given.  Téa
Leoni (BAD BOYS, TV's "The Naked Truth") is the best of the film, and she is
given the meatiest role.  Her character is made stronger by Leoni's presence,
and we grow to care for her.  Robert Duvall is energetic and fun to watch, but
his character is turned into shreds by the plot.  Elijah Wood also comes off
rather successfully, but he still hasn't had many good roles (Wood, stick to
drama!  You are too talented for this stuff).  Vanessa Redgrave is barely
acknowledgeable, and her performance is only enhanced by her strong presence on
screen.  Maximilian Schell is distracting, but he does provide some nice humor.
Morgan Freeman has been infinitely better than this, and gives one of his most
shallow performances to date (which is quite remarkable for him).  Leelee
Sobieski could have been better, but I think she just suffered from a poorly
written character.  A special note should go to Ron Eldard and Denise Crosby.
Eldard is good in his role, but is limited by the plot.  Crosby is special to me
personally because she was Tasha Yar from TV's "Star Trek: The Next
Generation."  Seeing her was one of the highlights of the film.  Overall, a very
talented cast virtually wasted.
DEEP IMPACT is rated PG-13 for disaster related elements and brief language.
This is one of the worst films of the year, and if it is any omen of things to
come, this summer could be one of the worst ever.  Luckily, THE X-FILES MOVIE is
coming up, and hopefully ARMAGEDDON will be more successful.  It's a shame that
this film will do so successfully because it just isn't worth much.  Costing
nearly $75 million, with special effects done by the illustrious ILM (which is a
huge shocker), and with a score composed by Oscar-winner James Horner (TITANIC),
one might have expected this to be more fun to witness and experience.  Well,
it's not.  When the comet does hit the Earth, you almost wish it could just take
this film along with it.

Author
Michael Chen
There're so many things to criticize about I don't know where to start.
Recommendation: turn off your brain - don't be like me, decreasing the
rating everyday because I think about it too much.
A comet is about to strike Earth, causing a catastrophe similar to the
Extinction Level Event (E.L.E.) that wiped out the dinosaurs. What
follows is the story of a President's bid to think for the good of his
people, a rising reporter, the love story of two teenagers (one of whom
discovered the comet), and a team of astronauts on the ship `Messiah' to
save the world.
Firstly, there is nothing outstandingly inferior about the making of the
film (nor is there anything outstandingly good about it), but the plot
holes make the film corny and stupid. To be honest, I was more moved by
the trailer than the film itself (which isn't saying much). Mimi Leder's
follow-up to `The Peacemaker' is equally incompetent, with all the big
stars wasted. (Perhaps I'm just annoyed that the release of `The
Peacemaker' in the US overshadowed a far superior thriller, `The
Assignment'.) It is very obvious that the title not only represents the
big boom that will result from the collision, but also connotes the
heavy impact on human lives. However, the film simply fails on that
note. The effects are worn-out, the substandard screenplay limited the
acting, and the director continued her sad run in terms of
good-film-making credentials. She's still making good money though.
Téa Leoni's unfortunate character, the news reporter, is the foundation
of the story and of the cast. But the film suffers from too many
characters that do not need to be explored. Robert Duvall's aging
astronaut is lifeless, and Morgan Freeman's President is restricted to,
well, a righteous President (which means he's not interesting at all).
Leoni's character is the only appealing one, and is played with
reasonable conviction (but a rather peculiar showing when reporting for
MSNBC), but was definitely undervalued by the director and
screenwriters.
WARNING: SPOILERS INCLUDED (but a lot of it is irrelevant and
predictable anyway).
Plot holes, plot holes, plot holes. Now, E.L.E. is threatening to
exterminate more than 99% of the human race, and they send eight puny
little nuclear bombs up there? Where's the logic? Leder could have at
least made it plausible with 20. And then it turns out that only a few
percent of the world population actually perish, and those less selfish
ones (the ones that stayed at home) were the victims. The film was
almost mocking them, telling them they had died for nothing. I also fail
to see how two teenagers, carrying a baby, would be the first to climb
up the mountain/hill, even with a motorbike for a head-start.
It's unlikely that the dust will take just two years to settle, but that
doesn't really matter. Building caves was a strategy mentioned in `Dr.
Strangelove', which proposed that people lived underground for one
hundred or so years. Now THAT is a more practical use for caves. What IS
the point of living in caves? There is no, unlike `Dr. Strangelove', any
radioactivity outside to restrict exposure. How do plants grow? If
humans have the technology to keep plants alive in caves, there's no
reason why they can't do it in the open. The President disclosed that
other countries have been preparing their own caves. Obviously this
means that the other countries were informed a long time ago, and you
can't be serious to say that nobody leaked the news to the media.
In an important mission like that of the `Messiah', for that matter ANY
mission, it is impossible that isn't sufficient fuel for an extra couple
of hundred metres, needless to say tens of kilometres.
This is not DEEP Impact  it's a frivolous CHEAP Impact. But even with
all that, some overacting, and a 3.4 rating, it's still watchable, just
don't think about it. Okay?
Welcome any questions, comments, and criticisms to
microchip81@hotmail.com.

Author
Brian Takeshita
Scientists have posited that a large meteor struck the earth millions
of years ago and killed the dinosaurs.  Mimi Leder's DEEP IMPACT faces
humanity with the same fate.  While with his astronomy club one
evening, high school student Leo Biederman spots an unknown star and
has a picture of it sent to Marcus Wolf, a club advisor who works at a
nearby telescopic observatory.  Wolf identifies the object as a
meteor, not a star, and plots its trajectory, only to find that it is
due to collide with the earth.
The United States government keeps this information under wraps for a
year, when MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), unwittingly
uncovers the story while following up leads on what she thinks is a
sex scandal within the President's cabinet.  Soon thereafter,
President Beck (Morgan Freeman) makes a televised announcement that a
meteor roughly the size of New York City will hit the planet within a
year, causing what is known as an ELE, or extinction level event.
What isn't destroyed by the initial impact will eventually succumb to
the lack of sunlight caused by the sun's being obscured by debris.  On
the bright side, a joint U.S./Russian mission to destroy the cosmic
interloper has already been planned.  Using the new nuclear "Orion
Drive", the largest spaceship ever built will take six astronauts out
to the meteor, where they will land on the surface, drill into it, and
plant nuclear devices which, when detonated, will break the meteor up
into small, harmless pieces.
I'm not giving away a whole lot by saying that the mission is not
entirely successful.  The movie poster has a meteor hitting the earth,
and every commercial I've seen shows a giant wave bearing down on New
York.  The bulk of this film is devoted to an emotional reconciliation
amongst the main characters in what are surely the last days of their
lives, superimposed against the backdrop of a mission to save
humanity.  What results is basically a long wait until the meteor gets
here.
You see, DEEP IMPACT bills itself as a disaster movie, but what it
lacks are, well, disasters.  Most disaster movies put their
earthquakes, eruptions, nuclear explosions, etc. somewhere around the
middle of the film and have the main characters try to deal with
salvaging what they can, or prevent a final, fatal disaster from
happening.  Remember METEOR from 1979?  The premise was much the same:
A meteor is coming to crush the earth.  However, throughout the film,
splinters off the main rock hurtle our way and impact the planet,
giving us enough eye candy to tempt our visual taste buds and make us
say, "Gee, if a splinter did that, what's the big one going to do?"
No such luck with this film.  Instead, we just get poor development of
characters we only intermittently care about, and the film therefore
fails to maintain the tension of impending doom.  Like I said, a long
wait until the meteor gets here.
The characters are forgettable largely due to fundamental faults in
the screenplay.  In a movie about the potential end of civilization,
why choose a reporter as the lead?  The Jenny Lerner character is one
of the most uninteresting of the film, yet she is thrust to the
forefront.  Leo Biederman is played nicely by Elijah Wood, but
Biederman is also a character whose presence is questionable.
President Beck's credibility as a component of the film was
unfortunately undermined by a terribly corny speech at the movie's
finale.  What a waste of a convincing performance by Morgan Freeman.
There are a few things in the film which just don't make sense, and
therefore distract the viewer from the rest of the movie, while you
try and figure out what they meant.  For example, while following her
scandal leads, Jenny sees cases of Ensure, a dietary supplement for
seniors, being loaded onto a boat belonging to presidential
cabinetmember Alan Rittenhouse (James Cromwell).  A little while
later, she is taken to a secret meeting with the President in the
kitchen of some restaurant, where she also notices a large supply of
Ensure.  We have no idea of the significance of this connection, as
there are many plausible explanations for the presence of Ensure at
both locations.
The special effects, however, are excellent, as you would expect from
George Lucas's Industrial Light and Magic.  The big wave is probably
the best part of the whole film, although whoever decided to show the
head of the Statue of Liberty floating underwater should really get a
slap.  You know, every time there's a disaster movie involving New
York City, they've got to put in the head of the Statue of Liberty
breaking off, or buried in debris, or floating in the water, like it
was the first time anybody's done it.  Please.

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
METEOR THREAT SET TO BLOW AWAY ALL VOLCANOES & TWISTERS!
Summer is here again! This season could probably be the most ambitious =
season this decade with Hollywood churning out films like DEEP IMPACT, =
GODZILLA, THE X-FILES, ARMAGEDDON, THE TRUMAN SHOW, all of which has but =
one main aim, to rock the box office. Leading the pack this summer is =
DEEP IMPACT, one of the first few film releases from the =
Spielberg-Katzenberg-Geffen's Dreamworks production company. Following =
the rather dismal showing of their previous two releases; MOUSEHUNT and =
AMISTAD, DEEP IMPACT shines with elements which could just make it one =
of the biggest movies of the year.
DEEP IMPACT begins with the discovery of an Earth bound comet during a =
school astronomy outing by Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood) which =
subsequently stirred up the political community of the world. Keeping =
the information under wraps to prevent widespread panic, President Beck =
(Morgan Freeman) took it upon himself and his subordinates to execute a =
highly secretive space project to destroy the comet before it hits =
earth. While pursuing a sex-scandal story amongst the presidential =
ranks, ambitious up and coming reporter, Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) =
unfolds the wool that President Beck has pulled over the citizens of the =
world. As if the knowledge of the imminent annihilation of mankind is =
not enough, Jenny has to come to terms with her father (Maximillian =
Schell) leaving the mother for a younger woman.=20
President Beck announces the discovery and preparations to destroy the =
comet exactly one-year later, with so much confidence that it left no =
trace of panic within the American community. Achieving fame from =
announcement of the comet Wolf-Beiderman en-route to Earth (the name of =
its discoverers), Leo Beiderman continues life in his small town as a =
young celebrity. A team of astronauts, led by the ageing veteran =
astronaut Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall), was secretly trained to carry =
out the mission to land on the comet and create and explosion with a =
nuclear device, with the hope of blowing it out of its current path =
towards Earth. Despite him being the most experienced in the team, the =
younger generation of astronauts in the team doubts Tanner's ability due =
to his age. But these are just problems of individuals. Life on Earth =
goes on as any other day, confident that the comet will be destroyed.
When the attempt to avert Wolf-Beiderman's path failed and caused the =
comet to split into two: Comet Wolf and Comet Beiderman, the President =
unfolds his contingency plan to evacuate part of the population, leaving =
the rest to die. Citizens are randomly chosen to live underground for 2 =
years prior to impact, when the dust due to the impact around earth have =
settled, by then all life on the surface would have died. Jenny and Leo =
were picked but many of their loved ones were not, only a handful of =
Earth's population will be saved from destruction. =20
DEEP IMPACT's moving moments occur in the least special-effect laced =
scenes. While the effects are fantastic, they only form a small part of =
the film, which indulges itself in the development of its main =
characters; Leo, Lerner and Tanner. Leo's struggle when he learns that =
his girlfriend is not part of the population to be saved, Lerner's =
dwindling relationship with her father and her pain for the mother's =
loneliness, Tanner's strive to gain the respect he deserves from his =
crew and his ultimate sacrifice, all form the backbone of DEEP IMPACT's =
moving moments. DEEP IMPACT smells suspiciously like the previous year =
release CONTACT despite vivid differences. I think its probably because =
they both delve in a story of global proportions and indulges in the =
premise of hope, faith and life itself. Both do not depend heavily on =
eye-candy in the form of CGI effects.  Director Mimi Leder (who won =
numerous awards directing television series, and made her debut with =
PEACEKEEPER last year) is definitely a director to watch.=20
Despite this being the first of the two meteor movies this summer (the =
other being ARMAGEDDON), I think there will be stark differences in the =
approach to the subject matter. While the premise of both may be the =
same, execution and focus of the films will in fact show that DEEP =
IMPACT has more focus on human elements than ARMAGEDDON, which is done =
by the team which brought us BAD BOYS, CRIMSON TIDE and THE ROCK. =20
DEEP IMPACT should be able to satisfy a variety of audiences; from the =
most action-craving to those who just want to immerse into its =
manipulative but nonetheless dramatic premise.

Author
Ron Strong
PARAMOUNT PICTURES & DREAMWORKS SKG presents a Zanuck/Brown Production
of a Mimi Leder Film "DEEP IMPACT" Robert Duvall, Tia Leoni, Elijah
Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Leelee Sobieski and Morgan Freeman. Cinematography by
Dietrich Lohmann,
Original Score by James Horner, Production Design by Leslie Dilley,
Edited by Paul Cichocki &
David Rosenbloom, Associate Producer:  D. Scott Easton, Executive
Producers:  Steven Spielberg,
Walter F. Parkes, Joan Bradshaw,  Produced by:  Richard D. Zanuck ,
David Brown,
Screenplay by Bruce Joel Rubin & Michael Tolkin  Directed by  Mimi Leder
It's summer again. It's only obvious in that this is the time of year
when the studios pull out their big, effects laden productions and
attempt to coerce every young adult and teenager into a movie theater
for two hours of escapism. What's the big deal? Well, with the film
'Deep Impact' we have a combination effort, something that is at once a
big splashy effects picture and an emotional human drama. Unfortunately,
for those under the age of 17. The film deals with issues and ideas that
most young people could not concern themselves with.
On a dark night, a group of high school students are gathered on a
hillside stargazing for a science project. Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood)
spots something out of the ordinary and nonchalantly decides to send
along the information to Astrology researcher, Professor Wolf (Bob
Balaban). That information is identified as a comet, the size of New
York City (7 miles) which is on a collision course with Earth.
Continuing the story, Lenny Lerner (Tia Leoni), a struggling field
reporter for the MS/NBC cable news network; is chasing after a story
about the possible infidelities of Press Secretary Alan Rittenhouse
(James Cromwell). Lenny has received information through various sources
in Washington leading her to believe that the Press Secretary is having
an affair with a woman named Eli. Confronting Mr. Rittenhouse at his
boat (where he seems to be stockpiling supplies), Lenny questions him
about his affair. The confrontation leads Lenny to believe that she is
on the right track. It is at that moment that she is detained by the
secret service. She is taken to the White House, where she is question
as to what she knows of Eli. Realizing that she may be misunderstanding
the situation, Lenny researches the name Eli. She finally discovers that
it is an anagram for "Extinction Level Impact".
As stated at the top of this article, 'Deep Impact' is a unique film for
this time of year. Usually, films of this nature carry very little
weight story-wise. These films are usually high concept projects with
quick payoffs and predictable situations ('Daylight', 'Independence
Day', 'Volcano', etc.). While these films are entertaining in their own
right, you don't really expect anything in the way of depth from them.
This is what makes 'Deep Impact' so compelling and so disappointing. The
film takes time to develop its situation and it's characters. There is
an honest attempt at character depth here that is refreshing.
Nevertheless, at the same time, there is not enough. This film would
work better if it had an extra 30 minutes tagged onto it. Enough to give
us a chance to get to know all of these diverse individuals.
The performances in the film are nothing special, although Tia Leoni
deserves recognition for her fine turn as Reporter Lenny Lerner. She
gives us a solid view of a woman isolated from human contact and
consumed by her career until disaster strikes. Her drive and hard work
are rewarded, to the point of survival. The choices Lenny makes give the
character a marvelous arc and makes her the most believable portrayal in
the film.
Robert Duvall is always a joy to watch. His, Spurgeon Tanner, a retired
NASA astronaut and last man to walk on the moon, is a man who has
nothing else to live for. His wife has passed away; his sons are
essentially estranged from him. Tanner has only one thing left in his
life and that is his accomplishments. Taking the mission to attempt to
save the Earth, is a call to arms. A military man all of his life,
Tanner will risk his life to perform his duty. Moreover, he does it as a
testament to his wife.
The other performances in the film are all acceptable in their
individual performances. Maximilian Schell as Lenny's father Jason
Lerner, probably fairs worse in the film, as we are never really given a
chance to know the character. Morgan Freeman makes the most believable
On-Screen President since Ralph Bellamy in 'Sunrise at Capbobello'.
Vanessa Redgrave has a marvelous turn as Robin Lerner, recently divorced
and alone. Her portrayal of a woman unable to cope with her loneliness
is both pitiful and painful. The surprise performance of the film is
newcomer Leelee Sobieski as Sarah Hotchner. Her naturalness and depth of
emotion belay her mere 15 years of life. This is a young talent to
watch. While some have unflatteringly referred to her as Helen Hunt Jr.
(due to a slight resemblance), it's would be a shame if her ability was
neglected simply due to her physical traits.
The screenplay by noted writers Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin is
one of the most intelligent in recent years. Events are not telegraphed
as much as they are inevitable. There are serious attempts here to raise
the level of believability in the script. Logic prevails in all of the
situations. There are no heroic moments without cost. There is no
sacrifice without pain. No salvation without loss. This is the
antithesis of action films, and it is a welcome relief.
Mimi Leder handles the film well enough. There are moments, that have a
television drama look to them, little flourishes that almost get in the
way of the drama. This is not problematic, just distracting. Ms. Leder
shows real talent in handling her actors. Every performance is keyed to
a fine note.
This brings up the disappointing part of the whole enterprise. Also,
with so many characters and sub plots, the film has the same disjointed
feel of every other dissater epic. There are also moments when knowing
asides are used as comic relief. This has the effect of diminishing the
drama. While a little humor would be acceptable, lines such as "Don't
worry so much, it's not the end of the world." are just too noticeable.
In addition, some of the emotional grandstanding towards the climax of
the film rings false. It's just a little too maudlin for it's own good.
This also brings up the Lenny's final acceptance of her fate. It's
developed so quickly that it doesn't ring true.
'Deep Impact' is a fine film, and one that may linger in memory longer
that one would expect. There are moments, which are emotionally
powerful. Moreover, there are political ideas brought to fore that are
uncomfortable. It's flaws, while not as cumbersome as other films, are
still distracting.
On a scale from * to *****, 'Deep Impact' rates ***=.
Copyright ) 1998 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed with the expressed
written permission of the author.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The 1990's will be remembered in twenty-first century film schools as
the Decade of the Digital Disaster.  This is the time when new advances
in computer graphics and modeling are leading to... well, not bigger and
better movies, but bigger and better explosions, anyway.  Like any good
group of little boys, the disaster moviemakers are using their powerful
new tools to take things apart and blow them up.  Want to see the White
House explode by an alien attack?  Want to see a great green atomic
lizard flatten New York skyscrapers?  Want to see a giant tidal wave
wash away the Brooklyn Bridge?  You want it, the CGI boys can do it.
(Although God knows why they're so hard on New York.)
But it's one thing to have these new toys, and quite another to make
good movies with them.  Snappy computer graphics can't save movies
without believable storylines or interesting characters -- case in
point:  Alex Proyas's Dark City -- while the same quality graphics
integrated with classy acting and writing (and all the other things that
Titanic had going for it) can make a movie magical.
Somewhere right in the middle is Deep Impact.  The graphics quality is
first-rate, although most of it is at the end of the movie, and the
filmmakers wisely limit the scenes of death and devastation.  Deep
Impact takes the road less traveled in disaster genre movies, choosing
to focus on people and their relationships instead of action and
suspense.  While other movies have concentrated on the wholesale
destruction of landmarks and cities, Deep Impact saves much of its
concern for the destruction of families and friendships.  While it's
possible to sit back, munching popcorn, contemplating the destruction of
a digital Manhattan with an awed "Cool," there's something moving about
the ending of human relationships, no matter how badly or inexpertly
handled.
The problem with Deep Impact isn't the genuinely touching and wrenching
moments, easily the best part of the movie.  The moments and the
emotions would be there no matter how well the movie was written.  The
problem is that the people we follow throughout the movie almost seem to
be chosen at random: the crew of the space vessel sent to stop the
comet, the family of the teenage astronomer who discovers the comet, the
MSNBC news team who follows the story:  The end result is something
reminiscent of Tim Burton's Mars Attacks!, another end-of-the-world epic
with a large and unwieldy ensemble cast.  (Any other similarity is
incidental, Deep Impact is nothing if not sincere, and levity is sorely
lacking.)  And by picking a large number of ordinary people to suffer
through the end of the world, what you get is a very ordinary movie.
It doesn't really help that almost everyone in the movie is a refugee
from NBC's Thursday night lineup.  (It certainly doesn't help that the
MSNBC network is referenced at every conceivable point.)  Most notably,
you have Tea Leoni (The Naked Truth), a gifted comic actor who looks
woefully stiff and out of place behind the anchor desk.  Throw in Bruce
Weitz (Hill Street Blues) and Laura Innes (ER) on the news team, and Ron
Eldard (ER), Blair Underwood (L.A. Law) and Jon Favreau (Friends) aboard
the oddly-named Messiah spacecraft, and what you have is a Must See
TV-Movie.
The two leads are, thankfully, America's Greatest Actor -- Morgan
Freeman -- and Robert Duvall, who's not that far behind.  Unfortunately
-- and this is a chronic complaint of mine -- neither of them are given
enough to do.  Freeman is the President, but (outside of an early
conflict with Leoni) he is never seen doing anything Presidential.  He
is the oracle, the narrator, providing reassurance, oratory, and plot
points.  Which is fine, and he's great, but it's not enough.  On the
other hand, Duvall is at the heart of the action, aboard the spacecraft,
and he is -- Chuck Yeager!  Yes!  Supercool, lollygagging around up
there in outer space, the sole standard-bearer for Tom Wolfe's righteous
stuff, all ready for the next comet landing or spark plug commercial...
and it's a mold that he never breaks out of.  I suppose parts like this
are the price that Duvall -- and the rest of us -- have to pay for the
privilege of movies like The Apostle, so I won't comment too severely on
his choice of scripts.
The one thing I took out of the theater from Deep Impact was the
sterling quality of the THX system in Austin's Lincoln 6 theater.
Whenever the camera pans past the comet in space, the THX emits this
rumble that made the walls shake -- sort of like a low-level
Sensurround.  (Never mind that real comets couldn't possibly make that
rumble in the soundless vacuum of outer space.)  Despite the movie's
refreshing attention to relationships over explosions (there's only one
completely mindless and extraneous explosion, early in the film), when
the standout part of the movie is the sound system, something's
missing.  There's a lot missing from Deep Impact, a perfectly ordinary
and middle-of-the-road disaster flick in every regard.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Author
Kevin Patterson
Since Hollywood has gone through tornadoes, volcanoes, sinking ships, and
exploding buses in recent years, I suppose it was only natural that the realm
of disaster movies would extend into the realm of destruction by space garbage
before too long. Accordingly, this summer we get DEEP IMPACT, in which a 7-1/
2-mile wide comet is on a collision course with Earth, and ARMAGEDDON, in
which an asteroid the size of Texas is, well, on a collision course with
Earth. The creative forces behind DEEP IMPACT have stressed that theirs is a
film about how human relationships and decisions are affected by the possibly
impending disaster, as opposed to the apparently more action-driven
ARMAGEDDON.
They are partly right. A team of astronauts, led by Capt. Sturgeon Tanner
(Robert Duvall) is dispatched to destroy the comet, but I'd say that at least
70% of the movie takes place on Earth, where the President (Morgan Freeman) is
trying to develop contingency plans in case the disaster can't be averted,
among them a national lottery in which 1 million Americans are chosen to live
underground for two years while the dust will settle. Meanwhile, we follow
several other characters as they try to deal with the possibly impending
destruction, such as the star reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), who is still
constantly struggling to get along with her father, and two teenage
sweethearts, one of whom has been chosen in the lottery and the other who has
not. The astronauts manage to break the comet into two pieces, leaving several
possibilities: (a) no disaster will strike at all, if land-based missile
defense systems can deflect the comet pieces; (b) the smaller piece will land
in the ocean, causing 100-foot tidal waves to destroy shoreline areas but
allowing most of the planet to survive; (c) both pieces hit the earth, wiping
out all plant, animal, and human life. (Hint: which do you think would allow
for both a happy ending and an extended special-effects destruction sequence?)
The problem is that the more action/disaster-oriented sequences are actually
the ones that are the most effective. The astronauts' tense and ultimately
botched comet-walk and the tidal wave's decapitation of the Statue of Liberty
as it topples New York City skyscrapers pointedly illustrate the fragile
nature of human existence, and the astronauts' painful goodbyes to their
families via NASA satellite when they decide to make a last-ditch suicide run
at the larger comet piece is heroic enough to jerk a few tears from the
audience. But the only scene involving the drama unfolding on Earth that can
match any of those mentioned above is the one in which armed military vehicles
pour through suburban streets to escort one of the "chosen" families to the
underground caves. The "impact" of the other moments of human drama is, I'm
afraid to say, rather shallow.
Part of the reason for this is that there just a few too many things going on
at once in DEEP IMPACT. Towards the beginning, it almost seems like it's going
to turn into a black-comic media satire. When the President first breaks the
news about the comet, for example, we see a TV newsroom where reporters are
scrambling and shouting things like, "Where the hell is the Science Division?"
and "Does anyone know how big the one was that killed the dinosaurs?"
Meanwhile, one of the two teenagers, who helped to discover the comet, is
encouraged by a classmate, "You're going to have a lot more sex now that
you're famous. That's the best reason to be famous, you know."
This angle soon fades into the background, however, and once the inital comet-
walk is over, the screenplay's focus shifts to the quandaries of the various
characters. Unfortunately, the film doesn't spend enough time to develop them
in much depth and just skips to the crying scenes. We appreciate these scenes
intellectually, but we don't really feel for the characters because we don't
know them very well. James Cameron, in writing and directing TITANIC, knew
that the audience needed to get to know his characters as normal people before
he sent them running down corridors filled with freezing water. In DEEP
IMPACT, we see the teenagers discovering the comet and pondering their future
in light of the lottery, and we see Leoni, who has also been selected, trying
one last time to reconcile with her possibly doomed father and delivering news
reports about the comet, but we never see how they would behave in everyday
situations.
The plot, meanwhile, is a bit skimpy, and as a result it has holes big enough
for a 7-1/2-mile wide comet to fly through. I'm still not sure what was the
point of a car accident which occurred at the start of the movie: we are led
to believe that important information about the comet was lost in the crash,
but later we learn that it was recovered completely intact. Also, why wouldn't
the world's governments build more than one spaceship in case the first crew's
mission failed? I realize it's expensive, but even Washington budget-cutters
could probably be convinced to spare a few bucks for averting the end of the
world. And why didn't the astronauts land on the comet more than an hour
before sunrise would turn the thing into an outer-space mine field? The script
also leaves some plot points unclear, such as what exactly is the problem with
the missile defense, and whether or not the President had intended to take a
spot in the underground bunkers.
Perhaps the biggest sin of DEEP IMPACT, however, is that it pulls some of its
punches. There are reports of street fighting in Russia, and it looks towards
the end as if a neighborhood has been looted, but we never actually see any of
this happen. At the end, the President tells us that "millions have been
lost," but rather than show us the aftermath of the devastation, Leder decides
to give us some applause and flag-waving at the President's promise of
rebuilding and renewal. I had hoped the film might examine some of these
issues more directly, particularly given the screenplay credit to Michael
Tolkin, who showed in his 1991 film THE RAPTURE that he has a pretty good idea
how crazy some people can get when they think the end of the world is right
around the corner. DEEP IMPACT, however, seems content to show us news reports
of pre-apocalyptic hysteria rather than the real thing.
DEEP IMPACT makes a noble effort at telling a more human story than most big-
budget Hollywood disaster flicks, and for that it is to be commended. What it
would be like if a comet really was about to hit the earth, however, remains
to be seen. Or filmed, as the case may be.
Send comments and suggestions to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page: http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Martijn van Turnhout
Geregisseerd door Mimi Leder. 
Geschreven door Michael Tolkin en Bruce Joel Rubin. 
Speeltijd: 115 minuten.
Dat kometenfilms tegenwoordig in zijn, is duidelijk. Na "Deep Impact"
kunnen we "Armageddon" verwachten, een actiefilm die z'n weerga niet
kent. Beiden gaan over een komeet die de aarde bedreigt. "Deep Impact"
wil het serieus aanpakken, terwijl "Armageddon" puur vermaak is. Hoe dan
ook, de hele mensheid staat waarschijnlijk te popelen om deze films te
kunnen zien. 
Bij toeval ontdekt MSNBC-reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) dat de
Amerikaanse minister van Economie aftreedt vanwege ene 'Ellie'.
Lerner, die een schandaal ruikt, gaat op onderzoek uit. Ze ontdekt dat
het niet om een mens, maar om een E.L.E. gaat. E.L.E. betekent
Extinction Level Event, een gebeurtenis die zo gevaarlijk is dat
het het leven op aarde bedreigt. 
Al snel maakt de Amerikaanse president Tom Beck (Morgan Freeman) bekend
dat er een komeet op de aarde afstormt. Gelukkig zijn er al
de nodige maatregelen genomen: er zijn tunnels aangelegd waarin
iin miljoen Amerikanen kunnen schuilen en ook is er al een ruimteschip
gebouwd: de Messias. De crew van de Messias moet naar de 
komeet vliegen en daar een aantal bommen plaatsen.
Zo gezegd, zo gedaan. Helaas gaat het mis bij het plaatsen van de
explosieven. Een paar astronauten raken gewond en de bommen blijken niet
krachtig genoeg te zijn, waardoor de komeet zich in tweekn opsplitst. De
crew heeft nu een groot probleem, want ze hebben niet genoeg brandstof
om op de kometen te landen, de overgebleven bommen te plaatsen en weer
terug naar de aarde te vliegen.
"Deep Impact" heeft heel veel te bieden. Een goede cast (vooral Freeman
en Duvall zijn in topvorm), prachtige special effects en professionele
regie. Mimi Leder weet de emotionele en actievolle scenes goed te
combineren. Helaas gaat het op het einde mis. Zonder veel te verklappen,
kan ik wel zeggen dat de film een grote anti-climax heeft. Jammer, want
3/4 van de film kun je geslaagd noemen.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        There's a 1,000-foot tidal wave at the end of DEEP IMPACT. I'd 
say it pretty accurately represents the towering flood of the last two 
years worth of disaster movies, which are getting more Irwin Allen-
esque with every release. The early wave of this revival, while just as 
cheesy and laughable, at least knew to include thrills every five to ten 
minutes. DEEP IMPACT tries to disguise itself as a human drama, with 
endless filler comprised of disaster prevention plans the country keeps 
taking.
        The repeating cycle is as follows -- the president (Morgan 
Freeman) will go on TV and tell the country that there's a remote 
chance a comet will strike the earth, but that the nation's crack 
scientists and astronauts have some brilliant plan to stop the problem. 
Then we get to see the plan in action, in some sequence utterly lacking 
suspense. The mission will barely fail, and Freeman will tell the 
country that the comet is still headed toward Earth, and there's a 
remote chance it will strike, but that the nation's crack scientists and 
astronauts have some brilliant plan to stop the problem.
        It goes on and on throughout the movie, but every time 
Freeman goes on TV, we know his plan is going to fail. How do we 
know this? Because we've seen the TV ads for DEEP IMPACT, ads that 
feature Freeman telling the nation that "the comet is still headed right 
for us" and show disaster shots of the comet striking Earth and the 
giant tidal wave spreading. Ladies and gentlemen, that is the movie. 
Successful disaster movies have the main disaster toward the 
beginning and more little disasters that follow, but DEEP IMPACT saves 
its one disaster for the end and discloses all in its 30-second TV spots.
        Television is what's wrong with DEEP IMPACT. The main 
character, played by Tea Leoni, is a low-level broadcast journalist for 
MSNBC (and that's the mere tip of the product-placement iceberg) 
who stumbles upon a huge government conspiracy. She thinks it's an 
instance of an ex-Secretary of Something or Other (James Cromwell) 
resigning because of a mistress, and that maybe he took the fall for the 
president in the same area. When she goes nosing around Cromwell, 
he begs her to keep it under wraps. "I know you're just a reporter, but 
you used to be a human being."
        She figures out what's really going on after getting roughed 
up by some FBI men and doing an Internet search, where all good 
journalists learn the difference between a mistress and an extinction-
level comet. Upon a top-secret meeting with President Freeman, Leoni 
agrees to keep the story under wraps until the president can hold a 
press conference, at which she gets to ask the first question. And 
everyone knows, if you get to ask the first question, baby you're a star.
        Leoni ends up in the anchor chair, broadcasting every step of 
the comet's collision course with Earth. And I'm sure it's comforting 
for her to know that, even though the world's ending in a matter of 
months, she's a cable news personality. So there she is, narrating the 
six-astronaut mission to blow the comet up. Such personalities as 
Robert Duvall, Jon Favreau and Blair Underwood cash their paychecks 
and go through the motions of this dragged-out process.
        But as anyone who's seen the commercials knows, the 
astronauts fail. They only end up breaking the comet into two pieces, 
which means even more destruction to the Earth. Yeah, thanks, 
NASA. That's when Freeman has to come on TV for the last time and 
say goodbye to all the people who aren't picked to live in the Missouri 
cave site for two years. They even have animals, two by two, ready to 
climb into the cave. If the focus had been on people living inside these 
caves after the world had been destroyed, DEEP IMPACT could have 
been a far more interesting movie.
        Instead we watch as a lovestruck Elijah Wood defies all odds 
to chase down his young wife, while people pack the highways out of 
town. The reasoning is, of course, that if a comet is going to strike, 
they might as well be out in some scenic rural location. And, 
amusingly, the highway is spotted with people in U-Haul trucks. I'm 
sure it's comforting to know that, even though the world's ending in a 
matter of minutes, the U-Haul people are doing the most business of 
their lives.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Author
Scott Renshaw
DEEP IMPACT
(Paramount/DreamWorks)
Starring:  Tea Leoni, Robert Duvall, Morgan Freeman, Elijah Wood, Leelee
Sobieski, Vanessa Redgrave, Maximilian Schell.
Screenplay:  Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin.
Producers:  Richard D. Zanuck and David Brown.
Director:  Mimi Leder.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, intense scenes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If ever a film begged -- nay _pleaded_ -- to be a mini-series, that
film is DEEP IMPACT.  The first of this year's Large Celestial Object on a
Collision Course with Earth films (soon to be followed by ARMAGEDDON)
begins with the discovery of a comet which appears to be heading straight
for us.  Flash forward a year to an ambitious young MSNBC reporter named
Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) who stumbles onto the story which the government
has kept under wraps for fear of causing a panic.  The President of the
United States (Morgan Freeman) finally makes the comet's existence public
at the same time he announces a plan to send an experimental spacecraft
called the Messiah on a mission to deflect the comet from its trajectory.
Flash forward another few months to the Messiah crew, including retired
astronaut Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall) completing their mission with
less than ideal success.  Flash forward another few months as a plan to
save humanity by hiding a million people in underground caves is set in
motion.
     That's enough flashing to give you the disorienting sensation of
sitting through a cinematic strobe light.  DEEP IMPACT wants to be a
heroic disaster epic, examining the effect of impending devastation on
individual people and their relationships, but that can only happen if we
get to know the characters a little.  Every one of DEEP IMPACT's sub-plots
feels forced into a chunk of time far too small to do it justice.  The
central romance, involving a pair of high school sweethearts (Elijah Wood
and Leelee Sobieski), makes the leap from tentative hand-holding to
marriage without a single moment of conversation between them, deadening
every supposedly emotional scene.  Leoni's problems with her divorced
parents (Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian Schell) and the interpersonal
dynamics of the Messiah crew members suffer a similar fate, straining for
an audience response strictly on the basis of composer James Horner's
over-wrought orchestrations.  In fact, it often seems as though every bit
of character interaction has been edited out of DEEP IMPACT except the
tear-filled separations and reunions, leaving little more than a hollow
succession of musical cues.
     That may not be a tremendous surprise when you're dealing with a
big-budget disaster film.  What should come as a surprise is DEEP IMPACT's
disappointing lack of visual energy.  This is one sedate blockbuster,
offering one invigorating set piece of the Messiah mission before settling
into a dull march towards five minutes of destruction.  Every other
opportunity to dazzle is either turned into exposition or ignored
entirely.  The comet's separation into two fragments is explained by the
President using a simple computer graphic, but never depicted; ditto for
an attempted missile strike on the comet.  We never even get to see the
massive underground Ark after a huge narrative build-up.  DEEP IMPACT is
so bereft of spectacle and detail that it's never possible to grasp the
immensity of the impending tragedy, or watch a year of mounting dread
unfold.  In fact, I can't imagine a more absurdly optimistic portrayal of
human reaction to the coming Apocalypse, with the isolated traffic jam and
a few fires being the only intrusion on a general response of beatific
acceptance.  It may be the end of the world as they know it, but they feel
fine.
     DEEP IMPACT boasts such a talented cast -- Duvall, Freeman, Redgrave,
Schell, Charles Martin Smith, James Cromwell -- that occasionally it feels
weightier than the script deserves.  Mimi Leder's direction also offers a
few effective moments, including a montage of reaction shots which
provides more insight than all the dialogue combined.  Most of the time,
however, DEEP IMPACT feels like six hours of raw footage hacked to ribbons
to meet the imperatives of feature film length.  It's not exactly a bad
film; it's just about one-third of an acceptably engrossing one.  If you
want to do justice to an Extinction Level Event, you need the 366 minutes
of 1994's television adaptation of Stephen King's THE STAND.  DEEP
IMPACT's 115 minutes manage to turn a comet strike into a moderate
inconvenience.

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: ** (out of 4 = fair/below average)
Starring: Téa Leoni (Jenny Lerner), Morgan Freeman (President Beck), Robert
 Duvall (Spurgeon Turner), Elijah Wood (Leo Biederman); written by Bruce Joel
 Rubin, Michael Tolkin; produced by David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck; directed by
 Mimi Leder.
Seen May 17, 1998 at 11:45 a.m. at Rotterdam Square Mall Cinemas, theater #6,
 with my brother John, for free using my Sony/Lowes critic's pass. [Theater
 rating: ***: good picture and sound, average seats]
        Critics have been quick to judge the current trend of films about grand-scale
 disaster as pure eye candy, and for the most part they're right. However,
 "disaster" is somewhat of a misnomer as the type of films aren't so much about
 the cataclysmic events themselves as they are about people banding together
 because of a threat. This is a concept that could, in theory, combine action
 and drama perfectly, and "Deep Impact" is the latest mega-budget event movie
 of the sort which tries its hardest to be completely plausible, but in turn
 detracts from the fantasy of it all. 
        There's no denying we want to be excited and intrigued by movies right from
 the get-go, and this film realizes that notion and exploits it through one of
 the most pathetic excuses for tension ever produced. We start off with a high
 school astronomy club in Arizona where a boy named Leo Biederman (Wood) has
 unknowingly discovered a comet. When his pictures are sent to a professional
 observatory, the scientist there realizes the comet is on a collision course
 with Earth. Of course it takes a lot of high-tech computers to calculate this
 within seconds, but somehow the same computers can't log on to the Internet so
 the scientist can warn the world. If that had not already been a sign of the
 sheer cheesiness to the film, the script uses bottom-of-the-barrel cliches to
 "remove" the scientist and make for a sense of danger about as frightening as
 film is plausible.
        Incorporating the modern, massive news media is becoming an ever-increasing
 Hollywood trend and when used properly it can provide for a sense of reality.
 The film goes about establishing reality by using a popular broadcast
 journalist, Jenny Lerner (Leoni), as one of its main characters. Lerner is a
 typical character who plays an important role when she uncovers a news story
 involving the resignation of a Cabinet member which is secretly related to the
 government's discovery of the comet. Lerner seems to be the only reporter for
 MSNBC (which the film would have us believe is the only broadcast media), and
 is told she's stumbled onto something big. Meanwhile, she's having a personal
 crisis as her old divorced mother is depressed at her father's marriage to a
 much younger woman. All of this is generic to the extreme, especially as
 executed through Leoni's bland performance and scene after scene of pointless
 confrontations which would be right at home on "Melrose Place."
        Had the film begun at the second act it would not have been hindered at all.
 It takes at least 45 minutes for the aspect of the comet collision to come
 into play and thus create for some semblance of plot and conflict. The mid-
 section of the film suddenly becomes a series of interactions between
 supporting characters with an effort at tension thrown into the mix. Morgan
 Freeman co-stars as President Beck, who informs the world, and thus us the
 viewers, what the situation is and how it will be resolved. Freeman is great
 actor, but even he cannot create for the kind of suspense the film intends to
 build through philosophical lines and speeches and overly dramatic shots.
 Another great actor, Robert Duvall, co-stars as Spurgeon "Fish" Turner, the
 eldest member of a space crew sent to knock the comet off course, and yet he
 too seems silly trying to recite campy dialogue.
        Soon the focus shifts from any kind of a general plot to individual conflicts
 between the characters and the mission to save the world. Through both of
 these aspects it becomes more and more clear the attempts at intelligent
 storytelling have been exhausted. Needless to say, Turner's crew doesn't
 succeed on its mission (or else the film would have ended after an hour), and
 proceeds to make things worse. It's all downhill from there with as the
 characters are put through the meat grinder in an attempt to create for
 suspense which only comes across as melodrama (and poorly-written melodrama at
 that). It's difficult to feel sorry for them since they're so generic, not to
 mention how sloppy the script is in its attempt to balance the story.
        The last act clinches this idea as it seems like the world really will come
 to an end and yet none of the characters seem worried about it. The attitude
 is so apathetic that it asks us to sympathize with the characters who see
 confronting the impending apocalypse head-on as an honorable notion. The
 script conviently provides for the massive special effects disaster imagery it
 promises and a climatic resolution, but still fails to work even as eye candy
 as it's very unconvincing and ends much too quickly.
        Perhaps "Deep Impact" would have worked as a television mini-series as it
 tries to squeeze so much into such little time and space. It's no wonder story
 and character flaws and massive continuity errors take the place of drama and
 suspense.


Author
Matthew DeMizio
Deep Impact (1998)
IMDB: http://us.imdb.com/Title?Deep+Impact+(1998)
This film had me worked up for weeks in preparation.  "Morgan Freeman
as President - brilliant casting decision!"  "Ooh...those effects look
great!"  "I haven't seen this plot before!"
Meanwhile the forces that be were dictating that this would be yet
another formula thriller trying desperately to reach at the viewers'
heart until the moment of great letdown.  For that's what this was:
Another formula action picture that couldn't decide whether it wanted
to be a deep sympathetic drama or a spectacular, Independence Day,
effects blast.  In the end, it grazed both sides, but never made it to
either.
The winding plot begins by showing a young astronomer (Elijah Wood)
discovering a new comet in his high-school astronomy club.
Fast-forward 10 years and we find a reporter for MSNBC (Téa Leoni)
trying to break through into the broadcast chair.  She stumbles onto
word of a vague, conspiracy-type story, and wants to break it to the
world.  We learn that the government has known about the comet for
some time.  They also know that the comet will crash into the earth
within a few years.  Of course, they've been planning for the impact
for some time.  They've dug huge caves that can withstand the impact
and house survivors for 2 years, in which time the earth will recover.
Only there's only enough room in the caves for 2 million people.  The
rest of the movie is spent watching the impact of the comet and the
implications it holds for all the characters.
I know that I'm missing something here, but there's no way I could
tell it all without giving away the entire movie.  There are some
astronauts (one brilliantly played by Robert Duvall) and a love story
and some childhood wrongs finally righted...
There lies one of the major problems of the movie: It knows that it
has to do everything, and it tries.  Only it can't do it in its 2-hour
time span.  Questions about many of the characters remain - "Why?
How?  Huh?" 
There are a few bright spots - Robert Duvall gives a pretty good
performance as the captain of a space mission to try and deflect the
comet.  He comes across as a genuine guy - The Great Santini flying
high in space.  Morgan Freeman also gives a spectacular, but brief
performance as the President.  If only he had more to do!  His
character portrayed the kind of politician I'd like in the office of
President.
The graphics are pretty good in this film too.  The shots of the comet
hitting, and the shots in space are well done.  The most memorable one
is from the end - a shot of the newly destroyed Capitol building.  It
was haunting.
Overall, this film was a good thriller for a Saturday night, but I
expected more from the commercials.  It has its moments, but overall,
"Deep Impact" was disappointing to me.  Do yourself a favor - save
your money from the tickets and rent this film when it comes out on
video.  You'll be a lot happier.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
It seems to work out pretty well, as long as you leave himbo Clooney off
of the big screen.  And let's not even get into the syllogism with
respect to movie titles:
Mercury Rising -> Deep Rising -> Deep Impact
All you need is something called Mercury Effect and you can toss in Zero
Effect and The Trigger Effect, too.  It sort of makes you long for
uniquely named films, like Schindler's Fist.
Despite the comparisons to similarly titled duds and the sky-high
expectations from its blue blood pedigree, pressure from the upcoming
Armageddon and $80 million budget, Deep Impact is surprisingly not like
a big summer event movie.  Though overly sappy and effect heavy, it
offers more than just the big gun, big explosion, big one-liner formula
that have been stinking up theaters summer after summer.
The premise is simple  an asteroid the size of New York City is headed
toward Earth, threatening global destruction and the eventual extinction
of all its inhabitants.  And no, the world isn't saved by an Apple
PowerBook or Slim Whitman records.
No doubt aided by a story culled from recent headlines, Deep Impact is
also set apart from the rest of the big budget schlock by tapping into
real human emotion.  Some of the heartstring tugging is a little too
much to handle, but if you're used to the weekly emotion manipulation
hour every Thursday night at 10:00 PM, it won't seem quite so painful.
I wonder if you can get an emotion callous?  I wonder how many times I
can use the word `emotion' in this paragraph?
Gung ho MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Leoni, The Naked Truth)
accidentally stumbles onto the asteroid story, thinking that she's
tracking down a lead about the marital infidelities of the newly
resigned Secretary of State, Allen Rittenhouse (James Cromwell, Babe).
Jenny doesn't even get suspicious when she watches Rittenhouse sail away
on a boat full of Ensure.  Once the story breaks, Jenny realizes that
she may finally get the big weekend anchor job, which had been
previously unobtainable because she's too much of a piece of ass.  At
least, that's the impression that I got.
The first half of the picture revolves around a crew of astronauts that
actually plan to land on the asteroid, fill it full of nukes and blow it
apart.  They take off on a craft called `The Messiah', which was
supposedly built secretly in space, while the government kept the story
from the unsuspecting public.  The crew, led by aging space-vet Spurgeon
Tanner (Duvall, The Apostle), is the last hope for all of humanity.
But, if they succeed, the film would only be about 70 minutes.
The second half takes place back on mother Earth, where the government
has built a elaborate series of underground caves (also secretly) to
hold 1,000,000 people and various plant and animal life for the two
years that the planet will be uninhabitable.  200,000 of the lucky
humans were `pre-selected' by the government.  Hopefully, its rolls
include TV's Linda Lavin, bowling great Earl Anthony and all of the MTV
veejays.
The most amazing and unbelievable part of the story is the glaring lack
of restrictions on the number of bags that one can carry into the
caves.  Despite the absence of such restraints, there are no guys trying
to sneak in jet skis, bowling trophies or comic book collections.  Yeah,
like that's going to happen in real life.
Instead of just going through the normal boring motions, Deep Impact
actually makes you think about what you would do in a similar
situation.  Do you go to work?  Do you `covet' your neighbor's wife?  Do
you put aluminum foil in the microwave or remove the tag from your
mattress?  Will Peter Jennings pull down his pants and scream
`Bababooey'?  Who knows, but while the rest of you have been exercising,
reading books and generally improving your lives, I've been stockpiling
videos for just such an emergency.  See how long you can take 24-hour
news coverage of a major event before you're looting the local
Blockbuster.  Don't come knocking on my door for a copy of Strange Days.
While implausible on both a scientific and a `regular Joe' level,
writers Michael Tolkin (The Player) and Bruce Joel Rubin (Jacob's
Ladder) stitch together a relatively cohesive story, big on drama and
remarkably light on huge effects (until the end).  Morgan Freeman stands
out from the ensemble cast as the emotionally wrought President Beck.
The haunting melodies of James Horner (Titanic) provide even more
ammunition to induce tears from teen-aged girls, and you can't really
ask much more from a movie than that.  Except maybe a good sex scene.
Or some karate.  Or vomiting.  *sigh*

Author
Christopher Null
     DEEP IMPACT makes no apologies for being a sob-fest.  I mean, how else
do you smash a comet into the earth without killing off a few hundred
million people, and breaking a few hearts in the process?  As the first
disaster-from-space film of the year, DEEP IMPACT sets the bar at an
interesting level.  It's not an action film, although it has action
elements.  It's not a thriller, although suspense is in the mix.  It's more
a drama than anything else, the main story lines being a reporter (Leoni)
estranged from her father, a young astronomer (Wood) who finds he can't
abandon his girlfriend, and a codgery astronaut (Duvall) who gains
acceptance among a younger crew.
     Against the backdrop of a giant comet en route to the planet, it's a
surprise that there are so many lulls in the story where there's little to
do but check your watch.  Still, ER veteran Leder directs the action with
sufficient flair to keep you interested and keep those Kleenex in action.
     I'm not immune.  Once you get past the urge to dismiss the whole
shebang as an unlikely bit of Hollywood trickery, there are so many
sacrifices in the film from so many characters... even a cynic like me can
get a bit teary-eyed.
     Overall, it's a refreshing change of pace from the big budget
extravangzas that Tinseltown regularly trots out.
Director: Mimi Leder
Producer: David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck
Writer: Bruce Joel Rubin, Michael Tolkin
Starring: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave, Morgan
Freeman, Maximilian Schell, James Cromwell, Ron Eldard, Jon Favreau, Laura
Innes, Mary McCormack
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Richard Scheib
USA. 1998. Director - Mimi Leder, Screenplay - Bruce Joel Rubin & 
Michael Tolkin, Producers - David Brown & Richard D. Zanuck, Photography 
- Dietrich Lohmann, Music - James Horner, Visual Effects - Industrial 
Light and Magic (Supervisors - Scott Farrar & Bill George), Special 
Effects Supervisor - Michael Lantieri, Production Design - Leslie 
Dilley. Production Company - Dreamworks SKG/Paramount.
Tea Leoni (Jenny Lerner), Robert Duvall (Captain Spurgeon `Fish' 
Tanner), Elijah Wood (Leo Beiderman), Morgan Freeman (President Beck), 
Maximilian Schell (Jason Lerner), Ron Eldard (Oren Monash), Vanessa 
Redgrave (Robin Lerner), Leelee Sobieski (Sarah Hotchner), Mary 
McCormack (Andrea Baker), Jon Favreau (Gus Partenza), Dougary Scott 
(Eric Vennekor), Laura Innes (Beth Stanley), James Cromwell (Alan 
Rittenhouse), Richard Schiff (Don Beiderman), Gary Werntz (Chuck 
Hotchner), Blair Underwood (Mark Simon), Charles Martin Smith (Marcus 
Wolf), Denise Crosby (Mrs Hotchner), Betsy Brantley (Ellen Beiderman)
Plot: Investigating what she thinks is a White House sex scandal, a 
junior tv reporter unwittingly uncovers government plans to avert a 
comet the size of New York City which is on a collision course with the 
Earth. As the comet nears, the President launches a manned mission to 
detonate nuclear warheads and deflect its path while holding a national 
lottery to select people to be placed in safety in giant underground 
shelters.
Every year studios seem, either by coincidence or a desire to outdo one 
another, to hit upon a particular theme all at once - in 1997 it was 
volcano movies, the year before big budget alien invasion films, and in 
1998 it is asteroid/meteor collision films what with this and 
`Armageddon'. Asteroid/meteor collision films have not fared 
particularly well in the past - remember `Meteor' (1979) and the dire 
`Asteroid' mini-series (1997), with only the largely forgotten tv movie 
`A Fire in the Sky' (1978) having been in any way watchable.
`Deep Impact' starts out giving some hope that it may reverse the trend. 
The script comes from Bruce Joel Rubin (who made two afterlife fantasies 
`Ghost' and `Jacob's Ladder' (both 1990) which both inserted some 
challengingly new ideas into traditional takes on afterlife themes) and 
Michael Tolkin (who wrote the intriguing `The Rapture' (1991) and the 
great `The Player' (1992)). The promising opening almost seems a sly dig 
at contemporary media obsession with Presidential scandal (even though 
the film was well into production before Monica Lewinsky was propelled 
from unknown office worker to household name) with a junior tv reporter 
thinking she has uncovered a juicy piece of White House 
scandal-mongering but instead finding she has accidentally uncovered 
plans to try and avert the disaster. This segues into a, if not 
scientifically believable, at least a quite exciting sequence involving 
a manned attempt to land on the comet.
And the climax of the film has some really good mass disaster effects 
sequences. Unfortunately bookended in between them the film falls 
completely apart. It wants to tell a poignant story about various 
characters as they meet the impending holocaust but the different dramas 
it raises - young Elijah Wood's decision to abandon his place in the 
survival shelter and go back for his girlfriend; Tea Leone's 
reconciliation with her estranged father after the suicide of her 
mother; aging shuttle pilot Robert Duvall coming to regard wounded 
commander Ron Eldard as the son he never had - have a melodramatic 
insipidity that is infuriating. And despite the film's two-hour length 
it only ever skates across the surface of these melodramas - for example 
one would have expected Wood's journey back to his girlfriend to have 
been one fraught with dramatic perils but all that one sees is him 
setting out and then just arriving back home. You sort of get the 
feeling you have wandered into a disaster movie that has been made by 
people who have watched too much `Barney' - a disaster movie filled with 
niceness and nobility and where no untoward sentiment ever encroaches. 
It almost becomes absurd in its saccharine treatment - looting and 
increased social disorder is mentioned as one of the effects of the 
impending holocaust but all that one ever sees of any of this is a big 
traffic jam on the highway; Vanessa Redgrave commits suicide but the 
film seems to almost deliberately avoid any mention of the actual words, 
it all takes place off-screen and is only ever alluded to. After the 
maddening banality of `Deep Impact', all that `Armageddon' really needed 
to do to become the better of 1998's two asteroid movies was simply to 
turn up.
(I don't know if it is just my perverted mind or what but for some 
reason whenever I heard the title of the film it kept making me think 
more of a 1970s porn film than a mega-budget disaster spectacle. You 
know:- "She couldn't find sexual satisfaction until she met Joe and 
discovered fourteen inches ... of `Deep Impact'.")


Author
Matt Williams
The first of the dueling disaster pics has hit!  Deep Impact has beat
its competitor, Armageddon, by nearly two months. Gunning to be the more
thoughtful of the two, Deep Impact does manage to deliver a few thrills,
but it is too detached to deliver much more.
The film opens with the discovery of the doomsday comet by an amateur
astronomy buff, Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood).  As if that weren't enough
bad luck, the movie proceeds to segue into a tragic act that has little
purpose and virtually no relation to the rest of the film.
But then things get rolling again as the film picks up the action one
year later. An MSNBC reporter, Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) has stumbled
upon the scoop of a lifetime. Thinking she is delving into yet another
Capitol Hill sex scandal, she blunders her way into unveiling the
government's secret preparations to avoid Armageddon.
President Beck (Morgan Freeman) has been working with the Russians to
build the largest spacecraft in history, the Messiah.  An international
team of astronauts and cosmonauts (Ron Eldard, Blair Underwood, Jon
Favreau, Mary McCormack, and Alexander Baluyev) are joined by Apollo
pilot Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall) in their mission to divert the
comet.
Of course, a disaster flick wouldn't be a disaster flick if it didn't
have the mandatory cross-society slice of life.  To that extent, we meet
Jenny's estranged parents (Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian Schell, no
less), and reunite with the now famous Biedermans, to see how various
families cope with the potential end of the world.
Watching Deep Impact, you get the feeling that you're being left out of
the loop.  There's some interesting information that's going on just
underneath the surface, but the film never quite lets you get a good
look.  Take the pre-apocalypse baby boom for example, or the riots and
civil unrest that accompany the harbinger of doom.  The movie presents
you with conclusions, but never explains the details of the argument.
It gives you a synopsis of events, but never makes you feel like you are
there.
The pool of talent definitely isn't lacking in the film.  However, when
you've got Freeman, Duvall, Redgrave and Schell in the background, Tea
Leoni and Elijah Wood can't quite compete.  To be fair, they do a decent
job, but are simply outclassed.
The character writing doesn't help them out that much, either.  To
further the plot, and raise suspense, several of the main characters in
the film are forced to make wincingly bad decisions.  These are
decisions that no sane man (and few crazy ones) would dare make.
At least the film has some good eye candy to divert your attention.  The
special effects are good, but not as awe inspiring as they should be.
That's probably the result of the recent glut of disaster pictures.
After seeing mass destruction in every other movie, one quickly develops
a blasi attitude.  Still, there are a few impressive scenes.
Overall, Deep Impact isn't by far a perfect disaster film, but it has
its entertaining moments.  It's nothing to rush out to see, but a good
way to pass the time during a matinee.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
David Wilcock
(DREAMWORKS SKG)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS
STARRING ROBERT DUVALL, TEA LEONI AND ELIJAH WOOD
DIRECTED BY MIMI LEDER
The first of the two asteroid movies coming out this year (the second is the
macho Armageddon) is actually a dull affair. Elijah Wood plays Leo
Biederman, who during Astronomy class discovers that a large asteroid is
heading for earth. Tea Leoni plays a (rather crap) news reporter, Jenny
Lerner, who soon discovers about this asteroid through a very long winded
and boring way, and Robert Duvall plays the leader of a space crew, Spurgeon
Tanner, who are planning to blow the asteroid out of the path of Earth. Also
featuring is Morgan Freeman as the President, and Maximilian Schell and
Vanessa Redgrave as Jenny's father and mother.
While many people will walk into the film expecting a big special effects
fest with the asteroid blowing everything up (as the trailers seem to
promise), the film is actually more of a character study, if a very poor
one.
The main problem is that there are too many characters in the film, and not
enough time to explore them all. Only the space crew are given any depth,
Jenny Lerner, Leo and the president are surprisingly 2D, and we never get to
know these characters. And because I couldn't care for them, I didn't really
give a crap if the asteroid killed them or not. The script by Bruce Joel
Rubin and Michael Tolkin is horribly simple, and never really makes any
interesting statements.
Mimi Leder, the former ER director and director of the average The
Peacemaker (1996), again directs in a ho-hum style, and never really gets
any emotion out of a scene, which is a shame. The cast are seemingly on
autopilot, although Tea Leoni does gives a rather good performance, even if
she acts a bit too dorky for her own good. She seems uncommonly stupid for a
journalist. Robert Duvall is on autopilot with a underwritten role, he just
seems to be in this film for the money. Elijah Wood, one of the best child
actors working today, is surprisingly average, although his choice of roles
lately haven't exactly been brilliant (i.e. Flipper, 1996). His role is also
vastly underwritten.  Morgan Freeman, again, is utterly wasted with a
ridiculously underwritten role. Like Duvall, he just seems to be in the film
for the money. The supporting cast are all O.K, none making much of an
impression.
OK, so Deep Impact may have messed up character wise, but surely the special
effects are good? Well, yes and no. Although the special effects should be
impressive, with a massive tidal wave destroying New York, the special
effects look like, well, special effects. Sadly, the waves looks like it's
been drawn on computer, and doesn't look too good at all. Surprising really,
when the effects are done by Industrial Light & Magic, who did the effects
for The Lost World and Twister.
In the end, Deep Impact is a wasted opportunity. What could of been a moving
movie with good effects turns out to be a dud in both characters and
effects. The 2 hours the film had could have been used to much greater
effect. Once again, Dreamworks has churned out another average movie. Let's
hope Armageddon is a bit better.
OVERALL RATING= ** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
WEB SPACE PROVIDED BY GEOCITIES
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Bill Chambers
Starring Tea Leoni, Morgan Freeman, Robert Duvall, Elijah Wood
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin
Directed by Mimi Leder
I thought the "competing projects" trend had reached its zenith in
1992 when two overwrought Christopher Columbus movies reached the
screens. The fact that both of them died quickly at the box office
didn't deter the studios from financing separate films about
volcanoes and track-star Prefontaine. Now, Deep Impact is the first
asteroid picture out of the gate - July brings us Armageddon - and
it's certainly no embarrassment to the end of the world'
genre.
Freeman is the President of the United States, bearer of bad news: a
comet the size of Mt. Everest is careening towards Earth, and unless a
team of astronauts can throw it off course, the world as we know it
will end. In three separate stories, we see how this information
deeply impacts' U.S.  citizens. Leoni is an MSNBC reporter who
first cracks the story and hopes that her divorced parents will
reunite before certain doom. Duvall is a veteran astronaut who
accompanies green pilots on the impossible mission. (These are the
best scenes in the film, but the idea that these young astronauts
shun, rather than look up to, Duvall is questionable-false
conflict.) And Wood is a teenage astronomer whom, essentially,
discovered the deadly rock and has it named after him; he wants to use
his fame to bring his girlfriend (Leelee Sobieski, a dead ringer for
Helen Hunt) and her family underground with him, where 800 000 people
have been randomly selected to live during and after the possible
devastation.
After the boring The Peacemaker, Leder's debut, I was not looking
forward to Deep Impact, but she brings an energy to the proceedings
here that she previously employed on the adrenalized series "E.R." She
handles the material with sensitivity, though she skimps on how the
public copes during the year leading up to destruction. As well, by
following three stories focusing on less-than-average people (a
reporter, an astronaut, and a famed-astronomer), a perspective is
skewed-these are characters with a constant inside track to
scientific progress, also presumably more rational than typical John
Doe. I also didn't buy Wood and Sobieski-they seemed more like
brother-and-sister than high-schoolers in crush.
Yet the gripping moments in Deep Impact almost compensate for its
flaws.  I really enjoyed the landing-on-the-comet
sequence-Armageddon will have its work cut out. Freeman and Duvall
are outstanding, as is Vanessa Redgrave as Leoni's mother. In
addition, whenever the film slowed down-a scene in which Duvall
reads "Moby Dick" to fellow teammate Ron Eldard is downright
leisurely-it hints at a bigger, meatier movie that might be on the
cutting room floor. One thing's for sure: the climax will have a
deep impact on anyone who envisions environmental eradication when
Freeman makes his first speech-nightmarish in spectacle, it's
possibly worse, and more terrifyingly beautiful, than you could ever
imagine.
-Bill Chambers; May, 1998; originally printed in "The NewS"

Author
James Kendrick
Director: Mimi Leder || Screenplay: Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin ||
Stars: Robert Duvall (Spurgeon Tanner), Téa Leoni (Jenny Lerner), Elijah Wood
(Leo Biederman), Vanessa Redgrave (Robin Lerner), Maximilian Schell (Jason
Lerner), Morgan Freeman (President Beck), Leelee Sobieski (Sarah Hotchner),
James Cromwell (Alan Rittenhouse) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
Last year it was the battle of the dueling volcano movies, "Dante's Peak" and
"Volcano." This year, history repeats itself, except volcanoes have been
replaced with giant meteors on collision courses for Earth. Michael Bay's
"Armageddon" isn't due until July, but for those who just can't wait to see
Earth destroyed by fire from the heavens, the Steven Spielberg-produced "Deep
Impact" has arrived.
All those involved with "Deep Impact" have sworn up and down for the last couple
of weeks that their film is drastically different than "Armageddon" will be.
They insist that "Deep Impact" is really a drama, with the emphasis being on
realism and how various characters react to the knowledge that their death is
imminent. Maybe the deep impact of the title isn't meant to evoke the physical
collision of the meteor with the Earth's surface, but rather the psychological
and spiritual impact the impending disaster has on the many members of the human
race.
"Deep Impact" - unlike 1983's "Testament" which honestly and effectively
explored the dramatic reality of a nuclear disaster without ever showing the
disaster - is not a drama. Like all disaster movies dating to the beginning of
the cinema, "Deep Impact" is about the vicarious thrill of watching things
destroyed. It's a vicious, cruel-hearted thrill when you really boil it down,
but audiences seem to love it. No matter how much strained drama is inserted
into the first hour and forty-five minutes, it's the grand climax the people are
coming to see. Just think how ticked the throngs of moviegoers would be if the
meteor was thwarted in the end and never hit? But then again, what fun is it
going to a summer movie where the entire human race is wiped out?
Screenwriters Bruce Joel Rubin ("Ghost," "Jacob's Ladder") and Michael Tolkin
("The Player") are actually quite creative in solving this dilemma. They have
astronauts break the comet into two pieces while attempting to change it's
course. This way, we can still have the smaller piece hit the earth and cause
enough destruction to satiate the viewers expecting another "Independence Day,"
while keeping the chances of the larger chunk hitting the earth questionable.
Plenty of death and destruction, but not so much that it's morbid.
The majority of the movie plays out in the standard disaster movie formula,
tracing several sub-plots concerning a variety of characters. First off, we have
Téa Leoni as Jenny Lerner, an ambitious MSNBC reporter (CNN apparently got too
much flak for its omnipresence in last summer's "Contact," so they declined to
lend their letters to this film). Jenny stumbles across the government's
knowledge of the approaching meteor while investigating what she thinks is a sex
scandal, which the President (Morgan Freeman) may know about. Jenny then spends
most of the movie trying to reconcile her feelings about her father (Maximilian
Schell) leaving her mother (Vanessa Redgrave) for a woman half his age.
We also have Elijah Wood as Leo Biederman, an aspiring teenage astronomer who is
the first to actually discover the meteor. When the President announces that the
government has built an immense system of underground caves to protect one
million people in a worst case scenario, Leo marries his sweetheart, Sarah
(Leelee Sobieski), so they can be saved together. Of course, 800,000 of the
people to be saved are selected by a random lottery, and Sarah's parents aren't
selected, thus forcing her to choose between leaving her parents to live or
dying with them.
Last, but not least, there is the all-important American-Russian team of
astronauts who go into space in an attempt to stop the meteor with nuclear
missiles. The team is led by crusty-but-likable Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall),
an aging astronaut resented by his younger comrades. Their first attempt to
deflect the comet results in its breaking into two pieces and the near deaths of
all those involved. But don't count them out until the end ...
Strictly speaking, "Deep Impact" is a by-the-numbers movie. Producers Richard
Zanuck and David Brown ("Jaws") first came up with the idea back in the heyday
of disaster movies, the seventies. The script has been through numerous
re-writes, with writers ranging from "A Clockwork Orange" novelist Anthony
Burgess to executive producer Steven Spielberg. The script is still the weakest
link in the film, but director Mimi Leder ("The Peacemaker") delivers all she
can: tons of tear-jerking melodrama, lots of pseudo-scientific explanations
about what's going on, and a slam-bang finale that involves gigantic tidal waves
destroying New York and Washington among other places.
"Deep Impact" is definitely a cut above most disaster epics, although that's not
saying much. On a tight schedule that involved finishing special effects shots
less than two weeks before theatrical release, Leder managed to get some
fantastic shots, including a highway jam-packed with escaping cars for endless
miles, and the aforementioned tidal waves, which were created in convincing
detail by the wizards at Industrial Light & Magic.
But because the story is divided up into several sub-plots, it's hard to get
involved with the characters. You can feel that the filmmakers were striving for
the same kind of emotional effect evoked in James Cameron's "Titanic," and in
some instances it succeeds. There are a few moments of genuine emotion,
especially the last scene between Jenny and her father. However, "Titanic" has
the benefit of being derived from a historic event that already carries
emotional weight; "Deep Impact," on the other hand, will always be a movie about
a giant meteor heading for Earth. Somehow, it's just not the same.


Author
Jeremiah Rickert
Starring: Tea Leoni, Morgan Freeman, Robert Duvall, Elijah Wood
Directed by: Mimi Leder
     Since the cities of the world were fried by the malevolent aliens of
Independence Day, the apocalypse has been tres chic to the film-industry.
It's like the 70s all over again, only this time the budgets are bigger,
and the marketing/packaging causes you to believe that this isn't like
those films...this is a serious drama.  Uh huh...of course it is.
     In a summer-blockbuster season that sees not one, but two
object-hurtling towards earth films (Deep Impact, and the upcoming
Armageddon) and of course Godzilla, and of course, previous summer's
volcano extravaganza,  it seems another era of "crowds-
trying to outrun the disaster" camera angles, and "the end of life as we
know it" philosophizing is upon us.  Deep Impact's villain is a comet that
a young astronomy student Leo Biederman, played by Elijah Wood (Flipper,
North, The Ice Storm) happens to scope out one day while on an astronomy
club outing.  He snaps a photo of it, which is developed by a
scientist-type (Charles Martin-Smith in a wasted role) who unfortunately
has a car accident before being able to spread the word.  We don't know if
the photo and computer disk with the information are destroyed in the
explosion of his jeep or not.  This is supposed to be suspenseful.
     We are then introduced to aspiring news anchor Jenny Lerner, played
with much facial intensity by Tea Leoni (Tv's The Naked Truth).  She's
deal a story about a government official (James Cromwell, in another
massively wasted role) who resigns his position as a cabinet member
apparently because his wife is ill.  Rumours abound as to why this is,
including that his wife is an alcoholic, and it's because he's having an
affair.  One of his aides, tells Jenny that he talks to an Elle, has a
private phone line, and shuts his door when it rings. She decides to
confront the man about it, and she suddenly becomes very ominous, telling
her she has the biggest story of her life, and that she needs to keep it a
secret.  She of course thinks he's talking about an affair, and is just
egotistic.  She is stopped by secret service on her way back to the office
and introduced to the president, who asks her to sit on the story until
they make an official announcement.  She still thinks this is just an
affair, but the President refers to elle as ELE and that gets her
thinking.  At the ensuing press-conference, she puts it all together as
the president informs the nation that a comet is heading straight for us.
He offers hope in a space mission to plant nukes deep into the surface of
the comet.
     Enter: The Action part of the film.  Miraculously, our Russian allies
have invented a wonderful propulsion system, that will zip a crew of
astronauts towards the comet, where they will plant the nukes that will
throw it on another course.  If that plan fails, then a volley of nukes
will be launched from the surface of the earth...and if that fails...well,
the government has been secretly constructing "the ark" an undergroudn
facility that will protect the chosen few from the destruction and
guarantee that (the american way of) life will go on.  
     Of course, Leder's beef with action films is that they don't have any
humanity, and she stuffs this film with enough fake humanity to make you
ill.  The human drama can be presented either tastefully or
manipulatively, and in this case, I believe it comes across as
manipulative.  There are countless scenes using children to gain the
sympathy of the audience.  Kids are the ultimate in things that everyone
can releate to.  Politicians speak of "our children, and our children's
children" after all, who could be against children?  It gets milked too
often...parents desperately thrusting their babies towards the "chosen"
hoping one of them will take them along, little kids saying goodbye to
their parents, it just comes off as weak to me and gratuitously yanks at
our collective heart-strings, in an apparent effort to give a little
credibility to what is basically a disaster flick.  The same goes with the
"nobility" of characters dying with grace, or giving themselves to that
others can live.  The nobility ends up looking cheap, and rather than the
audience respecting the valorous sacrifices, they think "she was stupid
not to go on the heliocopter."  
     The humor, or attempts at humor fell flat as well.  They are trying
to make light of the end of the world, and you just can't do that.
Everyone is going to die!  At a school assembly, when Biederman's
fellos students are asking him questions, one of them stands up and
proclaims that boy is he going to have a lot of sex, famous people have 
a lot of sex, it's the best part of being famous.  There are some shots 
of his sweetheart giggling and being whispered to by her friends, it
was just horrid.  The low-point of the humor, however,  comes when
the astronauts decide that they will give their lives to try to stop the
comet.  One of them says "well look on the bright side, we'll all get
schools named after us."  I was in 6th grade when the Challenger exploded.
It was the height of Reaganism, an era when on the whole, patriotism
thrived, belief in the immortality of America and our way of life was
booming, and then this diaster happened.  It was something that I found
moving.  I remember my teacher coming into the room and telling us what
had happened...and then setting up a TV and letting us watch it, and it
was painful.  Those astronauts had schools named after them, of course,
and it truly irritates me that they would try to make that into a cheap
joke.  Maybe no one remembers, maybe the crowd this film was aimed at was
too young to remember, but that really was a truly disgusting piece of
attempted humor.  
     The Special effects did the job they were supposed to do, no
complaints there.  The Tidal wave shots were the high-point of the film.
The outer-space scenes were well done as well, although one camera shot
from inside the helmets of the astronauts, sounded like an obscene
phone-call in surround sound.
     There were other things that bothered me...how the film seemed
boring, despite the apocalypse, how it seemed everyone in the country
watched MSNBC, how Tea Leoni really was wasted in the film, as were most
of the other actors (Blair Underwood, Kurtwood Smith, Charles
Martin-Smith, and James Cromley.), and how the second nuke attempt isn't
even shown...just the President telling us it didn't work.  Some of this
stuff really distracted me throughout the film.
     Overall, the EFX were good, the characters were flat, but likeable,
the humor was disastrously horrid, the plot kept the movie going, but I
found myself not caring about characters who were dying, I just couldn't
buy into supposed human drama, it was too cheap and exploitive for me, and
perhaps that kept me from enjoying the film.
Of the $6.75 that I paid for the film, it was worth about $0.50
--

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Paramount Pictures/Dreamworks
 Director: Mimi Leder
 Writer: Michael Tolkin, Bruce Joel Rubin
 Cast: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa
Redgrave, Maximilian Schell, Leelee Sobieski, Morgan
Freeman
   A recent issue of the New Yorker magazine has a cartoon
in which the man, reading the newspaper, says to his wife,
"Now that everyone's in NATO, we don't have to take crap
from Mars any more."  Maybe not.  But worldwide
membership in that powerful security force is no match for
humankind's most potent enemy: Nature.  Recent disaster
movies have had us poor beings inundated by twisters,
floods, earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, fire, and animals. 
We've been able to prevail, though not without great losses. 
Now comes yet another natural disaster, a comet which is
speeding toward the planet on an treacherous trajectory which
allows astronomers to predict the exact moment it will make a
deep impact but leaves them almost powerful to prevent a
tragedy.  Almost, but not entirely.  There is one hope, and is
for a group of astronauts to travel to the speeding meteor and
plant a nuclear device into it, throwing the entire inanimate
godzilla into a tizzy as if to say, "Get off my planet!"
   The younger set, expecting to see a dazzling show courtesy
of Industrial Light & Magic for at least half the time, will be
disappointed.  The picture, directed by Mimi Leder ("The
Peacemaker"), undergoes a woman's touch in focusing on
sentiment and office politics.  Whether this is to the good
depends on your tolerance for the saccharine and your
predilection for violence.  If you weep the like of "Love Story"
you'll go for the tearful partings of families and reconciliation
of father and daughter.  If you like sci-fi but with a deliberate
pace of Robert Zemeckis's "Contact" or Andrew Niccol's
"Gattaca," you will be sufficiently involved.  If you've had
enough of formulaic family feeling, you'll have reservations. 
"Deep Impact," then, is a cautiously paced tale of woe which
will have you guessing: will the comet hit the earth or not? 
While it may be unconscionable to give away the answer in a
review, here's a hint: the comet divides into two parts, a
devastating, humongous rock and a relatively small hunk of
astral projection.
   "Deep Impact" begins as does many a thriller, with a scene
designed to thrill audience adolescents.  Leo Biederman
(Elijah Wood), a bright-eyed high-school kid who calls
teachers and parents "sir," is on an outing with his astronomy
teacher, when he peers through the telescope and discovers
an unknown body adjacent to two well-known stars.  When a
specialist in his lab (Charles Martin Smith) examines the
body's orbit in his computer, he is so shocked at its trajectory
that he drops his slice of pizza, jumps into his jeep with the
evidence, and meets with catastrophe.  As director Mimi
Leder cuts to Hillary Clinton lookalike Jenny Lerner (Tea
Leoni), a career-driven TV news reporter, we find her
investigating the resignation of the Secretary of the Treasury,
whose departure she believes is not occasioned by his wish
to spend more time with his sick wife.  Believing that an
expose of the affair he is allegedly having with someone
named Ellie will spur her into the anchor's seat, she instead
falls upon information about E.L.E., which means Extinction
Level Event.  A mean meteor is determined to wipe out all life
on earth.
   As astronaut Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall), nicknamed
"Fish" because his name sounds like one, joins a mission to
duel the big rock, tearful events occur back on earth among
folks who believe that the mission will fail.  Most important,
newscaster Jenny Lerner decides to hate her dad (Maximilian
Schell), who has recently divorced his wife (Vanessa
Redgrave) to marry a bimbo two years old than Jenny.  Much
of the film treats the family split and ultimate reconciliation--as
Jenny recalls the wonderful times she enjoyed at the age of
five with the aging Jason.  The other tear-evoking tale centers
on young Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood), who has decided
quickly to marry his sweetheart in order to make her eligible
along with him for a safety program and she must choose
whether to stay back home with her parents and die or to join
her new, shotgun partner.
   Morgan Freeman does a dignified job as the president of
the United States, offering both hope and realism to the
people of his country, as he prepares to transport one million
designated by computer to be conveyed to a safe place in
Missouri where they along with one pair of each animal
species (sound familiar?) will survive and procreate.  
   The film has a few brief humorous moments, as when 17-
year-old Biederman becomes famous for discovering the
comet, and a classmate says in front of the other students in
a school assembly program, "You're gonna have more sex
starting now. Famous people always get more sex."  Similarly,
when the astronauts cynically ponder their fate in the
rocketship "Messiah," one says, "Look at the bright side...we'll
all get high schools named for us."
   "Deep Impact" is a by-the-numbers disaster movie with just
enough special effects to please the calamity-starved in the
audience and, like other formulaic films, one in which various
individuals are assigned problems they must either reconcile
themselves to or gain reconciliation from.  Despite its
familiarity, it's a sincere work and, it should be added, one
that's not so far off course.  Just as some people hold that the
earth was attacked by runaway comets several millenia ago
and gained rebirth, others believe that such a calamity could
happen again, at any time.  After all, nature is neutral: it is not
pro-U.S. or pro-Iran or even pro-earth and there's a lot of stuff
up there.  Rated PG-13.  Running time: 115 minutes.  (C)
Harvey Karten 1998

Author
James Sanford
Deep Impact
Rated PG-13
By James Sanford
The Kalamazoo Gazette
Heavens above, it turns out we poor earthlings are about to be squished by a
comet the size of New York!
Does President Beck (Morgan Freeman) have a plan?
And, most importantly, will struggling reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) get
to be the MSNBC anchor person during "Armageddon"?
These and many other burning questions arise during the course of "Deep
Impact," an end-of-the-world scenario that is alternately silly, sensational
and soapy. But itšs rarely moving, although the screenplay by Michael Tolkin
and Bruce Joel Rubin does everything but dice onions in an attempt to jerk
tears. Somehow though, when the curtain is coming down on life as we know
it, it's hard to fret about whether or not Jenny will make peace with her
frosty father (Maximillian Schell) or what will become of teen star-gazer
Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood) and his girlfriend Sarah (Leelee Sobieski).
Not helping matters is the fact that Leo comes off as irritatingly earnest,
partially due to the script requirements, mostly because of Wood's one-note
performance.
Leoni's intrepid newscaster looks practically paralyzed once she gets on the
air, reading bulletins in a thin, wavering voice that would inspire millions
to reach for their remotes.
Obviously inspired by the 1951 sci-fi classic "When Worlds Collide" - with
elements of "On The Beach" thrown in - "Deep" takes a thought-provoking
premise and submerges it in suds.
While President Beck sputters sanctimony ("You will still pay your bills,"
he warns), a crew of astronauts led by veteran rocket-jockey Spurgeon Tanner
(Robert Duvall) takes off on a mission to blow up the threatening comet.
Everyone involved in this endeavor has their own family troubles to contend
with, and, added to Jenny and Leošs woes, these subplots send the film's
syrup content to toxic levels.
Disaster movies by nature are overwrought, but they shouldnšt be as
consistently absurd as this. For example, Sarah's doomed mom hands off her
newborn to Sarah, who hops on a motorcycle with the infant, leaving without
a single diaper or bottle of formula.
Somehow, no one in the Capitol seems to know about the billions of dollars
being secretly diverted into the construction of the worldšs largest
spaceship. And though everyone seems to know weeks beforehand that the
comet's impact will create a tidal wave that will drown the East Coast, it
appears there's no evacuation plan proposed.
Director Mimi Leder seems clueless when it comes to staging sentimental
scenes but she does have the proper touch for the movie's few suspenseful
patches, such as the truly scary sequences with Ron Eldard and company
racing against time to plant nuclear "moles" on the comet's surface.
The scenes of cataclysmic catastrophe in the last 10 minutes also are
impressive and sometimes even imaginative: The image of the head of the
Statue of Liberty floating through the flooded streets of Manhattan is
particularly eerie.
If only the filmmakers had stripped away the saccharine and the
self-importance of "Deep Impact" they might have found the kind of haunting
epic they're trying so hard to create. Instead they've cooked up a crockful
of hard-to-swallow melodrama, full of urgent weddings and quickie family
reunions. It would have been much more fun to drop in on the folks who
elected to party like it's never gonna be 1999.

Author
Alex Fung
DEEP IMPACT (Paramount - 1998)
Starring Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
  Morgan Freeman, Maximilian Schell
Screenplay by Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin
Produced by Richard D. Zanuck, David Brown
Directed by Mimi Leder
Running time: 120 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The act of self-sacrifice is one of the most affecting things that
   can be depicted in a film, and it's something that DEEP IMPACT
   incessantly attempts to exploit throughout its running time.
   Blatantly attempting to tug on the heartstrings of its audience, the
   film wallows in the selflessness of its characters' actions to such
   an extent that it ultimately chokes upon its own nobility.
   DEEP IMPACT is the first of 1998's aspiring major summer
   blockbusters, and a distinct one in that its focus is less on wanton
   destruction and more on characterization (no surprise when
   considering that its screenwriters are Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael
   Tolkin).  The film presents us with the scenario of a
   newly-discovered comet that's headed on a trajectory bringing it on a
   collision course with Earth, promising to destroy life as we know it,
   and then splinters off into three subplots: an enterprising young
   reporter, Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), embittered by her father's
   (Maximilian Schell) divorce of her mother (Vanessa Redgrave, wasted)
   and subsequent remarriage to a much younger woman; Leo Biederman
   (Elijah Wood), a high-school amateur astronomer who's the first to
   discover the comet (which consequently bears, in part, his name), and
   his sweetheart romance with neighbour Sarah (Leelee Sobieski); and a
   joint American-Russian space mission to intercept and destroy the
   interstellar threat, manned by cagey veteran Spurgeon Tanner (Robert
   Duvall) and a team of fresh-faced, media-savvy astronauts.  Tying
   these threads together is U.S. President Beck (Morgan Freeman), who
   appears intermittently in order to make grave televised announcements
   to the public and recap what's happened in the film if you stepped
   out for popcorn.
   While it's somewhat odd to find an effects-friendly scenario
   primarily driven by character dramatics rather than visual eye-candy,
   none of the three major vignettes are particularly compelling, and
   the treacly uplifting effect clearly desired by director Mimi Leder
   isn't achieved.  The story arcs for each of the threads are
   laboriously familiar, and there are so many scenes which involve our
   characters ignoring instincts of self-preservation in order to do the
   right thing that scenes of poignancy become increasingly ineffective.
   The weakest of the subplots is that of MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner,
   who inadvertently stumbles across the news of the comet while
   investigating another story; the whole ELE political intrigue angle
   of the film is misguided and plays as a desperate plot device to move
   the story ahead.  It doesn't help matters any that Ms. Leoni's
   performance is surprisingly lifeless -- she's perpetually
   shellshocked throughout the film, making her entire thread more
   distracting than engaging.  (A scene which calls upon her to
   drunkenly cackle at someone's innocuously oblivious comment that
   "life goes on" is wretched both in its conception and execution.)
   Hinging upon the audience's involvement with the tenuous relationship
   between Jenny and her estranged father in the face of impending
   catastrophe, this subplot falls well short.
   Similarly, there's much to be desired with Leo Biederman's story,
   which encapsulates the life-and-death drama of DEEP IMPACT.  While
   President Beck informs the American public that heroic astronauts
   have been sent to eradicate the comet threat, a backup plan is
   nearing completion.  A network of vast caves have been created to
   house one million Americans and ensure their survival for up to two
   years should the comet strike the planet; as well as a list of
   predesignated personnel, a national lottery, it is announced, will be
   held to select who will fill the shelters.  In reality, of course,
   this proclamation would wind up being tied up in the courts for years
   (the clause which deems those over 50 to be automatically excluded
   from the draw in particular is a real ageism stickler), but no matter
   -- this is the movies, where people are far more altruistic; those
   who fail to be picked and are essentially condemned to death mostly
   stand outside the cave base camps and look mildly irritated.
   Where DEEP IMPACT makes a bad step is when the young astronomer Leo,
   selected to go into the caves by virtue of his co-discovery of the
   comet, proposes to dreamgirl Sarah so that, as his wife, she'll also
   be given passage to the caves and be able to survive the impending
   disaster.  Backed by a gentle musical interlude, it's a scene that's
   clearly intended to be sweet and touching, but given her opposition
   to the idea, I thought it was surprisingly extortionistic, akin to
   declaring "Marry me or die."
   The film plays the Leo / Sarah subplot in hokey manner, wavering back
   and forth on whether or not she'll join him in the survival caves,
   and hits each note in predictable fashion; in a scene where Leo races
   around on motorcycle in desperate search of his beloved, there's one
   shot where he screeches his bike to a halt and tosses his head back
   to look over his shoulder as the music heroically crescendos which is
   such a familiar staple that it almost had me groaning aloud.
   Meanwhile, Spurgeon Tanner and the crew of spacecraft The Messiah are
   given some artificial conflict of their own to deal with in addition
   to disabling the lethal potential of the comet.  The young
   astronauts, led by Oren Monash (Ron Eldard), are resentful of
   Tanner's mere presence on the mission due to his age -- this is a
   young man's game, they believe.  It's a ridiculous plot angle used
   for no other discernable reason than to spice up the subplot -- is
   there *any* doubt that the wily veteran will win the respect of his
   crewmates? -- but Mr. Duvall and Mr. Eldard do what they can to give
   it a credible spin.  There's some obligatory space-bound suspense
   involving the astronauts navigating a dangerously-unstable comet
   surface, which is staged nicely but fails to surprise in its
   aftermath.
   The one performer which comes out best in the film (other than James
   Cromwell, whose participation is essentially that of a cameo) is Mr.
   Freeman.  The role is undemanding, but his sheer onscreen presence
   and the gravity with which he's able to convey his dialogue powers
   him through questionable material.  To a large degree, Mr. Freeman is
   effective because for the most part his character doesn't interact
   with any of the film's other characters at all, but directly
   addresses the audience; essentially isolated, it's as if he's in his
   own separate (and superior) film.
   While Ms. Leder depicts a world under siege, it's a shame that DEEP
   IMPACT chose to underplay the mass chaos and lawlessness that would
   legitimately accompany the advent of such a catastrophic event.  (The
   fact that the country has been placed under martial law is touched
   upon, but with the arrival of the end of the world, that would likely
   mean little.)  The film would be a much more visceral and provocative
   experience had it dared to show society coming apart at its seams, as
   in Steve De Jarnatt's MIRACLE MILE or in THE TWILIGHT ZONE's "The
   Shelter" episode.  There's also the questionable inclusion of a shot
   of the Capitol under reconstruction -- it's obviously intended to be
   uplifting and life-affirming, but it's an odd choice to make when one
   considers that the destruction of the White House was by far the most
   popular -- nay, the *centerpiece* -- visual effects shot for Roland
   Emmerich's blockbuster INDEPENDENCE DAY which left crowds cheering in
   glee.  Since audiences clearly enjoy seeing the landmarks of the
   American establishment being shredded, one wouldn't necessarily
   expect that their symbolic reconstruction would be a crowdpleaser.
   For some reason, the film includes an early sequence in which an
   astronomer is killed in an automobile accident while scrambling to
   get the word out on the approaching killer comet.  Since the impact
   of the incident is negligible -- the data ultimately does reach its
   intended parties -- and the character is never spoken of again, I'm
   left with the nagging suspicion that it was included primarily so
   that there'd be at least one explosion during the film's opening
   hour, but the scene laid the groundwork for something more
   potentially ironic; the world was left unprepared for the comet
   because the astronomer's mail server went down.  Yeah, I know that
   feeling.
   DEEP IMPACT is certainly more of a human drama than it is a disaster
   film (likely to the consternation of the audience drawn in by the
   promise of widespread destruction and mayhem) -- indeed, there's
   essentially only the single apocalyptic sequence which has been
   heavily featured in its promotional material -- and as a
   character-driven drama, it fails on that level.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
"Deep Impact", disaster-season-twin to the wretched "Armageddon", is an
absorbing enough movie when it unfolds in front of you.  But when it's over,
its seams (and there are a lot of them) bulk huge.
I'll be fair.  Instead of becoming the comedic macho-porn action-movie cliche
that "Armageddon" sunk to, "Deep Impact" tries to deal realistically with the
possibility of global annihilation.  It falls short, I suspect, because there
are far too many times that we are reminded, however quietly, that we are only
watching a movie.
"Deep Impact" opens with young Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) peeking at the
heavens through his telescope.        There's something up there which doesn't seem
to register on the charts, and it takes professional astronomer Marcus Wolf
(Charles Martin Smith) to figure out it's a comet on a collision course for
Earth.        He rushes out the door of the observatory with his data disk in his
hand, and then gets himself killed in a crash with a semi.  Right off the bat
this told me the movie is not above using cheap plot devices to build
suspense.
No matter.  The movie skips ahead a year, into Plot Thread Two.  Not-so-
intrepid reporter Jenny *Lerner* (get it?) stumbles across a scandal involving
a Presidential cabinet member and what she believes to be a mistress
named "Ellie".  Lerner is played by Tea Leone as someone who only seems to be
about 66% there. Later on, when she's an MSNBC anchor, she's so wooden and
lifeless I was waiting for a cane to come from offscreen and yank her out of
the chair.
Of course, the scandal is not the news about "Ellie", but "E.L.E.", or an
Extinction Level Event -- the aforementioned comet plowing into the earth and
decimating life as we know it.  In a nice little scene, President Beck (Morgan
Freeman) confronts Lerner about the news and forces her to balance her own ego
against the welfare of billions.  In a movie where a lot of things are not
terribly convincing, Freeman is completely convincing as the President, even
when he is mouthing platitudes like, "Life will go on; we will prevail," with
all the certainty of a man who doesn't want to get caught with his britches
down.
When the news finally breaks, the President unveils a plan to send a space
probe to the comet and blow it to pieces with nukes (gee, where have we heard
that plan before?).  This is, of course, Plot Thread Three.  The probe, named
the Messiah, is piloted by "the last man to walk on the moon", astronaut
Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall).  There's a moment where Tanner seems to be
at odds with his crew -- "They're not afraid of death -- just looking bad on
TV" --        but nothing much is made of it; I suspect either the film or the
script was originally much longer, and many of the emotional subtexts for
such scenes is missing.
This seems to be the heart of the problem with the movie: it doesn't convince
us that the planet is really at stake.  Sure, there's panic and looting and
people boarding up their windows.  There's a truly jaw-dropping (unfaked) shot
of an interstate highway crammed with refugees.  At least we don't get the
obligatory shots of the wild-eyed street-corner preacher with the sign reading
THE END IS NIGH.
But... somehow... there's an additional emotional level to all of this that
seems to be missing.  The script tries to make up for it rather ham-handedly
through some synthetic heart-tugs.  One is Lerner's estranged parents, and
another -- so unconvincing it almost sinks the movie singlehandedly -- is Leo
and his girlfriend, a plot thread which starts well but rapdily degenerates
into something out of "For The Love of Benji", with kids scrambling tearfully
through the wilderness on mopeds.
When disaster finally strikes, the movie's messages are even more confused.
Are we supposed to sit aghast at the destruction, or point at the screen and
go, "Oo, cool!  They blew away the Brookyn Bridge!"  The effects show at the
end belies the movie's intentions -- not because it's there, but because it
doesn't know how to show what's going on except in terms of shopworn disaster-
movie cliches -- people pointing, screaming, running, buildings falling over,
etc.  What emotional involvement we've built with the movie is tossed in favor
of a money shot; a CGI-driven End Times Porn.  And then we get the conclusion,
in which the filmmakers cleverly cheat the story and pull not one but two
endings out of their hat.
What would have worked here?  I'm not sure.  Part of the problem is the movie
is an uneasy alliance of two stories -- serious studies of human beings faced
with hopeless situations like "The Day After" or "The Sacrifice", and
spectacle- effects movies like, yes, "Armageddon".  Somewhere along the line
they should have just picked one track and stuck with it to the bitter end.
Don't get me wrong.  This isn't a bad movie.  It's professional-looking,
relatively well-acted, and fast-moving (courtesy of Mimi Leder's fluid
direction).  I guess the big problem is that "Armageddon" makes it look like a
masterpiece, when it just isn't.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
J Hern
I'm not a professional movie reviewer, but I decided to give on for this
movie.
    If I frequent this sub, you will notice that I am very critical of
movies.  So any positive review is rare.  I consider my reviews are for the
"thinking" person, although there may be some "thinkers" who disagree.
    Jenny Lerner happens upon what she thinks is a bland story about sex and
scandal in the White House.  She immediately finds herself in the midst of a
year long secret that a comet is headed for Earth and will impact in on
year.  What transpires after that is a race against time as citizens of the
world dash to safety.
Téa Leoni does a very good job with a fairly limited script as she provides
an eyebrow raising performance on the big screen.  The all-star cast
provides interesting psychological perspectives as they ponder their
respective fates.
    The plot of the movie itself is a good one, and for once my digest of
"Hollywood" endings was justified, as this movie pulled a 180 and provided
what I call a very realistic ending.  The special effects were precise, not
over done, yet quite reflective of the awesome power of a 1000 ft. tidal
wave.  And finally, a movie that DOESN'T ridiculously depict people
"outrunning" a shock blast (I.e., Independence Day).
    Unless you are an astronomical scientist, you will be hard pressed to
find any impossibilities in this depiction of special effects.  The only
draw back I saw in this movie, which was completely overshadowed by it's
very satisfying ending, was the poor realism of human behavior as a whole in
the face of imminent doom.  For example, with a year warning, no communities
or individuals were creating underground shelters of their own, especially
since there was not enough room in the military underground city to house
more than a million people.
I give this movie 3 and 1/2 stars out of 4, one of my highest ratings.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: May 8, 1998
Starring: Morgan Freeman, Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa
Redgrave, James Cromwell, Mary McCormack
Directed by: Mimi Leder
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (intense disaster-related elements, brief language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/deep.htm
In 1997, it was impossible to mention the movie DANTE'S PEAK without
talking about VOLCANO shortly thereafter. The case might be much the
same for 1998, when movie going audiences will be subjected to the
"twin-vision" releases of DEEP IMPACT and later this year's ARMAGEDDON.
>From the release of the previews, it was obvious that the filmmakers
involved were sending their asteroid-threatens-Earth tales in different
directions. DEEP IMPACT, by far the more character-oriented tale of the
two, loses a lot of the momentum it might've had by struggling through a
muddled storyline; if anything, this cost it any chance it had to outdo
ARMAGEDDON. 
Usually, for disaster event movies, the plot begins a reasonable amount
of time prior to the cork-popping (whether that's a volcano exploding or
aliens attacking a la INDEPENDENCE DAY). Here, however, storytellers
Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin begin the movie a great deal of time
- almost a year, in terms of the movie's scope - before the event and
lead up to the two most exciting parts in the movie with convoluted
storylines. This lack of plot sense does not inspire confidence, and
soon the viewers are left to do nothing but anticipate the moment of
impact (which, thankfully, does arrive). 
DEEP IMPACT is really three stories in one, all of them mostly
independent but all of them connected by the common threat of the
asteroid's imminent collision with Earth. The first is of Leo Biederman
(Elijah Wood), a kid astronomer who first notes the asteroid almost a
year prior to its collision with Earth; the second is of Jenny Lerner
(Tea Leoni), an ambitious reporter for MSNBC who discovers the
government's contingency plans a few weeks before they become public
knowledge; and the third is of Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall), a
seasoned veteran of an astronaut who must lead a team to land on the
asteroid's surface and blow the rock apart with two nuclear bombs. 
The movie, for all its intricacy, would've made a better book than a
movie. Because there are three main plots, and several other minor ones
that give relationship, the movie ends up being much less solid then
hoped for. Directed by Mimi Leder, it has the same helter-skelter feel
of her last action thriller, THE PEACEMAKER. Here, however, her pacing
is worse: the plot lends itself to two incredible scenes of exciting
visuals strung together by lulled plot points for an even 120 minutes.
For all its worth as an "event" movie, DEEP IMPACT may be wide of the
mark, and in two months' time, we'll hope for ARMAGEDDON to fill the
void.
FINAL AWARD FOR "DEEP IMPACT": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Does anyone remember a movie from 1979 entitled 'Meteor'?  It starred
Sean Connery, Natalie Wood, Karl Malden and Brian Keith and the premise
was a giant meteor 5 miles wide that was going to strike Earth.  The
United States and the Soviet Union worked together in firing their
nuclear weapons at it in the hopes that it would be destroyed.
Throughout the course of the picture, splinters of the meteor were seen
from time to time, landing on different parts of our planet before the
big strike.  The film lacked any type of depth.  It basically had very
little intrepid dialogue detailing the effects of such an event and it
felt very out of place in the realm of science.  Of course, it was 19
years ago and progress has been made in the detection of such a
phenomenon since that time and I was impressed with most of 'Deep
Impact'.
Director Mimi Leder ('The Peacemaker') and writer Bruce Joel Rubin
('Ghost', 'Jacob's Ladder', 'My Life',) along with fellow writer Michael
Tolkin ('The Player'), have crafted a very special film that seems
disjointed at first but later becomes a truly worthy film that plays at
the very heart of a potentially emotional situation.
A comet the size of New York City is on a direct collision course with
Earth.  This information comes to the attention of a reporter (Tea
Leoni), who, believe it or not, begins tracking the story as  she
believes it is about a politician and his mistress.  Sound bizarre?
After seeing the film, it all makes sense.  Her efforts to report the
story are thwarted by the FBI, working closely with a liaison to the
U.S. President (Morgan Freeman) and the President himself is directly
involved.  Leoni is run off the road by a fleet of cars and the FBI
agents take her for a direct one on one conversation with the
President.  There is still a misunderstanding about who believes what,
and the President makes a deal with her that if she holds off on
reporting the story for a couple of days, that she will be given access
to a Presidential White House conference and will be allowed the first
question.
The President reveals the truth about the comet and announces the
government's plans on how to handle it.  The U.S. and Russia are working
together on the largest space ship ever constructed to approach, land
and plant nuclear missiles on the comet at its core.  The mission is led
by an ex-Apollo astronaut nicknamed Fish (Robert Duvall).  He was one of
the men who walked on the moon and is the ideal candidate for the
mission, along with several others by his side.  There are also plans to
shield part of the population away underground until the catastrophe is
over.  Explaining things any further would basically give too much of
the movie away so I now zip my lip.
'Deep Impact' is told from the perspective of many different characters,
so young, some old, some in-between and while many of the scenes are
scatter shot, the film's overall presentation is unique.  It gives way
to emotion with some characters you'll care about and others you'll care
less for but the special effects are truly dazzling in showcasing the
effects of a comet impacting with Earth, giving way to a chain reaction
of 1000 to 3500 foot tidal waves, earthquakes and other natural
disasters complete with a booming soundtrack and a nice music score from
Oscar winner James Horner ('Titanic').  The movie had me in the palm of
its hand at the end while I was asking myself..."Could this really
happen"?  After some research, I found out that the answer is 'yes' and
it made the film that much more significant for me in contrast to the
usual bad science found in many adventures related to it.
Other notable members of the cast are Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, James Cromwell and Mary McCormack.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Deep Impact (1998)
Robert Duvall, Téa Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave, Maximilian 
Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell, Mark McCormack, 
Blair Underwood, Dougray Scott, Ron Eldard, Alexander Baluyer, Jon 
Favreau, Denise Crosby, Bruce Weitz. Directed by Mimi Leder. 
Rated PG-13, 1.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
Determined to separate their film from this season's other "Yikes! 
There's a giant rock headed straight for Earth!" movie, the "Deep Impact" 
producers emphasize that "Armageddon" (due July 1) is an action flick, 
while their story is an emotion-propelled, realistic drama. "It's about 
what you'd do if you were told you only had a year to live," said 
director Mimi Leder, "I want the audience to walk away from this thinking 
about their own lives."
Lofty sentiments aside, "Deep Impact" is just another disaster movie, and 
an exceptionally clumsy one at that. In fact, after two hours of enduring 
the film's poorly drawn characters, insipid dialogue, and clichéd 
storylines, it's difficult not to root for the comet instead of the 
people.
There's something inherently awkward about the very notion of a comet 
collision movie. Presumably, no one wants to see humanity wiped out, but 
the whole lure of this type of film is the promise of witnessing disaster 
on a mammoth scale. It's like watching an auto race; no one wishes death 
or injury on the drivers, yet most people love to see a splashy wreck. In 
1951's "When Worlds Collide," the problem was solved by having two 
objects headed for Earth, one on a collision course and one that narrowly 
misses. An intrepid group of travelers takes off in a rocket. After Comet 
A destroys the Earth, they colonize Comet B, which just happens to have 
an oxygen atmosphere and beautiful green foliage.
"Deep Impact" isn't quite that ridiculous, but it comes close. Here, the 
president announces that Earth has a year before impact. In the interim, 
a group of astronauts will attempt to blow up the rogue rock. In case 
they fail, the government will house one million people in an underground 
shelter to begin life anew. A national lottery will be held. If your name 
is selected, you go into the shelter. If no...well, feel free to start 
smoking again.
Had the film seriously examined the societal consequences of a planet-
wide death sentence, "Deep Impact" could have meant something. Instead, 
they follow the "Cheesy Disaster Movies 101" lesson plan to the letter. 
The production hops between three storylines, none particularly inspiring.
While investigating what she believes to be a Washington sex scandal, 
plucky reporter Téa Leoni uncovers the classified information about the 
comet. Like any reputable journalist, she uses the information to strong-
arm the President and further her career. After marveling at her ease in 
cracking open the government secrets (she secures the information in 
about five minutes, using the search engine on her PC,) you can amuse 
yourself by counting the number of plugs given MSNBC, the fledgling cable 
news network. If the president was really concerned with national 
security, he should have told her to go ahead and broadcast the story on 
MSNBC, thus insuring that nobody would ever hear about it.
Storyline Two follows the astronauts as they attempt to destroy the comet.
 Robert Duvall heads up the team, which includes "Swinger's" Jon Favreau 
and TV mainstays Ron Eldard and Blair Underwood. Despite choppy editing 
in the action scenes and a contrived subplot involving the generation gap 
between Duvall and the younger astronauts, these segments carry the most 
emotional resonance, thanks to several poignant exchanges, plus solid 
acting from Duvall and company.
The third storyline is the most ludicrous, focusing on Elijah Wood, the 
kid who discovered the comet, and his girlfriend, Helen Hunt Jr. (her 
real name is Leelee Sobieski, but after one look at her, you'll 
understand.) Elijah snares a spot in the underground cavern, while Helen 
Jr. elects to stay with her parents. Will cruel fate keep the young 
lovers apart? Fat chance. Try to keep a straight face as Elijah tells his 
folks he's leaving the cavern for almost certain doom with his sweetie. 
Their response? "Well son, you take care now." 
There isn't room to cover all the howlingly bad scenes in a film that 
seems brain-dead, even by disaster movie standards. Witness President 
Morgan Freeman solemnly tell the world about the comet, urging the 
populace to stay calm while describing the pending collision in terms 
alarming enough to send nuns screaming panic-stricken into the streets. 
Watch as people outrun a thousand foot high tidal wave moving at the 
speed of sound. Gaze in amazement as Elijah takes off on an highway 
clogged with thousands of cars, finds Helen Jr. in seconds, then easily 
navigates through the traffic jam that has everyone else trapped.
All this and more awaits you in "Deep Impact," the first major 
disappointment of the summer movie season. Incidentally, those whiz bang 
special effects you've seen in the film's trailers don't happen until the 
last twenty minutes of the movie. Unless you're a connoisseur of bad 
movies, wait until this dud collides with your TV and see them then.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     We have had a long period in which special effects have driven
science fiction films rather than characters or ideas.  Last year's
CONTACT was a very good science fiction film with three-dimensional
characters. DEEP IMPACT is the first of two major theatrical films
(along with at least one TV movie) inspired by the Shoemaker-Levy
comet's impact on Jupiter and speculation of what if it had been Earth
that had been hit.  At least in plot and ideas the film is highly
reminiscent of George Pal's classic WHEN WORLDS COLLIDE.  However the
emotional texture of the film also has some of ON THE BEACH.  For the
admittedly small sub-genre of films about celestial impacts on Earth
films--not forgetting METEOR--this is likely to remain the best.
     Teenager Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) sights a celestial body that
just should not be where he sees it.  He reports his finding to
professional astronomer Marcus Wolf (Charles Martin Smith).  Wolf
confirms that indeed it is a new comet.  But Wolf also discovers it is
on a collision course with Earth.  A year passes and TV news reporter
Jenny Lerner trips on something very secret going on in Washington.
There seems to be a serious sex scandal, one sufficient to cause the
Secretary of the Treasury to resign.  In Washington any sufficiently
well kept secret is indistinguishable from a sex scandal.  Jenny wants
to get the goods on the Secretary of the Treasury and instead stumbles
onto what is accurately called the biggest story in world history.  The
United States and Russia are secretly cooperating on efforts to avert
the disaster that is coming our way in the form of Comet Wolf-
Biederman.  The story moves back and forth among multiple story lines.
Morgan Freeman plays a President of the United States whom the script
uses mostly just to make major announcements.  Spurgeon Tanner (Robert
Duvall) is a crusty ex-Apollo astronaut on a mission to destroy the
comet.  But he has a strained relationship with younger astronauts on
the same mission.  Leo Biederman must come to terms with the new fame
he has received having his name associated with a deadly menace to his
planet.  And Jenny Lerner is resolving her relationship with her
separated parents.
     The chief problem with DEEP IMPACT is that two hours is really
about a third of what would be needed to do the story realistically and
cover most of the parts that should be told.  That seems to imply TV
mini-series.  But it requires the wide-screen to do justice to the
visual aspects of the story.  Certainly in the early parts of the film
it seems to be rushing through what is just an outline of what the
story should be.  Much of the story goes by in a very superficial
manner.  Interesting and some sometimes spectacular scenes are left out
that would inevitably take place if a comet were headed for earth.
Cooperation is reached between two country's space agencies.  Huge
projects that dwarf the Manhattan Project occur off-stage.  While in
the plot there is hope for some people and not others, one would expect
great rioting by those less fortunate.  This is only hinted at.  While
human reactions are much more believable than they were in WHEN WORLDS
COLLIDE, they are still far from convincing. We see only frustratingly
sketchy details in a headlong rush to get to still meatier parts of the
story.
     Still the film has a real credibility that is broken only in the
semi-optimistic final reel.  The emphasis of the script is on people
and not special effects, though when the film calls for effects, they
are there in force with some very nice sequences.  DEEP IMPACT and
CONTACT are evidence that the science fiction film is not just for
thrill-hungry teenagers.  It can tell a story on an adult level and
convincingly take us places we have never been and in some cases may
never again want to go.  I give DEEP IMPACT an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
David N. Butterworth
Blame it on sleep deprivation following the impromptu arrival of my
third daughter, Lilla, but I actually enjoyed "Deep Impact."
Given the lack of depth or significance in the previews, Mimi ("The
Peacemaker") Leder's film looked like it should have been called
"Sub-Compact" rather than "Deep Impact."  But as disaster movies go it's
not bad, and not nearly as disastrous as the endless slew of
end-of-the-world pictures that got rammed down our throats in the seventies.
Those productions, often directed by Irwin Allen, always featured
an all-star cast (often with no-star acting abilities) and concerned some
sizable global warning, usually drawing on various manifestations of those
famed four elements--earth ("Earthquake"), fire ("The Towering Inferno"),
water ("The Poseidon Adventure" and its sequel), and air ("Hurricane")--to
dictate the utter futility of the situation.  After all, you can't put up
much of a fight against Ma nature.
Since the seventies exhausted just about every natural disaster
there was, it's only recently that these kind of audience-grabbers have
returned to the silver screen.  In the last couple of years we've been
subjected to threats by twisters, floods, and (twice already!) volcanoes.
"Deep Impact," too, features a carefully selected all-star cast and, like
1979's "Meteor" (not to mention the upcoming "Armageddon"), a plot
concerning a large chunk of rock hurtling towards Mother Earth.
The difference here is that the deep impact of the title has more
to do with the deep psychological impact surrounding the imminent disaster
than the crash 'n' burn spectacle of it all.  That's a far cry from the
embarrassing squabblings of those familiar faces in, say, Allen's "The
Swarm," or any of the "Airport" movies.
Here, the ensemble cast including Téa Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa
Redgrave, James Cromwell, and Maximilian Schell all turn in decent
performances in the face of likely annihilation.
Leoni is especially good as an ambitious newswoman whose
investigation of a government scandal leads her to stumble over an even
bigger Whitehouse secret: there's a comet bigger than a Buick heading for
earth.  NASA sends up a space crew lead by Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall)
to detonate some nuclear charges and throw the comet off course, but the
implosions create *two* comets that are now heading for earth.  Good going,
Spurgeon!
Actually, this is a clever construct because it allows the visual
effects wizards to show off their technical artistry when the smaller of
the two comets hits.  Not enough to create total mass destruction, but
enough for us to witness a very impressive tidal wave taking out Manhattan.
"Deep Impact" gets a little preachy in the last twenty minutes,
especially Morgan Freeman's closing presidential speech, and I lost count
of how many times someone earnestly said "I love you" backed by a cherubic
James Horner score that finally wears out its welcome.  In addition, some
of the logic leaves a lot to be desired (for example when Leoni encounters
a monstrous traffic jam leaving the city she simply takes the hard
shoulder, which appears not to have occurred to anyone else).
But I'd rather watch a film that places intelligent human
dramas--how people really feel and react to life-threatening situations
like this--above predictable "we're all doomed!" histrionics.  And "Deep
Impact" does that.

Author
D. Mandlsohn
Written by Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin
Starring Robert Duvall, Téa Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave, Maximilian
Schell and Morgan Freeman
Deep Impact officially opens the summer season of big-budget action
extravaganzas, but it's different than most other disaster movies, which is
both good and bad. The typical disaster movie has a big cast of
one-dimensional characters and really big special effects. Deep Impact is no
exception. Here's the premise: a comet the size of Manhattan is headed
towards Earth. It doesn't take a genius to figure out that something will
hit Earth, providing us with special effects. But Earth can't be destroyed!
Oh no. We need a happy ending because this is a disaster movie. The two go
hand-in-hand. Sorry to give that away.
Téa Leoni plays a reporter named Jenny Lerner(from the random name box) with
a father(Maximilian Schell) who has left her mother(Vanessa Redgrave, in
three scenes) for another woman. The expository scenes are pretty much a
waste for this type of movie, even if they are relatively well-acted. It's
the shallow characters that are the problem. Another problem is that WE KNOW
that the comet is coming, and the characters do not. This is not dramatic
irony. It's frustration. Leoni keeps us informed and she spends half the
movie in the news anchor position, keeping us up to date. It's a dull role.
Morgan Freeman plays the President of the United States, in a authoritative,
statesman-like manner, and it works well, except for the final,
terribly-written scene(you'll know what I mean). The plan is to put one
million people, by means of a national lottery, into underground caves. I
was surprised that the movie didn't show people arguing over this. The
American public would not voluntarily accept death like the characters in
Deep Impact do. The President also reveals that the largest spaceship ever
constructed is going to land on the comet, and blow it up.
Robert Duvall plays Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner, an aging astronaut on board the
"Messiah." The space scenes with Duvall are the best part of the movie.
Duvall carries the film with an excellent, veteran performance, making a
silly "Moby Dick" reading to a fellow astronaut bearable. But the action
scene in which Duvall pilots the spacecraft onto the comet is ridiculous. I
asked myself how a giant ship like that could maneuver through all that
space debris without getting destroyed. And when the ship lands on the
comet, the plot thickens. The "Messiah" must get off the comet within a
certain time frame before the sun rises(I don't get it). The planting of the
nuclear charges is sloppily intercut with shots of the obligatory countdown.
First, it's 6 hours, but suddenly a couple minutes later(in movie time) it's
down to 1 hour! Then one minute! This is the film's fatal flaw: pacing.
Elijah Wood plays Leo Beiderman, a young amateur astronomer who "discovers"
the comet. His family is selected by the lottery to go live in the caves
because of his discovery. But he doesn't want to leave his astronomer
girlfriend behind. I won't reveal what he does to bring her along, but you
can probably guess. These scenes don't work well because she doesn't have
any significant dialogue, or character to speak of. These are cardboard
characters, and we don't feel for them.
Looking back, it looks like I trashed the movie. But I did give it a **1/2.
That's because it was entertaining. It was worth my $5 to see New York City
get toppled by a tidal wave, even if the effects were not terribly
convincing, like Titanic was. A movie like this needs the audience to care
about the characters, but I didn't. A big movie with world proportions like
Deep Impact should be memorable, but it wasn't.
But it had potential.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Mimi Leder
Cast:  Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell
Screenplay:  Michael Tolkin, Bruce Joel Rubin
Producers:  David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck
Runtime:  115 min.
US Distribution:  Paramount/DreamWorks
Rated PG-13:  brief language, disaster violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Deep Impact is a disaster film that tries to do too much in the two
hours it has.  I noted about thirty minutes into it that the film would
have to clear three hours in order to develop all the subplots into
meaningful stories.  And, as I expected, the film instead relies on
numerous manipulative "heartfelt" scenes in which characters hug each
other, say goodbye, and cry profusely.  I'm not above all that -- some
of the character-driven moments in this film actually work.
But I want a disaster film!  Deep Impact is, as you all should know,
about a big comet careening towards Earth, and what we do to try and
stop it.  The film builds up steadily to its climax, parts of which you
can catch on the trailers and TV spots (you get to see giant tidal waves
destroy buildings and offshore oil rigs, among other interesting
sights).  But, that's two or three minutes of payoff for a long film
about people who cry more than anything else.  Most upsetting is that
the disaster doesn't look nearly as convincing or incredible as I was
hoping.  In trying to do everything (characters and disasters), Deep
Impact somehow misses on both counts, thus proving that you do need
three hours (Titanic) to develop characters and throw them in a disaster
like this.
I really don't want to synopsize the plot.  I don't feel like it right
now, and it probably doesn't matter too much because all that you need
to know is that there's a comet, and that it could wipe out all life on
earth.  I will brief you on the characters, though.  First, there's
Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), a reporter who is essentially the first to
hear of the "biggest story in history."  Her subplot includes her mother
(Vanessa Redgrave) and her father (Maximilian Schell) who are divorced;
she's angry with her father because he's married a younger woman and is
ignoring his ex-wife.  All three actors are very good in their roles,
although Leoni seems unable to smile and Schell seems unable to do
anything but smile.
Then there's young Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) who, one year prior to
most of the events in the film, discovers the comet in his astronomy
class.  He's in love with Sarah Hotchner (Leelee Sobieski, who is a
Helen Hunt lookalike in every possible way).  Both kids have entire
families, the members of which are all given considerable screen time in
this film.  Wood is a strong actor, and he pulls off all of his scenes
with ease; newcomer Sobieski is also good.
There are many veterans in smaller roles.  Morgan Freeman plays the
president in that solid Morgan Freeman way.  James Cromwell has one
(yes, one) scene as the Secretary of State.  Robert Duvall plays
astronaut Spurgeon Tanner, the leader of the mission to destroy the
comet.  The mission utilizes the largest spaceship ever created, the
Messiah.  The plan is to fly up to the comet and plan nuclear devices in
it, hopefully diverting its path.  This is the first measure they take,
and happens about an hour into the film.  I hope you don't expect it to
succeed.  If it did, then we wouldn't get to see the comet flying
through the atmosphere and crashing into the Atlantic Ocean.
The film isn't what I'd call realistic.  The astronauts pilot the
Messiah right into the tail of the comet and try really hard to avoid
the house-sized chunks of ice breaking flying towards them at thousands
of miles per hour.  How the Messiah gets going that fast, or how it
catches up to the comet in a few seconds, are details that we never
learn, and, because of this, the pacing feels strange and rushed through
this section.  The subplot does provide for a well-made scene during
which the astronauts walk around on the icy surface of the comet.
I've heard that Spielberg hand-picked director Mimi Leder for this
project (her debut film was last year's The Peacemaker, which, in my
humble opinion, is not a quality action film, but not really because of
her).  I think she's a pretty good director, and a lot of the scenes
here are handled well (my favorite scene has Leoni and Schell standing
on a beach, awaiting impact).  Often, though, she's countered by the
script, which just isn't all that sharp.  Most of the subplots are so
gooey they ooze from one to the next, and they just keep coming . . .
even when you expect the disaster to finally arrive, you get more and
more "touching" scenes featuring teary-eyed people.
And I wouldn't mind, because, as I said, a lot of these scenes work
(try something a thousand times it's bound to come out right once or
twice).  But when the comet finally does hit, it just didn't grab me the
way I wanted to be grabbed.  It's nice-looking, true, and some of the
images are striking.  But many of the special effects look fuzzy (like
the water rushing over mountain tops), and the disaster overall isn't
gripping enough to warrant this much buildup.  
Deep Impact is an event movie, but it doesn't seem like it wants to
be.  It wants to be a self-conscious event movie with real characters
and situations to care about.  But there isn't enough real development
of the characters or enough horrific disaster footage to make the entire
package altogether smooth.  It's a moderately fun film as summer flicks
go, but it had potential to be a truly moving and frightening film. 
It's a little of both, but not quite enough of either.

Author
James Sanford
         The geeky astronomer enters figures into a computer and
blanches when he sees the result. Surely it must be serious since it
causes him to toss the pizza slice he's eating back into the box, an
event underscored by a burst of menacing music.
  Heavens above, it turns out we poor earthlings are about to
be squished by a comet the size of New York!
  Does President Beck (Morgan Freeman) have a plan?
  And, most importantly, will struggling reporter Jenny Lerner
(Tea Leoni) get to be the MSNBC anchor person during Armageddon?
  These and many other burning questions arise during the
course of ``Deep Impact,'' an end-of-the-world scenario that is
alternately silly, sensational and soapy. But it's rarely moving,
although the screenplay by Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin does
everything but dice onions in an attempt to jerk tears. Somehow
though, when the curtain is coming down on life as we know it, it's
hard to fret about whether or not Jenny will make peace with her
frosty father (Maximillian Schell) or what will become of teen
star-gazer Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood) and his girlfriend Sarah
(Leelee Sobieski).  Not helping matters is the fact that Leo comes off
as irritatingly earnest, partially due to the script requirements,
mostly because of Wood's one-note performance.
  Leoni's intrepid newscaster looks practically paralyzed once
she gets on the air, reading bulletins in a thin, wavering voice that
would inspire millions to reach for their remotes.
  Obviously inspired by the 1951 sci-fi classic ``When Worlds
Collide'' - with elements of ``On The Beach'' thrown in - ``Deep
Impact'' takes a thought-provoking premise and submerges it in suds.
  While President Beck sputters sanctimony (``You will still
pay your bills,'' he warns), a crew of astronauts led by veteran
rocket-jockey Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall) takes off on a mission
to blow up the threatening comet. Everyone involved in this endeavor
has his or her own family troubles to contend with, and, added to
Jenny and Leo's woes, these subplots send the film's syrup content to
toxic levels.
  Disaster movies by nature are overwrought, but they
shouldn't be as consistently absurd as this. For example, Sarah's
doomed mom hands off her newborn to Sarah, who hops on a motorcycle
with the infant, leaving without a single diaper or bottle of formula.
  Somehow, no one in the Capitol seems to know about the
billions of dollars being secretly diverted into the construction of
the world's largest spaceship. And though everyone seems to know weeks
beforehand that the comet's impact will create a tidal wave that will
drown the East Coast, it appears there's no evacuation plan proposed.
  Director Mimi Leder seems clueless when it comes to staging
sentimental scenes, but she does have the proper touch for the movie's
few suspenseful patches, such as the truly scary sequences with Ron
Eldard and company racing against time to plant nuclear ``moles'' on
the comet's surface.
The scenes of cataclysmic catastrophe in the last 10 minutes
also are impressive and sometimes even imaginative. The image of the
head of the Statue of Liberty floating through the flooded streets of
Manhattan is particularly eerie.
  If only the filmmakers had stripped away the saccharine and
the self-importance of ``Deep Impact'' they might have found the kind
of haunting epic they're trying so hard to create. Instead they've
cooked up a crockful of hard-to-swallow melodrama, full of urgent
weddings and quickie family reunions. It would have been much more fun
to drop in on the folks who elected to party like it's never gonna be
1999.

Author
Bob Bloom
 The writers of Deep Impact framed a good idea. Forget about a special
effects extravaganza. Instead, concentrate on the human element, on how
people would react if they knew the end of the world was near.
 That's fine, but screenwriters Michael Tolkin (The Rapture) and Bruce Joel
Rubin (Ghost) overextend themselves. They've created too many characters
and too many subplots, thus some of their protagonists get short shrift and
some of their stories go nowhere or merely hit dead ends.
 Deep Impact opens as Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood), a 14-year-old student
and member of his high school astronomy club, discovers a new body in the
night sky.
 His find is sent to Professor Wolf, a noted astronomer who makes the
discovery that the body is a comet, which he names Wolf-Beiderman, and that
it is on a collision course with Earth. But on his way to transmit the
information to higher authorities in Washington, the astronomer is killed.
 This is a pointless plot device since the story jumps ahead several months
and we learn the government knows all about Wolf-Beiderman. We learn this
because TV reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) is investigating the
suspicious resignation of the Secretary of the Treasury, whom she suspects
is having an affair with a woman named "Ellie."
 When Jenny is kidnapped by the FBI and is taken to meet the president
(Morgan Freeman) she learns that "Ellie" is really "E.L.E.," for extinction
level event.
 The film's first reel is wasted on this, before any real action begins.
 It seems the government is already undertaking a plan to try to destroy or
divert the comet by sending a team of astronauts to land on the body, plant
nuclear weapons and blow it up.
 Meanwhile, back on Earth, the populace is told of a lottery in which 1
million people will be housed for two years in deep caverns in Missouri to
preserve the human race. Actually, it's only 800,000 people as 200,000
scientists, doctors, artists and other professionals (no lawyers, we hope)
already have been notified they will be saved.
 The rest will be chosen by a random computer selection of Social Security
numbers.
 From here director Mimi Leder pushes the story along. But it is rather
slow going, especially here on Earth. The people are too nice, too noble,
too stoic. Oh, Leder shows scenes of looting and rioting, but it's
scattered and downplayed.
 For the most part the human race seems to be facing its end like those
stiff-upper-lip passengers on the Titanic.
 Up in space, astronaut Spurgeon (what the heck kind of a name is that?)
Tanner (Robert Duvall) and his team succeed only in splitting the
seven-mile wide comet into two pieces, and both are still taking dead aim
at Earth.
 We're more than 100 minutes into this two hour drama before the audience
gets what it has come to see. The smaller comet strikes in the Atlantic off
the East Coast creating gigantic tidal waves that destroy every major
American city from Boston to Atlanta.
 But the filmmakers have been sabotaged in a sense by the studio. The
scenes of the tidal wave hitting New York have been shown in television
teasers for the movie so frequently that by the time they are seen on the
big screen they have lost some of their awe. It is a case of familiarity
breeding ennui. No pun intended, but they have lost their impact.
 The performances in Deep Impact are inconsistent. Duvall is his usual
low-key self, playing his heroics in a matter-of-fact professional manner.
Freeman as the president brings a weight and authority to the role that
makes him a most believable head of state.
 Wood is exuberant as the youthful astronomer, but the subplot involving
him, his girlfriend and their respective families seems a bit padded.
 Leoni is sincere, but a bit lightweight for a TV anchor. And Oscar-winners
Vanessa Redgrave and Maximillian Schell as her estranged parents are given
very little to do.
 This is the first of the summer's earth-meets-heavenly body disaster
flicks. The second, Armageddon, opens July 1. Coming from producer Jerry
Bruckheimer (The Rock, Con Air) and starring Bruce Willis, one can expect
more pyrotechnics and machismo.
 For now, though, we will have to settle for Deep Impact. It's a flawed
feature with noble intentions.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Ulrich Schreglmann
REVIEW: "Deep Impact" (1998) (spoilers)
Beware of movies containing sound in space while at the same time claiming
they're "realistic."  When the spaceship, meant to blow up the Big Bad Comet
headed for Earth, takes off with with a supersonic bang reminiscent of the
Enterprise going to Warp Speed, well, that was the moment the
"ShYeahRight!"-level reached my consciousness threshold.  It should have done
so a lot sooner, what with its not just being the technical details that lack
plausibility.  But I guess I'm more of a technology pedant than a
psychologist.
OK, to get this straight right away:  Deep Impact is a BAD movie.  It's a
screwed up movie about a subject of great potential.  And whenever I see a
film of that kind I try to remember all the big and little things that struck
me as bad, thinking of ways it could have been done better.  (However, after
a few paragraphs I'll just resort to bitching.)
It's a matter of fact a comet could be on a collision course towards Earth
right now, and it might be detected late--maybe even too late to do anything
about it.  (Improbable it may be, yet not impossible.)        It is also a fact
that most comets are discovered by hobby astronomers, because the big
telescopes, while being able to magnify single spots in the heavens
enormously, are pityfully inept when it comes to surveying the starscape as a
whole.        So the first scene, in which a boy in high school astronomy class
finds an uncharted spot in the skies can fill you, quite convincingly, with a
sense of dread, knowing what the movie will be about.
Cut to next scene, the photo with the spot that shouldn't be there is sent to
a professional astronomer, who, after only a few seconds of computer
wizardry, determines the snowball will hit Earth right smack in the middle. 
(We all know how fast astronomers can make such accurate predictions from the
the last comet scare we had.  "Oh, it'll come so close it might actually
graze the moon--whoops, sorry, must have gotten a floating point wrong
there.")  Anyway, the comet is scheduled for the great get-together at least
two years from then, but the astronomer has to race down the mountain in
order to tell the world right that night, risking life and limb--and duly
losing it.
Actually that scene might have worked just as well as the first one, like
this: Comet is discovered by accident, well in time to warn mankind, but a
single cigarette butt falling into the lap of the oncoming truck driver is
responsible for precious possible months of preparations lost.        And a simple
frown of concern on the astronomers face would have sufficed, instead of that
silly panic attack we all know astronomers get.  (From the movie Contact we
know they always have to go somewhere really fast by car when that happens.) 
Later we find out the accident isn't even much of a delay--that authorities
were informed at the time, possibly thanks to documents left at the
observatory.  So what was the point of the astronomer's death?        Something
like, "ooh, the comet has claimed its first victim?"  (Maybe that's the
astrological point of view, I don't know.)
I have a deep suspicion the astronomer's death was originally intended
exactly as described above by me, but then some dolt rewrote the script, left
the death in, left it's point out.
Cut to a TV reporter who, while investigating an alleged political sex
scandal, stumbles over the government's secret plans involving their
knowledge about the comet and preparations to deflect it.  Well, this cliche
movie including a ficticious President of the United States wouldn't be out
of the Clinton term of office period if it didn't try to clumsily nudge into
some real life popular political affair.  (Makes you see the intern scandal
with whole new eyes, doesn't it?  Ooh!        Well, everyone who reads the right
tabloids probably knew all along outer space and some conspiracy is
involved.)
The President was about to go public anyway, because the national budget
report is due, and it turns out they have spent quite a bundle on a big
spaceship (the one that goes boom supersonically, in space) meant to
transport thermonuclear bombs to the comet, thus blowing it into smaller bits
that aren't on a collision course.
Here we have a variation of the old James Bond cliche, "rich
villain/government organization builds a supersecret super-expensive base for
some supersecret super-expensive super-important plan."  The incompatible
keywords are, of course, "supersecret" and "super-expensive."  If that were
the real world the problem wouldn't be hiding the imbalance on your bank
account.  The problem would be simply this:  The money is used to buy the
goods and services of thousands of people, to build a space
station/spaceship.  Raising no suspicions in any of them and keeping all
those in the loop quiet, especially about approaching Armageddon, in our
information age where all it might take is a qualified post into
sci.astronomy to make someone look at a certain spot in the sky more closely.
 OK, if that movie were James Bond level I wouldn't mind.  But it IS boasting
realism!
Anyway, the supersecret, super-expensive spaceship takes off (with a
supersonic boom).  They obviously spent so much on the spaceship they even
invented artificial gravity somewhere on the way.  (It's the inevitable step,
right after Teflon.)  I can't remember the astronauts doing a lot of floating
around.  They even sleep in bunks lying down, not floating in sleeping bags
the way you see real ones do in documentaries on Space Night.  Maybe the ship
just accelerates all the time.        But in that case the crew would have lived in
a tower, connected by stairs and ladders, not a long, flat corridor.
The spaceship (which makes noise in space--have I mentioned that yet?) is
powered by some prototype kind of nuclear acceleration.  That's without a
doubt what I would use in order to make sure mankind's last hope definitely
reaches their destination--some never before used nuclear propellant.
I can't make any educated guesses on how dangerous the sunny side of a comet
is to an astronaut happening to stroll across it.  My UNeducated guess, which
I reach by extrapolating about the movie's "realism" so far, is: it was
exaggerated in a sensationalist manner.  (If anyone knows better, feel free
to correct me.        I'm sure there have been some discussions about the movie's
realism already.  I haven't read them yet, but I think I will.        My critique
is from the point of view of common knowledge.)
The crew tries to dig a nuke far into the comet's night side before it turns
to face the sun.  They run late, the sun goes up, pockets of steam start
exploding around them, shooting chunks of ice and one unfortunate astronaut
into deep space.  (Whew!  More drama!)        I wonder how probable it is the
comet's rotational axis is parallel to its orbital axis.  Because if it
weren't there ought to be a polar region on it that is constantly in the
dark.  (OK, the pole wouldn't be the point of preference from where to blow a
chip off.  You'd be a fool if you didn't use the centrifugal forces in order
to bifurcate the trajectories of the resulting pieces even faster.  But you'd
have all the time in the world to drill from there.)
Anyway, the timing of the explosion was obviously off.        The spacial iceberg
breaks apart, but both pieces are still going to hit Earth.  The ship hasn't
any more propellant for a second run, instead they follow the harbinger of
doom home.
At home plans are under way to save a portion of mankind Dr. Strangelove
style, in huge artificial caves.  Later we learn most of the devastation will
be a result of dust from the impact darkening Earth for two years, killing
all plantlife.        So what's the point of digging yourself in?  Wouldn't that
effort have been spent better on producing large numbers of greenhouses,
ultraviolet light bulbs to shine in them and additional power plants to
provide them with energy?  It's not like you're forced to shield yourself
from radiation, as in a NUCLEAR winter.
A last effort to destroy the comets with tactical nuclear missiles from Earth
fails.        (Maybe by now the winter WOULD become nuclear.)  The smaller comet's
impact in the Atlantic Ocean is imminent; the president advises people to
evacuate the coastal areas.  Oh, great, NOW he tells them.  (And apparently
no one else who knew the point of impact in case they failed cared to inform
East Coast residents in time, either, so highways wouldn't be congested.) 
The small comet hits and the Tsunami reaches as far as Washington DC.  If to
see the devastation of New York City is what you have come for, this is your
moment.
Well, one thing at least you can rely on.  If a movie is as cheesy up to this
point it has to have a happy ending.  The astronauts, limping alongside,
discover a pocket has formed in the large comet.  They manage to fly in,
explode their remaining nukes inside, blowing the large comet to smithereens
while also sacrificing themselves.  If I managed to suspend my disbelief this
far--well, why not.  I'm too tired too still worry about plausibility at this
point.        Maybe it's realistic, maybe it isn't, who cares.  The President makes
an encouraging speech in front of the ruins of the Capitol, already in a
stage of reconstruction.  The End.
This review was mainly about the science aspects of this "realistic" movie. 
I could write a critique just as flattering and of this length about the
so-called "character developments."  But I won't.  Suffice it to say, if you
want to see the worthwhile bits, sneak in towards the end, see New York
destroyed, then go see Mister Magoo or The Rainmaker or whatever else it is
that runs in your local theater at the time.  (This review was written in
Germany.  We're behind.)
Ool.
mailto:sm@forwiss.de
http://www.forwiss.de/~uhschreg/
"There's nothing good--unless you do't" (German saying, stupid translation)
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Steve Kong
What would you do if you had only a year left to live? How would you spend
your final days on Earth if you knew that all life as we know it would be
wiped out in a year? These two are the major questions pose by 1998's first
of two outer-space-object-strikes-Earth movies, Deep Impact.
The other movie, Armageddon, starring Bruce Willis, will be released later
this summer. Armageddon is billed as the feel-good sibling of these twin
movies. If that were the case, then Deep Impact would be the morose one of
the two. And the film proves that it is. 
Deep Impact starts off with a young astronomy student, Leo Beiderman
(Elijah Wood) discovering a large comet. What he doesn't know is that the
comet is headed straight for Earth and is an E.L.E., extinction level
event. The comet is 7 miles long and 500 billion tons in weight, roughly
the size of Manhattan and the heft of Mt. Everest. The only thing on its
mind is to keep on coming towards Earth. After we learn all of this, the
story falls into a grove that follows a MSNBC reporter, Jenny Lerner (Tea
Leoni), who is investigating a report of a sex scandal in the White House
and stumbles upon the E.L.E. Having poked around a little more, she
discovers enough to "force" the President of the United States (Morgan
Freeman) to announce what is going to happen to the Earth. 
The Americans and Russians have not been sitting idly on their hands
waiting for the comet Wolf-Beiderman to come and wipe out humanity. During
the year that the comet was only known to the two governments, they have
been building a spaceship to fly out to the comet. The plan is to plant
some nuclear devices on the comet and blow it to pieces. This mission
onboard the spaceship "Messiah" is lead by old-timer Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner
(Robert Duvall). The US has also taken other precautions; it has built vast
underground caves that can hold a million people for up to two years. 
The script by Michael Tolkin (The Player) and Bruce Joel Rubin (Ghost)
fails in one way: It tries to look at the disaster from the viewpoint of
too many characters. When I look back at Titanic, the movie works for one
reason: the focus of the story is on only Jack and Rose. Therefore, we can
emotionally bond with them and understand what they are feeling when
disaster strikes. With Deep Impact, though, there are many characters vying
for screen time and they are not given it. This leaves us trying to follow
the stories and trying to identify with a lot of stock, two-dimensional
characters. When disaster strikes, we are not emotionally attached and are
left to seeing images of women giving up children, families reuniting, and
families torn apart. I expected a little bit more from Bruce Joel Rubin. He
wrote a movie that I respect, a mixed horror-thriller named Jacob's Ladder,
a thought provoking film about death and dying. I'm not sure why Bruce Joel
Rubin did not move that same thought provoking type of writing up to the
next level with Deep Impact. 
The big names attached to the film, Freeman, Duvall, and Vanessa Redgrave
are for marketing purposes only. Their parts are marginal at best. Duvall
has the largest of the parts. I'll say this though; Freeman looks and acts
like a real President and is the best onscreen President yet. He's even
better than Harrison Ford (Air Force One). The major part goes to a stiff
Leoni, who doesn't seem comfortable doing newscasts. Leoni, who is a gifted
comedic actress, is somewhat miscast to in the part of Lerner.
Another person out of place is composer James Horner. The score for Deep
Impact is exactly the same score for Titanic minus the haunting vocals. At
some points it sounds as if Horner took a short vacation and had someone
dub in his Titanic score for particular scenes. For those of you familiar
with Horner's work, his scores tend to sound the same: His Titanic score
sounded like his Braveheart score, which in turn sounded like his Apollo 13
score, etc. But his music for Deep Impact is embarrassingly lifted from
Titanic. Shame on you, James. 
Now for the really bad news: If you're going to see Deep Impact for it's
special effects and destruction of eastern seaboard cities, you've seen it
all already in the trailers and TV spots. Yes, we can blame the idiots in
the marketing department for showing all of the good stuff during the
advertisements. I'm unhappy to say that the advertisements are also
somewhat more enjoyable than the film in the department of Earthly
destruction - in the ads we don't have to wait an hour and forty minutes to
see the destruction. Though some of the special effects are stunning - the
huge tidal waves rushing at the screen are phenomenal - some are out of the
1970's. The worst effects the ones portraying the astronauts in space and
on the comet. 
Mimi Leder (The Peacemaker) does an effective job directing Deep Impact.
Though she has tamed her over-usage of steady-cam shots, she is still using
too many of them. A few scenes in Deep Impact could and did make some of
the audience seasick. One example is a shot in the MSNBC newsroom where the
camera continuously spins around stopping to focus on different people
showing their reaction to bad news. Mimi, did we really have to spin the
camera around like that? It doesn't make for a more realistic shot; it
makes for a shot that looks like some teenager with a new camcorder shot
it. One shot that was powerful, though, was of the traffic jam on the
freeway, which made a tingly feeling shoot up my spine. With Deep Impact,
Leder shows us, as with Peacemaker, that she is very able to direct a large
film. With Deep Impact, though, we see that what Leder needs is not a large
cast of A-list players but a good solid script. Leder made good with the
weak Peacemaker script, and she does the same for Deep Impact, but she
deserves more.
Talking about MSNBC, the product placement and affiliations are tremendous
in Deep Impact. For example: Leoni is from NBC's show The Naked Truth,
Leoni's reporter Lerner works for MSNBC, and when Lerner goes to look up
E.L.E. she uses Microsoft's Internet Explorer 4.0 to search the MSNBC site.
There's the miscellaneous cast: Laura Innes and Ron Eldard from NBC's ER.
And don't forget the people behind the camera: Director Mimi Leder of ER
fame and Producer Steven Spielberg, who also produces ER. It almost seemed
as if Deep Impact was a made-for-TV movie for NBC. 
Deep Impact does bring up a lot of questions that we should ask ourselves.
And it did make me think of some things that I wouldn't have otherwise.
But, it is not as moving as it could have been. I don't hate Deep Impact; I
rather enjoyed it. But, there is one thing that pokes me in the side when I
think about Deep Impact: it could have been so much better with a tighter
script. 
With a name like Deep Impact, the film should have made more of an impact
on the audience. Instead, it only leaves a shallow impact. And with
Godzilla coming out soon, Deep Impact will be nothing more than a Deep
Imprint. Godzilla will easily stomp Deep Impact because of its string of
special effects and bundles of tantalizing ads. Catch Deep Impact at a
theatre near you, but only during a matinee showing. Now I am looking
forward to the second of the objects-from-outer-space films, Armageddon.
I'm sure that the mindless action and continuous special effects of
Armageddon will be the perfect cure for the morose feelings left in me by
Deep Impact.

Author
James Brundage
Directed by Mimi Leder (The Peacemaker)
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin (Jacob's Ladder) and Michael Tolkin (The Player)
Starring Robert Duvall (The Godfather), Tea Leoni (Bad Boys), Elijah Wood
(The Faculty), Vanessa Redgrave (Celebrity), Morgan Freeman (The Shawshank
Redemption), Ron Eldard (The Last Supper), Blair Underwood (Gattaca), Jon
Favreau (Swingers), Maximillian Schell (Vampires), James Cromwell (Titanic)
As a country, we've seen it all for disaster movies. We've seen massive
destruction of the world's cities by aliens (Independence Day). We've seen
volcano's nix the small town and the big city (Dante's Peak and Volcano).
We've seen New York's traffic jammed Holland Tunnel go out from under us
(Daylight). We've seen ships go thrillingly awry in space  TWICE (Apollo 13
and 2001), and comically awry as well (Airplane II : The Sequel) And, of
course, we've seen the worlds most revered ocean liner go down, letting 11
Oscars surface for old Jim (Titanic). And this summer, on the platter for
the American cinema audience, we get to watch planet Earth get nuked, not by
aliens, not by a giant monster (but we get to see New York City get trampled
(Godzilla)!), but by asteroids.
As an action movie, having given away the majority of its plot twists in the
promos, Deep Impact utterly fails. The writers, Michael Tolkin and Bruce
Joel Rubin, veterans of thriller-dramas (The Player and Ghost,
respectively), don't help, but the failure is due mostly to Mimi Leader, the
"ER" vet who, when she shipped herself onto the big screen with The
Peacemaker, started sinking her own career. She can't seem to actually
thrill the audiences for more than a few quick seconds, which are few and
far apart.
But, friends, it did not, like most of the B-rate disasters above (Titanic,
Apollo 13, and 2001 as the exclusion), come out like something put through
the grinder. The movie, through excellent writing and smart plot twists (in
the characters), has a human element rarely seen in the Action genre. This
is a great movie to take your kids too, totally appropriate for all ages, a
good movie for anyone who likes a drama to see, and, if you kind of like
drama and also like a few thrills but can't stand an all out rush, its worth
it too.
Long winded at points as it may be, Deep Impact will probably the best done
disaster movie of the year, and, as long as you can stand about two hours in
the theatre with only about thirty minutes of action, then it is absolutely
worth it.

Author
Jose Manuel Saucedo
Aun cuando sabía que podría ver esta cinta gratis en una Función de Prensa, me lance a verla en su
pre-premiere en el Cinemex San Mateo junto con el jóven Anzaldúa, su hermano, un amigo que se llama Fernando y otra persona que mejor ni menciono, ya que junto con los demás antes mencionados, esta gente iba en plan de hacer un rídiculo en el Cine aprovechando que iban
uniformados tipo los chavos del Servicio Militar que educan adultos, pero con un IQ digno de la tropa Goofy... y después dicen que yo soy el raro.
El Cielo y la Tierra estan a punto de chocar...
Cómo es ya conocido por todos aquellos que leen estas críticas, hace poco nació mi primer sobrinita. El sostener a un recién nacido, -especialmente cuando es familiar cercano a tí- es una experiencia que al menos para mí, me alegró e impacto profundamente. El ver su carita, sus manitas no mayores a mi pulgar, sus expresiones, me llevarón a uno de esos momentos donde reflexionamos acerca de todo, nuestra vida, nuestra forma de ser, el valor de todo y todos los que te rodean, żlo han sentido alguna vez? Es algo a veces fuerte y a veces hasta difícil no sólo de pensar, sino de aceptar, pero te ayuda mucho para crecer interiormente...
Esta sensación, no en un mismo grado, pero sí relativamente parecida fue parte de lo que me hizo
identificarme con Impacto profundo (Deep Impact), una producción perteneciente a los estudios DreamWorks y que bien podría decir que es hasta hoy, la mejor lograda (aunque Amistad no se queda muy atrás).
Esta película cuenta como es descubierto un cometa cuya trayectoria lo llevará en colisión directa con la tierra y la forma en como el hombre como raza humana y civilizada (al menos en EU porque deben de recordar que es película americana) reaccionan ante un fenómeno que bien podría acabar con la vida tal y como existe en este momento.
Contando con dos planes, uno para eliminar el cometa y otro para asegurar que la vida humana continue en la tierra después de la catastrofe, la cinta parte de aquí a un interesante reflejo de película de acción con efectos excelentemente logrados con profundas escenas dramáticas sobre las muy diferentes reacciones de la gente ante la idea de que el mundo se va a acabar, llegando en los casos mostrados en la producción a lo que les menciono arriba, el darse cuenta que es lo que realmente vale en este pedacito de tierra dónde nos toco vivir. Lástima que esto llega cuando es muy tarde, y al parecer, la consciencia de esto sólo puede existir cuando se ha erradicado directamente la sobrevaloración de los bienes materiales.
El sacrificio humano, la verdadera naturaleza del héroe y la trascendencia del espirítu del hombre sobre lo que ha hecho, logran darle una mágnifica identidad a esta película, la cual va entrelazando una buena cinta de ciencia ficción, un drama interesante (aunque a veces llega a ser demasiado sentimentalista) y como toda buena producción de Steven Spielberg, una moraleja profunda, olvidándose de los estelares y de los efectos, dando como resultado una historia profundamente humana.
La música es de James Horner (el que hizo la de Titánic para los 2 ó 3 que no lo sepan) y lleva en sus estelares a Morgan Freeman (Se7en, Besos que matan), Elijah Wood (Flipper, El angel malvado), Tea Leoni (Un equipo muy especial, Wyatt Earp), Vanessa Redgrave (Misión: Imposible, La casa de los espíritus), James Cromwell (Los ángeles al desnudo; Babe, el puerquito valiente), Robert Duvall (Fenómeno, La letra escarlata) y su dirección fue algo que me llamó mucho la
atención, ya que Mimi Leder (quién antes se había quemado feamente junto con los estudios al realizar El pacificador) realiza un trabajo bastante aceptable.
En lo personal, esta cinta es la segunda en el ańo en merecer mi amplia y franca recomendación, sólo les recuerdo que no es del todo una cinta de acción, para eso se filmó Armageddeon que saldra aquí en México en un par de meses.
Un punto final antes de irme. Entre el jóven Fernando y yo, nos percatamos de ciertas situaciones en la cinta que reflejan mucho las profecias populares que "en teoría" precederán al fin del mundo, como lo es el fuego en el cielo, que el líder más importante del planeta pertenezca a la raza negra y otras, además de que hay varias escenas reminicentes al bodrio ese de ID4 y a Moisés y los 10 Mandamientos. Espero saber que encuentran ustedes, Ąnos vemos!
Azevrec
De haber sido ésta un emergencia verdadera, todos hubieramos salido huyendo y no se te habría avisado.
-----== Sent via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/  Easy access to 50,000+ discussion forums

Author
Chris T. Dias
STARRING: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Morgan Freeman, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave
WRITTEN BY: Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin.
DIRECTED BY: Mimi Leder.
**OVERVIEW**
 Leo Biederman (Wood) studies the stars with his astronomy class.
During his studies, he discovers a small bright spot.  His teacher
sends it off to be studied.  He discovers that Leo has found a new
comet.  That, in of itself, is a career-making discovery.  It quickly
gets dashed when the astronomer realizes this comet is heading
directly for Earth.  But, as he leaves the tell the world, a runaway
semi mows down his Jeep, preventing the world from knowing of the
approaching comet.
 Fast-Forward one year later, with a major Clinton-esque controversy
arising.  The president just might be having an affair with woman
named in files simply as Ellie. Tea Leoni plays a reporter for MSNBC
who suspects there's more to the story of a cabinet official's
resignation.  She accuses him of having an affair with this woman and
he gets to say, "I know you're just a reporter, but you used to be a
person."
 Soon she discovers her error; he is resigning not because of Ellie
but because of an E.L.E., which is jargon for "Extinction Level
Event." He wants to spend more time with his family, and has stocked a
yacht with dozens of cases of vitamin-rich Ensure. He must not have
been invited to the briefing where it was explained that all surface
life would be destroyed by the comet, or the other briefing about the
1,000-foot-tall tidal wave. My guess is, the president wanted him out
of the Cabinet.
 The president, played convincingly by Morgan Freeman, goes on TV to
break the bad news to the world, and talks of the Messiah Project,
which will send a manned U.S.-Russian space craft to plant nuclear
bombs in the comet and blow it up. We meet the Messiah crewmembers,
including old Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall), called out of
retirement because he once landed on the moon and might be able to
land on the comet.
 The younger crewmembers resent him, we are told, although dissension
onboard is never followed up on. The veteran has a nice line about the
youngsters: "They're not scared of dying.  They're just scared of
looking bad on TV."  There's another good line at the high school
assembly where the Leo who also discovered the comet is honored. A
friend tells him, "You're gonna have a lot more sex starting now.
Famous people always get more sex."
 So, within 30 minutes of the film, the Messiah is launched...and 40
minutes in the film, they bounce along the surface.  The first hour of
the film runs like wildfire.  By the end of the first hour, the
Messiah pulls away from the comet and attempts to destroy it.  The
plan fails and instead of shattering, the comet breaks in two small
parts.  The 1.5 mile splinter will smack the Atlantic and cannot be
avoided.  However, if the larger 7-mile long one hits, there goes all
life on the Earth.
 So, to make sure life will go on, each country is constructing
underground caves that a select few will live until the disaster
passes.  Then they will emerge to repopulate the globe.  A lottery
will be held and those lucky enough will be able live on.  The others
can only pray.  As the time ticks down, Earth holds its breath.
 Deep Impact could have been really bad...thankfully it wasn't.  It
takes itself very seriously and never tries to be campy.  It does this
by trying its best to make things believable.  This stems from making
the Messiah ship realistic.  It looks prefabricated, thrown together
quickly in a year with an engine system I actually read about many
years ago in a Carl Sagan book.  But before I started liking this
ship, the crew is on the comet, bouncing around 1/10 gravity and ready
to plant the bombs.  I wish this film was longer because then it would
allow us to enjoy the epic scale of this movie.  Instead it rushes
into its drama of who would live and who will die.
 And they do die.  There are four major character in Deep Impact:
Leoni, Duvall, Wood, Freemen.  Then there is about six to eight
characters surrounding each of them.  Of those 30 plus speaking parts,
about six survive.  Morgan Freemen's role, if replaced by a no name,
would be totally unimportant.  He is delegated to simply sitting in
front of a camera and reading off a teleprompter.  Easy job.
 The biggest role comes from Leoni and Duvall, two good actors in good
roles.  Obviously Duvall steals all his scenes and Leoni wasn't as bad
some made her out to be.  I couldn't find really any bad acting in the
film, so what's left is its effects and story.
 As for the story the film does teeter precariously on that tight rope
between ID4 and Mars attacks where there are four or five totally
different stories and you really only care about one or two,
everything else is just boring.  Luckily, Deep Impact only has three
major pots running and you like them all, even though the Messiah
mission was the leader for me.
 When the first comet strikes, the effects are startling, but
familiar.  The initial tidal wave is amazing and jaw dropping but when
it starts sweeping through Manhattan and Washington, its reminds me of
the fireball sequences in Independence Day with the cars flipping and
buildings falling.  The best of these is an underwater sequence of
Manhattan showing the head of the Statue of Liberty floating to the
bottom.
 Could Deep Impact be better?  Yeah...there were some strange actions
by some people and I think that some of the solutions people had to
some problems were tossed aside.  One example is that the President
announces they launched nukes to take out the big rocket but then
announces that they failed.  No effects, no suspense, like this plot
point was just tossed away.
 I liked Deep Impact.  It seems appealing to both disaster fans and
science fiction nuts.  I enjoyed it and the ending was very
satisfying.  As for that big rock...
 ...Well...I was sitting in my chair as Freemen announced the landing
site.  I mean here we are, in Prince George, high up, far in the
continent.  We should be okay.  Then he says the second big rock will
impact in Western Canada...Everyone in the audience just threw their
arms up, "Well, we're screwed!!"
DEMOGRAPHIC: Deep impact has a high fatality rate but no one dies on
camera.  Millions die in the disaster but luckily, we don't see any.
Language is minor and film can be very downbeat in its climax.  Makes
you proud to be a human being.  Too bad there aren't any aliens to
blast away...

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
Or "How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bolide". An enraged 
comet attempts to land on Tea Leoni. America gets all mussed up. 
Apparently the rest of the world is a little put out too.
Two years ago, it was extreme weather.  Last year, it was severe 
geology.  This year, it's cosmic impact films.  In light of such 
obvious trend-following, a few fears are justified.  Are these going 
to be good films or just market-stuffers?  Now, little Steven 
Spielberg would never give us something like "Independence Day" or 
"Starship Troopers", would he?
No, but he might give us "The Colour Purple".
This is how it goes: young Leo Biederman discovers a new comet that is 
intent on squishing the United States (and incidentally destroying the 
rest of the world too).  Somehow, the entire astronomical community of 
the world is gagged until ace reporter Tea Leoni (showing a startling 
ability to play the same character she does on TV) comes snooping 
around.  The Prez (Morgan Freeman) crumbles and makes a nation-wide 
announcement: "We're all going to die."  The nation, as represented by 
a whole lot of B-grade TV actors competitive underplaying the "oh 
shucks, we're just folks" shtick, show concern by wrinkling their 
foreheads.
But it's all OK, the government is going to take care of everything.  
Strangely enough, this isn't interpreted as a reason for widespread 
panic.  No, how else do you defeat a rogue comet but by sending up a 
crack crew of astronauts, including one called "Spurgeon Tanner" 
(played by a curiously mummified Robert Duvall).  Hell, if I was a 
comet, that would throw me off-course.
And so it goes.  We can tell there is civil unrest, because the houses 
of a lot of white, middle-class people get messed up.  Tea realises 
that only people who are reconciled with their family are allowed to 
die and leave the film.  So she goes and mooches around with her 
father (Maximilian Schell, looking like he's been attacked with a 
bicycle pump) and her mother (Vanessa Redgrave).  Later, if you look 
away for a second, Redgrave just seems to dematerialise in the middle 
of the film.
Meanwhile the astronauts have stopped giggling at Spurgeon's name and 
realised that at least he has a character with more than one dimension.  
Angered by this, one astronaut (aggressive guy) says that Spurgeon is 
too old and should be making nostalgic movies with Laura Dern.  
Russian guy, black guy and female guy nod wisely.  Other guy realises 
that he has so little screen time, he must be scheduled to die later.  
And indeed, after they blast-off, move s-l-o-w-l-y through their ship 
to show you it's in zero gravity, they land on the comet and other guy 
dies.  (He dies after calculating that on an 11-km rock, gravity isn't 
just low, as the scriptwriters apparently believe - it's nonexistent.)
Aggressive guy and black guy get injured. Cowed by this, Russian guy 
and female guy let Spurgeon take over the mission.
Back on the ground, the government is selecting a million random 
people to stick in a set of caves in Missouri for the duration of the 
comet-induced nuclear winter.  Finally people can see the government 
is out of control.  (Missouri?  Are you kidding me?)  About 30 mildly 
aggressive demonstrators gather outside the caves to protest.  (I 
assume they're demonstrating - or maybe they've just had too much 
coffee.)  But now there are TWO comets, and while we might survive the 
first - which makes a high-pitched buzz as it moves through space - 
the deep rumble of the other tells us we're in trouble.  The Prez 
orders all the nuclear missiles to be fired offscreen at the comet.  
Later he tells us they failed.  (Just between you and me, I don't 
there ever were any missiles.  The Prez has probably been making out 
like a bandit on those Strategic Defence appropriations for years, 
occasionally staging a few accidents in Omaha silos to keep Congress 
from looking too closely.)  Subsequently a lot of people hug and make 
up just before they are killed, although not in any sort of up-close 
and icky way.
It would be churlish to deny there are some genuinely stirring moments 
in "Deep Impact".  In particular, those scenes involving Vanessa 
Redgrave and her character's realisation of, and resignation to, her 
own death are fairly powerful.  There is also some nice model work in 
the SFX and it is refreshing to see a film that doesn't glorify in its 
own bodycount.  However these are severely weakened by heavy-handed 
storytelling (alternately underlining or shortcutting the plot), an 
oppressively omnipresent soundtrack (forever whispering in your ear 
"this is a stirring emotional moment"), and indifferent acting.  It's 
not a bad picture, but it's an irritatingly simplistic one, almost 
claustrophobic in its narrow worldview.  [**/ok] and "The Comet 
Purple" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"Deep Impact"
Released 1998.
Directed by Mimi Leder.
Produced by Steven Spielberg, Richard D. Zanuck et al.
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin  and Michael Tolkin.
Music by James Horner.
Starring Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
        Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, Maximilian Schell, James Cromwell,
        Blair Underwood.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Author
Justin Felix
Written by Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin.  
Directed by Mimi Leder.  
Starring Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman.  
Rated PG-13 (contains violence and profanity)  approx. 110 mins.  
Synopsis:  An annoying, alcoholic reporter for MSNBC stumbles upon the
biggest story of the century: a giant comet is on a collision-course for
Earth.  A crew of astronauts attempt to blow up the comet with nuclear
devices but only manage to split the comet in two.  A salvo of nuclear
weapons, a massive underground shelter, and the astronauts' desperate
second plan become man's only hope for survival.  
Comments:  Judging from DEEP IMPACT's previews, I expected the worse.  With
syrupy phrases bandied about like "oceans rise," "cities fall," and "hope
survives," along with a melodramatic score in the background and a rather
cheesy image of a tidal wave knocking buildings over in New York City, the
movie did not seem promising.  Add to this the fact that another
high-profile summer flick, ARMAGEDDON, deals with basically the same topic
-- Hollywood has a hard time coming up with respectable disaster movies in
pairs (as the recent volcano and earthquake debacles illustrate).  I was,
however, somewhat surprised by DEEP IMPACT's strengths.  Instead of a
turkey, it's a better-than-average TV mini-series with a bloated 75 million
dollar budget and a shorter running time.  
Those 75 million bucks seemed well-spent, surprisingly.  The special
effects in DEEP IMPACT are very noteworthy (quite a feat considering the
countless movies Hollywood releases now which are predominantly
effects-driven).  Nothing shown in this movie, to further the surprise, is
particularly new or innovative.  People flee in vain through a crowded New
York City street, for example, with a giant tidal wave smashing buildings
and consuming cars behind them, a scene almost stolen from INDEPENDENCE DAY
(same city, similar street -- only, in ID4, it was fire rather than water).
 Similar destruction, both in cities and in the countryside, have been seen
in many other recent natural disaster flicks.  VOLCANO, DAYLIGHT, and
DANTE'S PEAK come to mind.  This doesn't, however, lessen the impact that
such images of destruction has on the audience (no pun intended).  Though
highly unrealistic, the outer space sequences are also visually stunning,
perhaps the best in the film.  
Whatever was left over in the budget after the special effects was still
well-spent.  DEEP IMPACT sports a very solid, respectable cast.  Robert
Duvall and Morgan Freeman give the most notable performances.  Duvall,
fresh off of his Academy Award-nominated work on THE APOSTLE, pulls at the
heartstrings as an aging astronaut named Spurgeon Tanner.  Tanner, an
experienced navigator and recent widower, overcomes the age discrimination
of his much younger crew to become a leader and a hero convincingly.
Morgan Freeman's always powerful presence lends credence to his job playing
the President of the U.S.  Screen vets Maximilian Schell and Vanessa
Redgrave play the divorced parents of the reporter who breaks the story
very well.  The reporter, Jenny Lerner, played by Tea Leoni, is the only
casting misfire here.  Leoni is wooden and unconvincing throughout; she
lacks charm, and many of her scenes are hollow and unsatisfying.  As one of
the major characters in the movie, this is a striking fault.  
Another fault, admirable as it may be, is that DEEP IMPACT attempts too
much.  I made a comparison earlier between this film and a TV mini-series.
DEEP IMPACT needs four or six hours to satisfactorily tell its tale.  The
story takes place over the course of a couple of years and involves a great
many characters.  We see the President and the government, the news media,
the astronauts of the space shuttle "Messiah," and numerous everyday,
middle-class, mostly white Americans.  Many of these characters are complex
and fascinating, yet not enough time is spent on them.  In order to be more
in-depth in a 2 hour movie, perhaps the screenwriters could have
concentrated upon one group of characters.  My vote would have gone to the
"Messiah."  The astronauts are uniformly interesting; all have families on
Earth (so we still would have a tie to the Earth); and, their sacrifices
are some of the most memorable in the movie.  We don't see them in
training; they're just introduced suddenly, given a party, and launched
into space.  
Focusing upon the astronauts would have also saved the audience from
sentimentally absurd scenes involving the middle-class, suburban, American
characters.  As primarily a disaster film (one could legitimately argue
this is science fiction as well), DEEP IMPACT follows some of the cliches
which appear in other movies of this genre.  We have pregnant women,
parents who sacrifice themselves for their children, and despicable
characters who turn over new leaves in order to become heroes.  Thankfully,
a dog doesn't play a prominent role here (dogs-in-jeopardy, a tired element
seen in disaster epics like DAYLIGHT, etc.).  Young love, however, does
appear: the child who unknowingly discovers the comet falls in love, gets
married to save his sweetheart (he's picked to go into the underground
shelter; she is not), follows her as she decides to spend the apocalypse
with her parents, and then finds her, somehow, just in time to witness the
movie's climactic ending.  Please.  This was the most unlikely subplot of
the film, and I, for one, did not buy it.  Though, as my friend and I
vacated the theater, I overheard two teenage girls talk about how they
hadn't cried so much at a film in a long time.  I guess it worked for some
people.  
Removing the plot from the critical equation (let's face it, most
special-effects driven films ask you to swallow a lot that's unbelievable),
DEEP IMPACT is an entertaining, diverting, early film for the Summer of
1998.  This is a film to check out on the big screen.  Rated PG-13, this
film makes a pretty good matinee movie with little that would offend the
audience.  The rather convoluted storyline, though, may tax some children's
understanding and patience.  

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell
It's not surprising that the 60's and 70's style disaster flicks are now
back in the Hollywood scene, with Deep Impact being the first
"collision-course-to-Earth" film to be released in 1998 (Bruce Willis'
Armageddon is coming out later on in the year).  What is surprising, is
what Mimi Lee (whose directorial credits include The Peacemaker)
includes in the package: a study of apocalyptic conditions, love amongst
chaos, the survival of hope, and some grueling space sequences.  Oh, and
there's also that Meteor hurtling towards Earth.
But the question is - as tyrannical as it may be - does Deep Impact
flourish in these ambitious, creating the supreme Sci Fi indulgence of
disaster and "real" drama?  The answer, sadly, is no.  But there are not
many science fiction films nowadays that can work on more than just
"science fiction" levels; last years Gattaca was one of them, Space
Odyssey another (yes, that is a gap of about 30 years). Deep Impact is
great as a Sci Fi, but terrible as a drama.
When reporter Jennie Lerner (Tea Leoni, of TV's The Naked Truth)
investigates what she believes to be a White House sex scandal, she
finds herself on hot pursuit of the greatest news scoop in history.
Trouble is, she doesn't know what she's chasing.  She does recognize
that it's big - really big - when she bumbles into an interrogation with
President of the USA Tom Beck (Morgan Freeman).  In 48 hours, he
addresses a dignified speech to the nation, announcing that a Meteor is
on a crash-collision course to Earth.  And that over the previous 2
years the world's biggest ever space shuttle, "The Messiah," had been
constructed by the USA and Russia to destroy the troublesome rock with
nuclear technology.
The world "hopes for the best and prepares for the worst," constructing
massive underground caves in the confidence that life will go on even
after collision.  As Deep Impact's promo posters read: "Oceans Rise,
Cities Fall, Hope Survives."
The primary problem with Deep Impact lies with its central character,
portrayed insipidly by Leoni - a hazy, almost petulant actor who really
does belong as a sitcom character only.  Her role as an arrogant and
presumptuous reporter has been done to death; picking journalist
characteristics ranging from Lois Lane to Harry Shearer in Godzilla -
and all the common cliches are unveiled.  James Cromwell delivers a
fitting line: "I know you're just a reporter, but you used to be a
person, right?"
As far as a capable cast is concerned, this is not a problem with Deep
Impact, having three Oscar winners and two Oscar nominated actors.  But
they all tend to look overrun and imbecilic - struggling to maintain
respect whilst muttering overly ambitious and unsatisfying dialogue.
Although Morgan Freeman is often buoyantly powerful as the aristocratic
Beck, when was the last time we saw him in his true, Oscar deserving
form?   Certainly not in his recent run of films - Hard Rain, Amistad,
Kiss the Girls and Chain Reaction.  In fact, it's been five years since
Freeman has selected a truly impressive character to play (in The
Shawshank Redemption); with the possible exception of the alluring
detective William Somerset in Seven (and his replica performance in Kiss
the Girls).
Robert Duvall, grasping "hero" status in the film, is the only other
actor worthy of a mention - giving an amicable presence as an astronaut
brought out of retirement to lead The Messiah.  One of his featured
scenes, a quest to destroy the Meteor using nuclear devices, brings back
memories of better times - of times of A Space Odyssey - and is a minor
triumph in itself.
But even with Deep Impact's moments of gripping cinema, forming superb
Science Fiction framework, it fluffs up too many times to make it a
credible experience.  The film comes nail bitingly close to being a
worthwhile epic to add to this years blockbuster tally, but Mimi Lee
seems never able to keep it in capable, focused control.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback


Author
Homer Yen
When I walked out of the theater, I couldn't help but feel that I was
somehow cheated out of a grander movie.  There were lots of nice touches
that wanted me to embrace it and declare it as a terrific adventure that
would pave the way for the upcoming summer blockbusters.  But don't be
fooled.  If you look close enough, you'll see only a comet without a
tale.
The main focus of the film centers around a terrifying discovery that a
comet is hurtling towards the earth.  It is the size of Mt. Everest.  It
is characterized as an Extinction Level Event.  And if it hits, life as
we know it may end.  Morgan Freeman, an eloquent and believable
President, tells the public of the Messiah Project, which is a desperate
plan to save Earth.  A newly created spaceship manned by a young,
ambitious crew and venerable Spurgeon Tanner (Robert DuVall), will fly
to and intercept the comet.  They will land on it and plant nuclear
devices with the hopes of either destroying it or altering its course.
Meanwhile, back on Earth, the President prepares for the worst.  A
network of underground tunnels, called the Ark, is built.  However, it
can only support 1 million people.  A national lottery will be held, and
all of America can only hope that they'll be picked, knowing that most
of Earth's population will perish.
The Messiah team land on the comet and work frenetically to plant the
bombs.  Landing on the dark side of the comet, they have only hours to
complete their mission.  Once daylight bridges the horizon, the
temperature will soar to a scorching 350 degrees, and gases will spew
out from the surface making the still rock seem like a minefield.  This
sequence is by far the most exciting part of the film, but the rest of
the movie gets bogged down by burdensome sub-plots.  News correspondent
Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) is an up and coming reporter looking for her
chance to sit in the anchor seat.  The film devotes a little time to the
competitive atmosphere and her big break when she is the first to
uncover the story of the oncoming comet.  Leoni has good timing and
carries herself well.  Unfortunately, her story shifts abruptly, and now
we're introduced to her divorced parents (Venessa Redgrave and
Maximilian Schell) and the deep amount of hatred that she has for her
Dad because he walked out and married a much younger women.   We know
that they'll make up because when the end of the world is near,
reconciliation is not far behind.  There is also the story of young Leo
Beiderman (Elijah Wood) who discovers the comet.  He is guaranteed
entrance into the Ark and wants to save his junior high sweetheart who
was not selected.
Overall, "Deep Impact" is better than other movies of the disaster genre
such as "Volcano" or "Twister".   This movie has an understated courage
and I liked many of the performances.  I also liked the idea (though
underdeveloped) that this kind of event forced the characters, in the
face of imminent demise, to reveal their true colors.  This film could
have captured my imagination, but the reality is that it only deserves a
marginal recommendation.   It starts off great, but then leaves a
disappointing taste in your mouth.  Like many formulaic disaster flicks,
the focus of the movie moves too much from one silly story to another
and the only thing that manages to stay on course is the comet.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave, 
      Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell
Director: Mimi Leder
Producers: David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck
Screenplay: Michael Tolkin, Bruce Joel Rubin
Cinematography: Dietrich Lohmann
Music: James Horner
U.S. Distributor: Paramount Pictures
     Another summer, another double-dip of disaster dramas.  This time 
around, instead of volcanoes, it's comets.  The films in question, Mimi 
Leder's DEEP IMPACT and Michael Bay's ARMAGEDDON, are separated by two 
months, so the first should have a chance to run its course before the 
second reaches the screen.  (More likely, the first will get squashed by 
GODZILLA.)  The movies, while utilizing similar premises (big piece of 
space debris on collision course with our beloved planet), have 
fundamentally different slants.  DEEP IMPACT focuses more on the Earth-
based sitting ducks than on the would-be astronaut heroes.  ARMAGEDDON 
sends Bruce Willis into space to kick asteroid. (ARMAGEDDON is not near 
the top of my "must see" list -- after MERCURY RISING, I've had enough 
of Willis for the year.)
     By their very nature, disaster movies tend to be mediocre (at 
best).  Going into DEEP IMPACT, my primary reason for optimism was the 
recognition that the cast is loaded (Robert Duvall, Vanessa Redgrave, 
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, James Cromwell).  I mean, how bad can 
a movie be with names like that?  Unfortunately, an A-list group of 
actors doesn't mean a lot when there isn't much of a script.  Somewhere 
within DEEP IMPACT, there's a worthwhile story struggling to get out.  
Sadly, it never emerges, and what we're saddled with is a poorly 
concentrated tale that builds "drama" by using an avalanche of clichés.  
     The film opens with a modicum of promise by detailing the initial 
discovery of comet Wolf-Biederman by high school student Leo Biederman 
(Elijah Wood), who's at a telescope party with his local astronomy club.  
One year later, after overeager TV reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) 
stumbles onto a story about the approach of an E.L.E. (Extinction Level 
Event), President Beck (Morgan Freeman) is forced to address the nation 
and reveal that a comet the size of Manhattan is on a collision course 
with the Earth.  The planet is not defenseless, however:  a spaceship 
has been constructed with the sole purpose of landing on the comet, 
planting nuclear devices, and blowing the "dirty snowball" off course.  
On board the space ship "Messiah" is the aging veteran of many 
assignments, Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall), who is twice as old 
as anyone else in the crew.  But, even as the "Messiah" mission gets 
underway, the men and women of the Earth prepare for the worst, which 
appears increasingly likely to happen.
     One of the most obvious problems with DEEP IMPACT is that there are 
too many characters, each with too little personality.  At any given 
time, there are at least four subplots (the President's response to the 
situation, the TV reporter's family problems, the astronauts' mission, 
and a teen romance) vying for screen time.  Consequently, none of the 
characters are given the opportunity to become real or important to us.  
In TITANIC, which is essentially a disaster movie with a romance tacked 
on, James Cameron had the right idea:  focus on a few, select 
individuals.  Had DEEP IMPACT taken this approach, it might have been 
more gripping.  As it is, the viewer sits patiently in his or her seat, 
enduring all sorts of perfunctory, "character building" moments while 
waiting for the special effects show to begin.  
     Since this is a disaster movie, some sort of cataclysm is expected, 
and, in that, DEEP IMPACT does not disappoint.  While the special 
effects sequences are not eye-popping, they generate a certain visceral 
satisfaction.  And, although a huge tidal wave bearing down on the 
United States' east coast looks computer generated, it's impressive 
nonetheless.  Still, the catastrophe passes a little too quickly, and it 
fails to generate the kind of awe that the film makers were striving 
for.  The science in DEEP IMPACT is adequate for a big-budget summer 
flick, but hardly flawless.
     This is director Mimi Leder's follow-up to THE PEACEMAKER, and it's 
not a great deal more successful.  The same basic problem is evident:  
she has the actors, the visual effects, the camerawork, and the 
technical know-how, but all of that can't cover up the fundamental 
weakness of a flawed, inadequate screenplay.  At times, I felt like I 
was watching a stripped-down version of INDEPENDENCE DAY, minus the 
aliens and the charm of Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum.  DEEP IMPACT has a 
bushel of good actors, but they're all on hand to pick up paychecks.  In 
fact, several key players -- namely Vanessa Redgrave, Maximilian Schell, 
and James Cromwell -- are seriously underused.  The emotional 
cornerstone of the film is intended to be Tea Leoni (FLIRTING WITH 
DISASTER), but, as perky and appealing as the actress can be, her 
character is so sketchily developed that it's difficult to identify with 
her.
     In the end, it all comes down to caring about the characters and 
their circumstances, and I didn't.  Also, while the film teases us with 
some dramatically-rich ideas (How would men and women react if they knew 
that the end of the world was imminent?), it doesn't follow through.  
We're given glimpses of possibilities, but nothing is developed, and 
that makes it all the more frustrating.  It all turns into background 
noise in the lives of about a dozen two-dimensional, stock characters.  
Needless to say, the movie isn't as profound as the title suggests.  In 
fact, when considering the impact of Leder's film, the word "shallow" 
leaps to mind far more readily than "deep."
Now with more than 1400 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"My belief is that no movie, nothing in life, leaves people neutral. You
either leave them up or you leave them down."

Author
Berge Garabedian
Mimi Leder's follow-up to the Dreamworks studio's first ever cinematic
feature, THE PEACEMAKER (5.5/10), leads the twin set of comet movies
set to hit the theatres in the summer of 1998. ARMAGEDDON with Bruce
Willis will follow this early-riser in late July.
PLOT:
A gigantic comet is set to strike Earth within the next year. A sextet
of qualified personnel are sent into space to blow the comet up before
it smashes into ground zero and annihilates all of mankind. Meanwhile,
all of the inhabitants of dear planet Earth must begin to deal with the
not-too-unrealistic approach of Doomsday. Panic and suspense ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Mostly interesting, flawed, piece about the circumstances that would
follow an end of the world scenario such as this. The special effects
are great (especially near the end of the film), but overall the film
plays more like a drama than any kind of special effect or
science-fiction extravaganza. For the most part, I didn't really "get
into" the characters' personal lives, as they would have liked us to,
but I must admit that these characters are a little more developed than
your basic summer special-effect blockbuster (Mrs. JoBlo on the other
hand, heartily felt for the characters, as displayed by her excessive
unleashing of tears through most of the second half of this flick.)
The actors in the movie were also pretty good, with Freeman and Duvall
showing up with the strongest performances. Leoni didn't really impress
me in her role as the feisty, yet sensitive, reporter, but the crew of
the "Messiah" (the spaceship sent up to destroy the comet) were
genuinely tough and believable. Of course, I hold a special place in my
heart for John Favreau, who wrote and starred in my favourite picture
of 1996, SWINGERS (8.5/10). 
All in all, if you're in the mood for a decent time at the movie
theatre, with some great special effects (when needed), I would suggest
you go see this film but without too many high expectations. If you're
into character development and believable personalities, I recommend
you skip this sucker and go straight to your nearest video store for
the latest in your "wear-care-and-tear" movies.  The movie does run
close to two hours, but you won't really feel it, because it does move
at quite a rapid pace. Overall, a decent improvement for Ms. Leder from
the dismal PEACEMAKER, but still, nothing to write home about. Oh, and
one more piece of advice for Ms. Leder: try to sprinkle your films with
a slight touch of humour once in a while, and things might not seem so
grim to the audience. Both of her films lack highly in this regard. 
Little Known Facts: 
Téa Leoni's real name is Téa Pantleoni (Téa means Goddess). She was
born in New York and stands 5"7. She married X-files star David
Duchovny in 1997, and has been quoted as saying, ""I don't do T&A very
well because I haven't got much of either." She actually auditioned for
a Charlie's Angels (1976) remake role (as a dare) and got the part. A
writer's strike in Hollywood meant the series was never made, but the
pre-publicity was enough to get her noticed.
Robert Duvall once said, ""When I started taking theater classes I
began to make all As. Before that I didn't even know what an A was."
When he first moved to NY to pursue his acting career, he shared an
apartment with his older brother and four other aspiring actors, among
them a young fellow by the name of Dustin Hoffman. 

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin
Starring: Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Robert Duvall
Synopsis: 
This human interest story features a big tidal wave in the last few
minutes. There are three sets of main characters, each with their own
issues:
1.  A teenage boy named Leo (Elijah Wood) who has discovered a comet
must find a way to proclaim his love to a girl.
2.  An American lady reporter named Jenny (Tea Leoni) whose career was
made by the comet story must get over her European father's remarriage.
3.  A retired ace astronaut named Fish (Robert Duvall) must get his
younger comrades to socially accept him as they fly a rocket to the
comet.
Once the main characters definitively resolve these personal issues,
they turn their main attention to the prospect of a giant comet hurtling
towards the earth. Then comet gets focused on for a few last minutes and
the movie ends with a presidential speech. 
Opinion:
When disaster strikes in a 'disaster' movie, the injustice of it is that
heroes are too young to die because they have big unresolved issues to
deal with - - like redemption or finding a lost loved one. Then the
catastrophe strikes them, making everything that much harder and more
dramatic to deal with. This is the TITANIC formula.
On the other hand, suppose you have a disaster movie where the heroes
have already finished finding their love or have already achieved
redemption before the calamity even strikes. Then the subsequent
disaster is merely academic, something entertaining and touristy to be
viewed with no real emotional investment. 
In DEEP IMPACT main characters wrestle their way through human dilemmas
like teen love and dealing with divorce and finish up. The main focus on
the comet appears at the end, rather extraneously, neither punctuating
nor aggravating human issues that have already been solved adequately.
In terms of drama, it's an add-on. And so, paradoxically, by the end of
the movie the dramatic disaster angle neither impacts nor is deep.
Decent acting and good special effects can be found here, but I think
the script could be stronger if the issues were timed so that the comet
impacted all of the main characters in a more physical way throughout
the entire movie, rather than just at the ending. 
On the other hand, DEEP IMPACT remains an adequate movie. It is
well-acted, it entertains, and even amazes, despite its depersonalized
disaster.

Author
John Eung Soo Kim
Unlike most disaster movies, "Deep Impact" focuses on the psychological
aspect of impending doom.  Dir. Mimi Leder tries to bring us into the
minds of the characters and explore the drama for each sub-plot but it
just doesn't seem to work.  "Deep Impact" is Leder's second feature
film.  She directed DreamWorks' first feature "The Peacemaker" with
George Clooney and Nicole Kidman.
The story and script was very well written.  The situation and measures
taken seem very feasible.  The only problem?  The people didn't seem
real and sorry to say, the directing wasn't all that good as well.  It's
very difficult to have a director (whose strength is in drama) to direct
a story with nothing but heros for a cast.  Everyone sacrificed.  Some
gave up their lifes, others allowed their child to go off and save the
girl he loves, etc, etc.
Academy Award winner Robert Duvall seemed out of place and unconvincing
(I never thought I would ever say that),  3 time Academy Award nominee
Morgan Freeman was one-dimentional, Tea Leoni was always either scared
or angry.  And sadly to say, these were just a few of the problems. 
Leder does try, however.  There's a great scene where we're glued to the
edge of out seats when we are brought into the helmets of the
astronauts.  The slow repetition of dissolves as Mrs. Lerner prepares to
die is reminiscent of Scorcese's "Age of Innocence".  Unfortunately, the
attempt to bring us in to the minds of the people in the smaller stories
only suceeds in making the film seem smaller.  As if the budget wasn't
large enough to support the special effects, great cast AND the large
amount of extras needed to make it a legitimate disaster film.  There
just wasn't enough scenes with a mass of people.  In fact, there were
more people in the theater than in most of the crowd scenes.
Overall, due to poor directing, art direction, and character
development, I gave the film *1/2 of *****.

Author
Michael Redman
The night skies have always held a fascination for mankind. One of the
ultimate unknowns, that's where gods lived and where we look to for signs as
to how to proceed with life. Various heavenly bodies and their configurations
signify favorable or adverse conditions. Comets were often thought to be ill omens.
In the first of this summer's destruction-from-above films ("Armageddon" with
Bruce Willis opens later) one particular comet indicates the most sinister
omen you could imagine. It's about to strike the Earth and wipe out all life
on the planet.
High school student Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) is peering through his
telescope one night at an amateur astronomy outing and finds a glow in the sky
where there wasn't one before. When a professional examines the information,
he discovers the bad news - just before he has his own fatal impact with an 18-wheeler.
A year later television news reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) is hot on a
story about a White House sex scandal concerning a woman named Ellie. Through
a web-search and dumb luck, she discovers that the actual word is "ELE",
Extinction-Level Event. Abducted by G-Men for a secret meeting with President
Beck (Morgan Freeman), she does an amusing word-dance attempting to find out
what is going on without revealing that she knows little.
Beck believes that she is about to break the story and is forced to go public
with the upcoming disaster. But not to worry, he explains, everything is well
in hand. A team of astronauts is about to take off in the "Messiah", the
largest spaceship ever built, to nuke the Mt. Everest-sized comet and save the world.
Veteran astronaut Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall) is the odd man out
on the team. The rest believe that the oldster is only included on the trip
for the PR factor. He thinks that the only experience they've had is on flight
simulator video games.
Several months later, the Messiah reaches the comet to blow it to pieces.
Since this is only half way through the movie, no one in the audience has any
expectations that this plan will succeed. If it did, this would be one of the
shortest disaster films in history and we wouldn't be able to see the huge
tidal wave wipe out New York as shown in the previews.
Back on the home planet, the President tells the nation that there's been a
glitch, but we have back-up plans. And if all else fails, we're constructing a
huge "Ark" cave where a million people along with animals and plants will wait
out the two years of darkened skies after the comet's collision. Our way of
life will survive. Meanwhile, everyone should just go about their normal lives.
The film follows three groups of people: the astronauts, Lerner and
Biederman. The reporter is coming to grips with her personal anguish. Her
parents (Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian Schell) have just divorced and her
father has married a woman half his age. Young Leo is smitten with a classmate
and wants to get her to the cave where she will survive.
Falling into the "Towering Inferno" syndrome, this movie attempts too much in
too short a time. None of the characters are fleshed out and it's a real
struggle to care about whether they live or die. All the cinematic short-cuts
of manipulative teary-eyed good-byes in the world can't make us involved if we
don't know the people.
What could have been fascinating sub-plots are left uninvestigated. Tanner's
conflict with his fellow astronauts disappears into nothingness. A million
people living in the Ark and how they deal with that situation begs for more
screen time, but we never even see the inside of the caves.
This is one of the few instances where television would be the superior
medium for a special effects film. There's too much to tell. It's tailor-made
for a multi-hour mini-series.
Oddly enough, we never see most of the action. Most of the big outer space
excitement is missing. As we watch Lerner's broadcast, the signal is disrupted
and all we get is a computer simulation. When Titan missiles are launched
towards the comet, we learn of the result from the President's speech rather
than seeing it. The punchlines are gone. For a $75 million film, it seems _small_.
Admittedly there are a few impressive effects scenes. The astronauts on the
surface of the comet is the high point of the action-oriented events. The huge
tsunami wiping out the east coast isn't bad.
The acting is adequate, but with a cast of A-list actors, you would expect
more. Far too many people are under-used and you are left wondering who they are.
The film missed the big story. How would most people react if they knew they
were about to die? Beck tells them that they should continue as usual, paying
their bills and going to work. I don't know about you, but if I know that life
is coming to an end in a few months, those credit card bills are going to have
to wait.
You'd expect that such an announcement would provoke mass hysteria, but
there's very little of it in the film. In the real world, emotions would be
running high. Some people would choose to party the last days away, others
would be rioting in the streets and still others would be making peace with
their lives. There's a song out now about the day they cured AIDS and the
writer sleeps with half a dozen people on that day. With the end of the world
in sight, you'd think that sex would be one thing on at least some people's
minds. There's no sex, no mass destruction, no panic. Everyone in the movie
takes the low-key moral high ground. Admirable but not realistic.
Director Mimi Leder ("The Peacemaker", "ER") has the right idea. People in
the midst of disaster are more interesting than the disaster itself. "Titanic"
proved that. But it doesn't work here. The cast is too big and the time too limited.
"Deep Impact" has its heart in the right place. There's just not enough of
that heart.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for over 23 years and if he hears
of a comet heading towards his house, he's planning on partying like it's
1999. Email party invitations to redman@bvoice.com.)
[This appeared in the 5/14/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Phil Brady
El Nińo has screwed up our weather patterns so much that the first
summer movie has arrived in early May. Some of the haste in presenting
Deep Impact is an attempt to put as much distance as possible between
this film and the July release of Armageddon. Both films bring us an
Earth threatened by collision with a Big Rock From Space. A recent news
release caused a buzz about this very thing, but it was quickly refuted.
One account said that the alarmist scientist was linked to one of these
films. Welcome to the information age.
The movie starts with a young MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni),
who thinks she has uncovered a cabinet-level scandal. The "Ellie" that
Jenny suspects of being a homewrecker turns out to be an E.L.E. project
- "Extinction Level Event." In less than a year, a Manhattan-sized comet
will strike the Earth. This gets her on the inside track as the story
develops, and vaults her to an anchor's desk, perhaps before she is
ready. Her newscasts move the story along. And there IS a story.
Although Dreamworks spent good money for special effects, they also
hired real scriptwriters, and many good actors.
Casting Morgan Freeman as president is perfect - he always radiates a
cool intelligence that could get him the real job if he wanted it. His
grave press conferences give the film an emotional depth. Robert Duvall
plays an aged astronaut, added to a space team that will try to
intercept and destroy the comet. The  young crew resents his insertion
into their practiced team, but he proves his worth.  Charles Martin
Smith opens up the film with a good, brief role as the astronomer who
discovers the comet.  Elijah Wood plays the high-schooler who brings it
to his attention, achieving co-discoverer status. The kid's new fame
forms one of the side stories, as it merges with another - the
government lottery to see who will get to hide below the surface and
survive the impending nuclear winter. Another sub-plot gives Vanessa
Redgrave some good scenes as Jenny's mother, and she makes them genuine
enough to transcend their "filler" status.
Tea Leoni may not have been the best choice to play Jenny. She has
demonstrated that she is a brilliant, beautiful comedienne, but this
role uses none of her strengths. Jenny never smiles, never shows any
skin, and always looks tired. Seeing her weary, hollow face so often, I
caught myself wondering if she shouldn't put on a few pounds.
Some scenes in such an epic write themselves: disarrayed traffic; heroic
gestures, successful and futile; heartfelt farewells. It would serve no
purpose to elaborate on the ending, except to say that it clearly shows
a lot of thought and respect for the audience. That respect did not
preclude some fairly blatant product placement, though. While showing
stockpiles of Ensure may save some lines of dialogue, it was done more
than once. And is there any reason our reporter has to work for MSNBC
and not some other, CNN-like, cable news outfit? Other movies substitute
other letters of the alphabet without breaking stride. Small gripes for
a decent effort. Deep Impact makes a reasonable addition to the genre,
and it doesn't make the audience swallow much to buy into it.

Author
Michael Dequina
Before even seeing a single frame of the film, it would be easy to snicker
at Deep Impact, in which a comet on a collision course with Earth threatens
the existence of all life on the planet.  It is the latest entry in this
decade's dubious revival of the '70s disaster film, and the first of two
"the sky is falling" flicks to hit screens this year (the other being this
coming July's Armageddon, in which a meteor is the threat).  Its tagline,
"Oceans Rise.  Cities fall.  Hope survives" is not as cornball as that of
the utterly ridiculous collapsing tunnel thriller Daylight ("They came in
alone... the only way out... is together"), but it's every bit as treacly.
The opening moments of Deep Impact offer more to snicker at.  The
cheesiness is not confined to the disaster movie conventions, such as the
usual opening "roll call," in which all the major characters and their
personal problems are introduced.  The most prominent of the "personal"
stories is that of ambitious TV news reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), who
is distraught that her father (Maximilian Schell) left her mother (Vanessa
Redgrave) for a younger woman (Rya Kihlstedt).  What is just as
snicker-worthy is how this co-venture between Paramount and DreamWorks SKG
aggressively pushes another high-profile corporate collaboration, Microsoft
and NBC's cable news network MSNBC, which employs Jenny, who is the film's
ostensible main character.  In the vision of America presented here, MSNBC
is the television news source of choice in every home, when in reality it
only reaches a fraction of the country.
The initial signs point toward something along the lines of a Volcano or
Dante's Peak, but there's one thing about Deep Impact I underestimated: the
skills of director Mimi Leder.  She won an Emmy for her helming work on
NBC's smash ER, which is essentially a weekly disaster movie, each episode
featuring a new set of guest stars with their own personal and medical
crises.  The challenge presented by this format to the director is twofold:
(1) to make the audience care for these guest characters, regardless of how
briefly seen or thinly written they are, and (2) powerfully tug at the
emotions without being heavy-handed or overly melodramatic.  Having passed
the "ER challenge" in numerous episodes and showed a flair for creating
suspense in The Peacemaker, Leder could not be a better fit to bring
Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin's rather formulaic disaster screenplay
to screen.
As the countdown to impact progresses, the ominous feeling of doom is
palpable, leading the final act to take on a surprisingly convincing and
affecting emotional dimension.  There's nothing here that will profoundly
move anyone, but the fact that anything manages to touch the heart is high
achievement in a genre generally more concerned with effects.  Situations
that initially feel contrived, such as Jenny's familial crisis and the
teenage romance between Sarah Hotchner (Leelee Sobieski) and comet
discoverer Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood), achieve some poignance; and even
the more vaguely drawn characters, including U.S. President Tom Beck
(Morgan Freeman), astronaut Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall), and his
rather faceless crew (Ron Eldard, Jon Favreau, Mary McCormack, Blair
Underwood, and Alexander Baluyev) aboard the comet-bombing spacecraft
Messiah, have their share of touching moments.  The latter fact owes a debt
to the actors, who all do a solid job and are well-cast, with the possible
exception of Leoni; she delivers a decent performance, but her trademark
unconventional speech rhythms and line delivery make her somewhat hard to
buy as a star news broadcaster.
Although its catastrophic theme and impressive special effects work (the
giant ocean waves are particularly spectacular) place Deep Impact in the
same category as the likes of Twister, it is the first of the '90s disaster
films to successfully marry the advanced film technology with emotions that
ring true--a film that makes a genuine impact, even if it isn't as deep as
hoped.
mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mrbrown@ucla.edu
>My personal WWW siteshttp://welcome.to/mrbrown
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court: http://fly.to/michaeljordan
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak: http://fly.to/mj23
Personal Page: http://welcome.to/w3md
>Other WWW sites I work onhttp://www.HollywoodHotline.com
Albany Online: http://www.AlbanyOnline.com
Eyepiece Network: http://www.eyepiece.com
"I didn't know what to expect. It's like something you chase
 for so long, but then you don't know how to react when you
 get it.  I still don't know how to react."
--Michael Jordan, on winning his first NBA championship in 1991
...or, my thoughts after meeting him on November 21, 1997

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Okay moviegoers, dust off your old balance scales as you try to
decide whether DEEP IMPACT is worth recommending.  (DEEP IMPACT is the
first of this year's big-rock-hits-earth movies.  The Bruce Willis one
doesn't hit until July.)
     On the plus side of the scales you will probably want to include
the marvelous acting by such veterans as Morgan Freeman and Robert
Duvall as well as younger star Tea Leoni from FLIRTING WITH DISASTER.
Also on the plus side are some remarkable special effects in the third
act - the first has some cheap looking ones straight out of an old Buck
Rogers movie.  Finally, the outline of the story, as opposed to the
details of the script, is fascinating, so you'll want to put it on the
positive side.
On the negative side, Mimi Leder's direction and Michael Tolkin and
Bruce Joel Rubin's script is so confusing and so riddled with holes
that you'll spend the hour after the movie discussing all of its
problems with your date and friends.  The large array of needless
subplots and unnecessary characters goes on this side.  The biggest
weight on the negative side of the scale is the long second act in
which the movie loses all momentum and tries to turn from a big budget
action adventure to a maudlin soap opera.
     Of course, you may want to balance the scales differently.
     The story has three distinct acts and a short prologue.  The
prologue about a government cover-up of a comet on a collision course
with earth, which has great potential, is given needlessly short
shrift.  The first act is a fascinating science fiction story with
astronaut Spurgeon Tanner (Duvall) and Co. attempting to nuke the comet
off course.  The second act is an excruciatingly long and slow weeper
full of lugubrious mini-dramas about people lamenting the end of
civilization as we know it.  The final act tries to pick the action
back up with the comet approaching and people heading for shelter.
     So we have a sleep-inducing action picture - now there's an
oxymoron - that is bracketed with some great scenes.  (When the tidal
wave washes over the top of the World Trade Center, for example, the
visuals are tremendous.)
     Tea Leoni plays a young CNBC reporter named Jenny Lerner, who
breaks the biggest story in this millenium.  "I know you're just a
reporter, but you used to be a person, right?" Secretary Alan
Rittenhouse (James Cromwell) complains when she first confronts him
about the cover-up.  With some great scenes reminiscent of BROADCAST
NEWS we go into the inner workings of a television newsroom.  Jenny has
a pair of divorced parents, played by Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian
Schell, and every time they come on the scene the movie loses all
momentum.  Elimination of both of their characters would be a huge
improvement.  If their characters belong in a movie, it's not this one.
     Morgan Freeman plays the wise President Beck.  He's the sort of
president you can trust even if he did hide the comet's existence for a
year.  And he's honest.  Name any president that would have the guts to
go on national television and tell the nation that now is the time to
panic.
     If you can only see one earth in peril movie this year, this is
not the one to choose.  There's no guarantee that Bruce's will be any
better, but hope springs eternal in the land of popcorn and candy.
     DEEP IMPACT runs 1:55.  It is rated PG-13 for intense disaster-
related elements and a little profanity.  The picture has the potential
for scaring the living daylights out of impressionable kids, but in
general it should be fine for kids around 10 and up.

Author
Rev. Mama Lani
As disaster movies go, this made-for TV movie wasn't bad at all.
There is one minor problem however: Someone decided to release this
film in movie theaters.
The film starts with young Leo Biederman (Wood) discovering an
unknown object in the sky during an astronomy club outing. A year
later, up-and-coming MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Leoni) thinks she
unearths a big sexual scandal in the White House involving cabinet
member Alan Rittenhouse (played all-too-briefly by Cromwell), who
resigns abruptly over what Lerner believes is a woman named "Ellie."
Lerner soon learns the story is bigger than a mere affair when she
is whisked off by the men in black to meet with the president. In an
amusing scene, Lerner and President Beck (Freeman) conduct a tango
of words as Lerner realizes "ELE" (Extinction-Level Event) is no sex
scandal.
The president agrees to hold a press conference to inform the public
about a Manhattan-sized comet zooming toward Earth. Everything after
that involves every cast member having a teary-eyed moment as they
say good-bye to their loved ones, although I suppose I would be
cutting this review short if I didn't give you a bit more
information.
The US and Russian governments have crafted in a record-breaking
eight months "Messiah," a built-in-outer-space ship that takes six
NASA astronauts, including Duvall's Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (who the
rest of the crew thinks was brought on by the Powers That Be for PR
purposes) to the comet to detonate nuclear bombs under its surface
and render it into small pieces and thus harmless.
However you guess correctly that this plan does not quite work or
else you wouldn't get to see the World Trade Center tsunamied as you
saw in the movie trailer.
This film tries to be _Titanic_ and _the Love Boat_ together, and it
simply can't do it in its limited running time. Three-hour-long
_Titanic_ was a "disaster movie" that had enough time to go through
the disaster AND allow audiences to sympathize with its two main
characters.
In _Deep Impact_, a similar attempt is made instead with no less
than *three* relationship subplots, and it is simply not possible.
Leder attempts to manipulate the audience into tears through the
straightforward technique of showing close-ups of loved ones hugging
and crying with each other, which doesn't work because the
characters are given so little time or opportunity to develop.
The bottom line in a disaster movie however, is the actual disaster.
Unfortunately even with the creative special effects of ILM
(Industrial Light and Magic), there is very little impact on the
audience. In fact, you see a third of the disaster's special effects
in the movie trailer.
Had the movie focused on one relationship and shown realistic scenes
of mobbing, looting, panicking and mass violence, _and_ delivered
with massive special effects (that last more than five minutes),
this would have turned out to be theatrically satisfying. As it is,
even with the president declaring martial law using the US Armed
Forces, not one soldier fires his M16; not one civilian is shown
taking advantage of his Fourth Amendment rights; not one person is
shown committing a crime. In fact, there are no "bad guys" in this 
movie at all.
Probably saddest of all is the utter underutilization of some
excellent actors. Both Duvall and Freeman do well acting their
stereotypes as they have some decent air time. However it is truly
unfortunate that Schell, Redgrave and Cromwell are little more than
walk-ons when we know they could really shine in their own
spotlights.
Worth seeing as a TV mini-series or with a discounted matinee ticket
only, I suggest you stay home until the next big disaster movie
(_Godzilla_) is out in theaters in a few weeks. At least that movie
seems to be more focused on the disaster itself and not on the
mediocre, underdeveloped character relationships.
-- 
